14005508
History_of_Brazilian_nationality
Located in South America, Brazil is the fifth largest and fifth most populous nation in the world. First discovered by Portuguese explorer lvares Cabral on April 22, 1500, it remained a Portuguese colony until it declared its independence on September 7, 1822.Brazilian nationality prior to independenceBrazils economy was largely based on agriculture and mining; specifically the production of sugar and tobacco for export.  As a result, land was concentrated in the hands of relatively few wealthy, plantation owning families, and production was largely dependent on slave labor.  The intermixing of these Europeans and Blacks, as well as the native Indians of the territory, helped create a unique people and culture.(Burns,6)The social, economic, and political hierarchy of this period was largely based on race; with Europeans occupying the upper ranks and the non-whites subsequent ranks below them.  Despite these internal divisions, Brazil possessed a number of factors that aided in the formation of nationalist sentiments among the elite....First its unity of territory. Brazil stretches unbroken from the Amazon in the north to the Rio de la Plata in the south, and from the Atlantic coast to the foothills of the Andes... The vast majority of the people speak Portuguese and are Roman Catholic.  Their language differentiates them from their Spanish speaking neighbors... (Burns, 5)A growing natavist trend in literature,(Burns, 9) and the emergence of colonial born elites created a sense of pride and attachment to the territory of Brazil and a distancing from Portugal. The revolutions in America, France, and the America along with the maturation of Brazil as a colony furthered nationalist sentiments.(Burns, 25)Role of the Napoleonic Wars in Brazilian independenceDespite its natural geographic barriers and the distinct culture of its inhabitants, Brazilian independence would only be realized after a series of events set in motion by the Wars.In 1807, Portugal was invaded by Napoleon forcing prince regent Dom Joao to flee to Brazil along with other members of the royal family, and a number of notables and functionaries. This effectively making Brazil the seat of the Portuguese government.(Britannica, 80)While in Brazil, Dom Joao instituted a number of reforms and decrees, most notably the one on December 16, 1815 which designated the Portuguese dominions the United Kingdom of Portugal, Brazil, and the Algarves, making Brazil coequal with Portugal.(After the French withdrawal from Portugal, mounting pressure from the Cortes (Portuguese parliament) forced the return of Dom Joao (now King John VI) in 1821. He appointed his son, Dom Pedro, regent in his place. Looking to return Brazil to its formerly dependent colonial status, the Cortes repealed many of the decrees and reforms of King John VI, and demanded Dom Pedros return to Europe.Defying the Cortes, Dom Pedro formed a legislative and constituent assembly on June 3, 1822, and declared Brazils independence on September 7, 1822. He was crowned Brazils first emperor on December 1.(Britannica, 80)Recognition of Brazil as a nation*The United states recognized Brazil as a new nation in 1824.  Portugal followed a year later.(*In 1827, a treaty between Brazil and Britain was signed.  By signing the treaty Brazil agreed to abolish the slave trade within three years, and grant Britain a favored position in its markets in return for Britains recognition of its independence.(Burns, 35)EvolutionsGovernmentSince its independence Brazil has been subject to a lot of internal unrest resulting in several years of military rule and the promulgation of seven different constitutions, the most recent one being passed in 1988.  While political change has been frequent, the social and economic realities in Brazil have remained largely the same.Throughout modern Brazilian history every change of political regime-from the establishment of an independent empire in the early 1820s to the establishment of a modern representative democracy in the late 1980s- has demonstrated the extraordinary capacity of the Brazilian elites to defend the status quo and their own interests by controlling, co-opting and, if necessary, repressing the forces in favor of radical social change... ,(Bethell)  While political and military developments in Europe helped lead to Brazilian independence, it was also partially a result of the Brazilian elites.  The plantation owners backed Pedros declaration of independence because it granted them greater freedom to conduct trade and the opportunity to expand their overseas markets.  The emerging urban elite saw, who occupied an insecure position between plantation owners and slaves saw it as a way to improve their status.(Burns, 30)  Once agreed upon, independence was secured quickly and peacefully, with no concessions being made to the underprivileged groups in society.  The transition from colony to independent empire was characterized by political, economic, and social continuity. (Leslie Bethell)Subsequent governments and constitutions were also largely the result of elite initiatives.Political incorporation and suffrageImperial ConstitutionUnder the Imperial Constitution, power was concentrated in the hands of the hereditary emperor who had the power to appoint ministers, counselers of state, provincial presidents, and the Senate. The Chamber of Deputies was elected by a small segment of the population.  Though the government was only responsible to it in a limited extent.(Despite this, political participation of this period was surprisingly high.  Men who were twenty-five years old (twenty-one if married), Catholic, born free, with quite low annual income had the right to vote in the elections of the Chamber of Deputies.  These elections were however indirect.  They elected eleitores, who were required to have a higher annual income, further restricting electoral participation.  And only the eleitores had the right to vote on the deputies.(The initial rates of high political participation were eventually restricted in the latter parts of the nineteenth century. A gradual shift from slave to free labor, made abolition seem inevitable.  This created a growing fear among  both rural and urban elites that emancipated slaves would acquire the property necessary to secure the right to vote.To quell this fear, the Savaria Law was passed in 1881.  Under this law the Chamber of Deputies would be directly elected, the voting age was lowered to twenty-one, and the property/income qualification to vote was removed.  It also allowed non-Catholics and former slaves to become eligible voters.  Most importantly, it required people to pass a literacy test in order to gain the right to vote.Rather than extend political participation, the literacy tests greatly restricted it because eighty to eighty-five percent of the population at this time was illiterate.  Therefore, this literacy requirement counteracted the other democratic advances of the Savaria Law.(Abolition of slaveryThe Constitution of the Empire and subsequent laws all failed to deem slaves as citizens.  Instead, slaves were still excluded excluded from the political community, from exercise of any political right, from all participation in national soverienty  of public authority. (Chalhoub, 76)  However, the Constitution did allow libertos(freed slaves) to vote in elections, provided that they met the property income requirements.(Despite its promise to Britain to abolish the slave trade within three years of its 1827 treaty, Brazil continued to import slaves up until the 1850s.(Skidmore, 13)  It was only after economic and political conditions permitted, that government initiatives were undertaken to abolish the slaveryNovember 1866: immersed in the of the Triple Alliance and anxious to recruit troops, an Imperial Government decree permits slaves to serve in the army, and in return would be granted their freedom unconditionally.(Skidmore, 15) In 1871, the Law of the Free Womb was passed, which declared that all children subsequently born to slave mothers would be free.  A loop hole allowed the master to refuse the government indemnity payment offered for the child at age 8, and thus, retain the child until 21.(Chalhoub, 81)  The children of slaves who were freed at the age of eight were turned over to the Imperial government and entitled to learn how to read and write in government institutions or through private tutors. However, the masters who opted to retain the children had no obligation to educate them.  This had the effect of excluding them from formal political participation, after their freedom, because of their illiteracy.(Chalhoub, 82)In 1885, the Sexagenarian Law was passed.  This unconditionally freed slaves over sixty.(Skidmore, 38)On May 13, 1888, Princess Isabel, acting in place of her ailing father Pedro II, signed the law that abolished slavery in Brazil, granting no compensation to slave owners.  This freed 700,000 slaves.(Republican constitutionThe entire executive branch (president, state governor, and municipal prefeito) as well as the Senate and the Chamber of Deputies, state assemblies and municipal councils were all elected.  However, fraud, intimidation, violence and the exercise of patronage by local landowners and agents of the grown was widespread. The presidential elections of this period were predetermined by state governors, and state elections were dominated by the Republican parties.  Despite this, and the limitations remaining of suffrage, the early years of the Republic did allow for a substantial advance in direct popular participation in comparison with the late empire.(From Vargas to the military coupThe revolution of 1930 effectively ended the Old Republic, and brought Vargas to power.  He undertook a policy which sought to increase political incorporation within Brazil.  Rather than focus on extending political and economic rights, Vargas focused on the expansion of social rights in an attempt to control the process of economic growth and modernization.(Reis)A 1931 electoral law lowered the voting age to eighteen and granted woman the right to vote, making Brazil the second country in Latin America to do so.  By 1933, the first woman had been elected to the Constituent Assembly.The 1934 Social Charter in the Constitution guaranteed social rights to certain occupations, while neglecting rural labor and certain urban occupations.  This resulted in a hierarchy of citizenship categories based on occupational prestige, defined along the lines of unequal welfare benefits.(Mitchell and Wood)The social rights guaranteed in this charter were closely tied to the urban labor market.  In order to be entitled to health assistance, retirement funds and other welfar benefits it required one to be entered in a formal job contract. This was form of regulated citizenship emerged out of the governments need to control the process of economic growth and modernization. By granting these social rights the government increasingly drew people into the urban labor market, allowing for economic expansion and development.( As a result, the state, under Vargas took the lead in promoting nation-building and industrial growth in Brazil.After a 1945 electoral law was passed, men and women who were formally employed were automatically registered to vote.  This was an attempt to expand political participation among the urban working class, while still largely neglected the rural population.  The same year voting is also made mandatory.The Constitution of 1946 still restricted political participation on the basis of literacy, disenfranchising more than half of the population as a result.An act of Congress in 1950 restored individual responsibility over voter registration.  This restricted the political participation of urban workers, who had previously been automatically registered as a result of their employment.(Military coup of 1964One of the key factors responsible for this military coup was the political mobilization of the rural lower classes. This threatened to undermine a tenet central to the government led  modernization, the exclusion of the lower rural classes from citizenship. As a result, the military took power, inaugurating twenty-one years of military dictatorship, which would be marked by further involvement of the state in economic development and political repression.(To extend political incorporation the regime tried to generalize access to social rights, first by unifying the welfare system, and also by partially extending social rights to rural laborers.  The continuous growth of the labor market helped incorporate people into the citizenship model based on social rights.This increasing concentration of populations in urban centers created a strong demand on public goods and services, which was only exacerbated with the economic crisis of the 1980s.  Further adding to the situation, the growth of urban employment in the informal economy not only restricted access of social rights to this segment of the population, but weakened the tax basis for the welfare state.(  Under these circumstances, the minority with secured jobs and access to social rights essentially became a privileged segment of the population. This only increased the political, social, and economic inequality that characterized Brazil.Democracy1985 saw the return of civilian rule following the election of president Sarney.  Following his elections he passed a series of constitutional amendments which extended suffrage; most notably by removing the literacy requirement that restricted votership.  The municipal elections of 1985 were the first elections in Brazil based on universal suffrage.  The following years the elections of Congress and state governors were also based on universal suffrage. These developments represented an important step towards the institutionalization of democracy in Brazil.(Constitution of 1988The promulgation of a new constitution in 1988, marked the formal shift from a military dictatorship to a democracy in Brazil.(Wheeler)  It was followed in 1989 by the first direct presidential elections in thirty years, and the first presidential elections to based upon universal suffrage.It lifted official barriers to political participation and formally protected political rights.  Like the constitutions before it, it denies status privileges and reaffirms the inviolability of private property and equality of all citizens before the law. It also strengthened the Afonso Arinos Law. Originally passed in 1951, it sought to punish racial discrimination by redefining racist practice as a crime rather than just a misdemeanor.  Under the new constitution it went further, denying bail to those convicted of racial or colour prejudice, and stipulating prison sentences.(The constitution also restricted the power of the military, bolstered individual rights, and implemented means to protect marginalized groups.Racial inequality in BrazilPoverty and inequality are persistent in Brazil, largely as a result the legacy of Portuguese colonialism and its dependence on slave labor.  The social, economic and political development of Brazil only tended to increase inequality, primarily among the non-white population. is clear that the darker a Brazilian, the more likely he is to be found at the bottom of the socio-economic scale by every indicator- income, occupation, education... subtle but unmistakable discrimination in social relations remain... although it has never been codified since the colonial era.(Skidmore)Despite the transition from military dictatorship to democracy in Brazil, there remains a descrepancy between formal principles of the state the actualities of democracy in practice.(inequalities)  The effects of skin color exemplify this fact, often perpetuating the inequalities that universal citizenship claimed to remove.  Within Brazil a large proportion of the population still lack basic citizenship rights, such as access to education. As a result new forms of citizenship are developing independent of state control, like the situation in the favelas.There is a growing social, political, economic and spatial exclusion of people living in informal urban settlements like favelas.(Wheeler, 36)  As the state withdraws from providing social services from these areas, family and social networks step in and fill the gap.  This caused a growing informalization of political activity among these groups, where by these citizens identify their participation in the local community as the core feature of citizenship. They has moved them away from the national discourse of rights based democrativ practices as their definition of citizenship, towards one expressed through specific forms of community participation.(Wheeler, 37)IndiansSince the time of European colonization Indians have been maginalized spatially, politically, and economically.  During the colonial period the policy towards Indians was to exterminate them or to contain them in church settlements.(Allen, 149) From the establishment of the Republic on the state has actively pursued a policy aimed at assimilating these natives groups, and integrate them into Brazilian society.(Allen, 151)See also*of BrazilReferencesFootnotes(Notations*Allen, Elizabeth. Brazil: Indians and the new Constitution. Ethnicity in World Politics. Third World Quarterly Vol. 11, No. 3, October 1989.*Bethell, Leslie. Politics in Brazil: From elections without democracy to democracy without citizenship. Daedalus. Boston: Spring 2000, Vol. 129, Issue 2; pg. 1-27.*Burns, E. Bradford. Nationalism in Brazil: A Historical Survey. Frederick A. Praeger Publishers: 1968.*Chalhoub, Sidney. The Politics of Silence: Race and Citizenship in Nineteenth Century Brazil. Slavery and Abolition, Vol. 27, No. 1, April 2006, pp. 7387. Routledge.*Mitchell, Michael J., Charles H. Wood. Ironies of Citizenship: Skin Color, Police Brutality and the Challenge to Democracy in Brazil. Academic Search Premier. Social Forces, 00377732, March 99, Vol. 77, Issue 3.*Reis, Elisa P. Modernization, citizenship, and stratification: Historical processes and recent changes in Brazil, Daedalus. Boston: Spring 2000, Vol. 129, Iss. 2; pg. 171-95.*Ribero, Darcry. The Brazilian People: The Formation and Meaning of Brazil. Trans. Gregory Rabassa. University of Florida Press:2000.*Skidmore, Thomas E. Black into White: Race and Nationality in Brazilian Thought. Duke University Press, 1993.*Wheeler, Joanna S.  New forms of citizenship: democracy, family, and community in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. Gender and Development, Vol 11, No. 3, November 2003.*Brazil Encyclopdia Britannica. 2007. Encyclopdia Britannica Online.*Brazilian Constitution InfoFurther reading*Bethell, Leslie. Politics in Brazil: From elections without democracy to democracy without citizenship. Daedalus. Boston: Spring 2000, Vol. 129, Issue 2; pg. 1-27.External links*http://www.v-brazil.com/government/laws/constitution.html
14035067
Fictional_African_countries
This is a list of countries that are set somewhere in the continent of Africa.A*Afrinia: African country used in World Bank training exercises () () *Afromacoland: African country in the novel Chief the Honourable Minister by M. Aluko*Azania: African country from Waughs novel MischiefB*Kingdom: from childrens book, a country of intelligent bipedal elephants.*Bangalla: from Phantom comic strip. The Phantoms base lies in the deep woods of this central African nation.*Bapetikosweti: The homeland state in which the South African satirist Pieter-Dirk Uys (under the guise of his drag character, Evita Bezuidenhout) was the South African ambassador.  It is a word-play on the former Bantustan state of Bophuthatswana (unrecognised as a sovereign state by any country other than South Africa).  Bophuthatswana was re-incorporated into South Africa shortly after its first democratic election on 27 April 1994, after which Uys discontinued using his parody state (claiming that Bapetikosweti too had been re-incorporated into South Africa).*Beninia: from John Brunners on Zanzibar*Birani: African nation featured in the film Gods Must Be Crazy. Located near Namibia and Angola. Has a Banana Forest at a place called Dumgase. *Bocamo: a gold-producing white supremacist nation from the Impossible TV episode Kitara. The West African country seemed to be ruled by a settler minority of German descent, and was depicted as brutal practitioner of segregation.  *Bologa: Central African country formerly a British colony from the film Heros Dawn*Bonande: West African country in the film La Nuit de la vrit*Bongo Congo: African kingdom in animated cartoon series Leonardo and His Short Subjects*Bulmeria: an African country mentioned in the webcomic, Walky!*Bulungi: A country located south of dIvoire and southeast of Liberia featured in an article by satirical news group Onion. In the article, the United States ambassador to Bulungi is accused of making the country up. Bulungis capital city is Yabba-Dabba.*Buranda: African country in the BBC comedy series Minister, formerly known as British West AfricaC*Carbombya: country mentioned in the Transformers series*Claw Island: African nation occupying the island of Madagascar as portrayed in a video by Onion about the United States sending USD $3 billion worth of aid to Andorra.E*Kundu: West African republic from the television series The West WingF*Peoples Republic of Fernando Poo: Revolutionary government established by dtat in Illuminatus! TrilogyG*Gamba: African country in the film Only Love*Genosha: an island nation which was established as a mutant homeland in Comics*Ghalea: a small African nation whose pro-Western government is key to stability in the area, from the Impossible episode The Money Machine*Gindra: a small nation in Africa formerly the home of Outer Heaven in Gear: Ghost Babel*City: a city of super-intelligent gorillas in the Comics Universe; In 1999 it became a member of the Nations*Gorotoland: an African republic and site of War conflict in Drurys novel of Honor.*Guadec: African country in an episode of Spooks. Led by reformist President Manu Baffong.I*Interzone: a fictionalized version of Tangier from S. Burroughs Lunch*Ishmaelia: a fictional African country from the novel Scoop by WaughK*Kalao: African country affected by a covered-up industrial accident, Panique*Kalubya: North African country corresponding to the location of Libya in Operation Thunderbolt game*Kalya: West African country in the novel The Zinzin Road by Knebel. Capital city: Ft. Paul.*Kamanga: Southern African country between Namibia and Mozambique in the novel Man Down by Ryan. Capital City: Mulongwe. Kamanga is a former British colony now poverty-stricken, war-torn and suffering from an AIDS epidemic. Its economy seems to depend on diamond mining largely owned by a White African minority, and it uses the Kwacha as its currency. *Kambawe: location of Stoppards play Night and Day*Kambezi: African country occurring in several MacGyver episodes, e.g. Black Rhino*Kangan: African nation in the novel of the Savannah by Achebe*Katanga: African country, neighboring Sierra Leone, in Forsyths The Dogs of War*Kenyopia: belligerent African nation in Spies! TV series attempting to conquer its fictitious neighbor Lyrobia (see below)*Khokarsa: ancient African empire that serves as the primary setting for Jos Farmers Khokarsa series*Kijuju: African country in Resident Evil 5, which is subject to viral experimentation*Kinjanja: African country in the film A Good Man in Africa (1994) starring Connery*Kr: African country in the novel She by Rider Haggard*Kukuanaland: African country in the novel Solomons Mines by Rider Haggard*Kush: African country from Updikes novel The CoupL*Logosia: African country from the Impossible TV episode The Crane *Lombuanda: a small African country on the Gulf of Guinea in the Impossible episode The Diamond*Lyrobia: African nation in Spies! containing desert and rain forest environments, with an Arabic-inspired cultureM*Matobo: a state based on Zimbabwe, from the 2005 film Interpreter. Matobo is also used briefly in Redemption in a scene where an international videoconference take place and on 24 (season 7), where Ule Matobo (fictional) is a former president of Sangala, the fiction African nation.*Maurania: African country in Paradise video game*Moloni Republic: Southern African country from the video game Gear Acid*Mumbambu: African nation occupying the Central and East region as portrayed in a video by Onion about the United States sending USD $3 billion worth of aid to Andorra as it was believe to be south of Mumbambu in Africa, not Europe.N*Nagonia: African country in Semyonovs spy novel TASS Is Authorized to Declare..., and in the film of the same title*Nambabwe: a parody of Namibia (formerly South West Africa) during the time of its UN-supervised independence from South Africa.  A spoof of the transition by the UN peace-keeping forces was the subject of a comedy film by Leon Schuster, Oh Shucks...Here Comes UNTAG.*Natumbe: African country from Dynasty TV series*Nayak: imaginary West African country in the film La Nuit de la vrit*Neranga: new African country featured in a Rumpole story called Rumpole and the Golden Thread by Mortimer*New Zanzibar: featured in Simpsons episode Safari, this country only existed for a few moments between Tanzania and Pepsi Presents New Zanzibar.*Ngombwana: African country depicted in the novel As Hes Painted by Marsh*Nibia: African country in the film Ventura: When Nature Calls*Nyala: African country depicted in the novel Juggernaut by BagleyO*Opar: located deep in the jungles of Africa. Portrayed as a lost colony of Atlantis in Rice Burroughss series of Tarzan novels.*Outer Heaven: fortified microstate founded by a legendary mercenary 200km north of the fictional Galzburg, South AfricaP*Pan-Africa: featured in the Dredd comic book series.*Pepsi Presents New Zanzibar: featured in Simpsons episode Safari, this country came into being after civil war in Tanzania created the country New Zanzibar, which moments later was purchased by Pepsi.S*Sahel: African country from Updikes novel The Coup*Sahelise Republic: African country mentioned in West Wing*Shakobi: African monarchy from So Raven TV series, episode The Royal Treatment*Samgola: a parody of Angola bordering Nambabwe in Schusters film Oh Schucks...Here Comes UNTAG.*Sangala: A nation from Redemption and 24 (season 7) where Bauer comes to after running away from his life.  As a detat takes place, with rebels using brainwashed children as soldiers. The nation is later invaded by the US in season 7.*Sonzola: African republic mentioned in the novels of Brookmyre*Sotho: a kingdom in Africa mentioned in a 1997 episode of the German TV series Kstenwache (note: the name and the royalist form of government seem to refer to the real existing Kingdom of Lesotho - however, in the episode, the King of Sotho comes to Germany to order ships for his coastguard, which would not make any sense for the real Lesotho, since the country is landlocked).T*Talgalla: A fictional African country featured in Brubecks jazz musical Real Ambassadors.*Transvalia: not actually a state in its own right, but rather a parody of the so-called Boerestaat named Orania (which was to be a whites-only homeland that right-wing Afrikaners wished to establish after South Africas transition to democracy on 27 April 1994).  Schuster made a comedy film called Sweet and Short, which was a parody of life in the New South Africa.  Interestingly enough, the film was made in 1990 shortly after Mandela was released from prison - many of the fictional events portrayed therein actually came to pass in post-apartheid South Africa.V*Vagondu: A sub-saharan African country featured in director Odnalor Ladans film, Smoke Before Fire. The current president of Vag!ondu is Stefan Balagot.W*Wakanda: small African nation featured in the Comics series The Avengers. The nation is ruled by King TChalla, also known as the super hero Black Panther. *West Monrassa: Central African country in an episode of Spooks. Run by President Gabriel Sakoa, a corrupt leader planning a genocide against the people in the north of the country.Z*Zambawi: African country from Neates novel Musungu Jim and the Great Chief Tuloko*Zamunda: African monarchy from the Murphy film to America*Zangaro: West African country in the novel The Dogs of War*Zanj: African country from Updikes novel The Coup*Zarakal: West African country from Michael Bishops novel Enemy But Time*Zembala: African country in the film Wild Geese*Zinariya: an African country famous for its copper mines, ruled by a dictator, General Bindiga, in N. Wilsons My Name Is Legion*Zuvendis: African country in Rider Haggards Quatermain containing a lost white race.ReferencesAfrican countries
14055244
Mwana_Africa
Mwana Africa is a mining company based in Johannesburg and London.  According to its website, it is the first African-owned and African-managed business to be listed in the Resources sector of the Stock Exchanges Investment Market.  Mwana was founded in 2005.OperationsMwana Africas products include gold, nickel, copper, zinc, cobalt and, more recently, diamonds and petroleum.  Major mining operation interests as of 2007:By country*Republic of the Congo**Joint Venture - gold**minire de Bakwanga (MIBA) - diamonds**Diamonds**Concessions - copper, cobalt*Ghana**Konongo - gold**Banka - gold**Ahanta - gold*Zimbabwe**Nickel - nickel, copper, cobalt***Smelter and Refinery Complex**Road - nickel**Rebecca Mine - gold**Mine - formerly Mining; gold**Deposit - Companies*SouthernEra Diamonds, of Canada, the Democratic Republic of Congo, Gabon and Africa.Mwana Africa  maintains a corporate office in South Africa; the company is progressively expanding its operations by acquiring extant mining companies.External links*Mwana Africa plc*Google Finance  
14068864
Varanger_Kraft
 international  yesVaranger Kraft is a municipal owned company that operates four hydroelectric power stations producing 420 GWh per year through the subsidiary Pasvik Kraft, operates the grid in the seven owner municipalities in Eastern Finnmark with 3,200 km lines and 16,000 customers, as well as retails power through Barents Energi. Head offices are located in Vads.The company is owned by the minicipalities of Sr-Varanger (31.25%), Vads (21.88%), - Tana (12.50%), Vard (12.5%), Btsfjord (9.38%), Berlevg (6.25%) and Nesseby (6.25%). It operates the power grid in the same municipalities. The four power stations are Gandvik, Melkefoss, Skogfoss and Kongsfjord.HistoryThe company dates back to 1938. It was made a limited company in 1994, and in 2000 it bought the defunct mining company Sydvaranger, that it later sold to Group. In 2003 the company was transformed to a corporate model.
14080884
Quad_Cities_(Minnesota)
The Quad Cities in the U.S. state of Minnesota consist of the cities of Virginia, Eveleth, Gilbert, and Mountain Iron; located in the Region, overlapping Range region, and St. Louis County.U.S. Highway 53, U.S. Highway 169, State Highway 37, and State Highway 135 are four of the main arterial routes in the communities.HistoryThe Quad Cities, all founded in the 1890s and early 1900s, owe their existence mainly to the mining industry that came to the area around that time. Their prosperity grew as the mines grew. Unfortunately, many of the mines shut down during the Depression and didnt resume full work until World War II. This was approximately the peak point for the industry in the area. Slowly the cities, though increasing in area, decreased in population.PopulationsAccording to the 2000 census, the Quad Cities have a population of 17,868. Virginia has 9,157 residents. Eveleth has 3,865 residents; Mountain Iron has 2,999 residents; and Gilbert has 1,847 residents. Recent estimates of the 2010 census have declared that Virginia alone has lost about seven percent of its total population, the other cities expected to lose too.Economy and industryThe mining industry, long lasting since the early 1900s, is slowing declining production in the area. Minntac, one of the worlds largest mine employees in numbers, have only a fraction of the people working than they had fifty years ago. The area focuses a lot on tourism and healthcare, the two now largest employers in the area.Things to doVirginia and the surrounding cities have several things for public enjoyment, from swimming to shopping. Various lakes and pits across the range make swimming and boating very accessible. There is bound to be a hiking, biking, or four wheeling trail wherever you are on the Iron Range. For the winter months, there are several snowmobiling trails around the area with easy access and ice rinks all over the cities. For those that crave an indoor atmosphere, there is the YMCA in Mountain Iron, for many recreational purposes. For shoppers, there is the Thunderbird Mall in Virginia, downtown businesses in each city, and plans to create a shopping strip mall near the fairly new Holiday Inn Express & Suites in Mountain Iron.ReferencesSource: LaurentianChamber.org -- accessed Nov. 25, 2007
14092723
James_Brogden_(industrialist)
James Brogden (7 April 1832, Manchester  25 January 1907, Porthcawl)) was a British businessman, the fourth son of John Brogden (1798&ndash;1869). He spent most of his adult life in Mid-Glamorgan, first at Tondu and later at Porthcawl. He was the junior partner in Brogden and Sons. In 1853/4, Brogdens bought the iron and coal mining business at Tondu, Mid-Glamorgan of Sir Robert Price. Price had got into difficulties during recessions in the iron trade in the 1840s. In February 1854, John Brogden sent his son James, then aged 22, to revive and run the business, which was very run down. In July 1854, John Brogden signed a new 99 year lease with Jane Nicholl. James rapidly reorganised the works and established his home at Tondu House, which he rebuilt. In the 1861 census, James said he was employing 900 men and farming  with 20 men.()In September 1859, James married Helen Dunbar Milne, a granddaughter of Lady Helen Dunbar of Wells, in Georges, Hanover Square. At first, the marriage was happy but in February 1864 an affair began between Helen and John Popkin Traherne, who lived at Coytrahen House. Brogden petitioned for a divorce in February 1865 and this was granted.  When John Brogden Senior died in December 1869, Alexander assumed his fathers position as head of John Brogden and Sons and came to Tondu to assume control. He took a lease on Coytrahen House  where Mrs Brogden had committed adultery - even though James had offered to vacate Tondu House for his use. This hurt James terribly and created a rift, which was bad for the family and bad for the business.(See Letter JB to AB deposited at Library of Wales in Picton Papers (Brogden Papers)) This decision made it difficult to maintain the cordial relationship necessary to manage the business.( http://www.brogden.info/Brogden-Brogden-John-Brogden&Sons.htm)James went out to Zealand on behalf of the family firm to negotiate the contracts with the government to build railways using emigrants from the UK. He left Liverpool in August 1871 and returned to England early in 1873. The diary(Library of Wales Picton Papers (Brogden No. 1) Online) that he kept during his journey shows that he was engaged in very difficult and protracted negotiations. In 1874 shortly after his return, James married as his second wife Mary Caroline Beete, daughter of John Picton Beete, a nephew of Gen. Sir Thomas Picton. While James was in New Zealand, Alexander had taken control of the South Wales business, forming a new company, the Llynvi, Tondu and Ogmore Coal and Iron Company. As he was no longer required at Tondu, James made his new home in Porthcawl. After the dissolution of John Brogden and Sons, Mrs Brogden purchased approximately  adjoining the new Porthcawl dock that her husband had bought for the company in 1865, and by the end of the century, she had developed the early stages of the modern town of Porthcawl. In 1906, however, the Western Railway that then owned the dock, closed it because its trade had been diverted to newer docks at Talbot and Barry. This reduced the value of her properties, which were heavily mortgaged. This hastened Jamess death, which occurred at his home, the Esplanade Hotel, on the 25 January 1907.(Afterwards, most of Mrs Brogdens  property had to be sold and she moved to 72 Victoria Avenue where she died on 5 November 1927..( Notes  and References 
14117337
JCI_Limited
JCI or Johannesburg Consolidated Investment Co. Ltd. was founded in 1889 by the British entrepreneur Barnato. JCI was a major force in South African mining for over 100 years. Using his investments in the diamond fields, particularly his 25% share in Beers, Barnato foresaw the value of and invested in the potential of the Witwatersrand gold mines. At first he bought small but rich mines near Germiston  the New Primrose, named after his daughter, and others in the same region. In 1913 JCI bought the Randfontein Estates Gold Mining Company, which was a fabulously rich mine, from Sir J.B. Robinson. At the peak of its production Randfontein was equipped with 600 mills, the roar of which could be heard in Johannesburg. Randfontein Estates was an extraordinarily rich mining property, and in the 1950s was a pioneer of uranium production. During the 1930s Randfontein was the largest gold producer in South Africa, if not the world.JCI was also involved with numerous mining ventures  State Mines at Brakpan, Deep Mines at Benoni, Dyk Mines at Benoni. In the 1960s Randfontein was virtually closed down, and mining was developed at Western Areas on the other side of the shallow valley, but in the 1970s new deposits were discovered to the south of Randfontein and the Cooke Section was opened up in 1976. Cooke produced gold and uranium, the uranium being destined for the Nuclear Power Station fuel.  In addition to the gold mines, 25% of De Beers and a interest in Platinum Holdings, the worlds largest platinum producer, JCI owned large industrial and property holdings, including the Houghton Estate in northern Johannesburg, and substantial shareholdings in Breweries, South Africa, Industrial, etc, and was long a target of developers who lusted after the property holdings. American Corporation purchased a 52% holding in JCI, agreeing to protect the company against predatory takeovers, and this situation continued until 1994.JCI installed a technically advanced Precious Metals Refinery at Rustenburg, which processed Platinum Group metals totally in South Africa, and built a ferrochrome smelter at Lydenburg which was the first in South Africa to directly smelt chromite fine ore. In the late 1980s JCI started development of an ultra deep mine to the south of Western Areas, Deep. The ownership of South Deep has now devolved to Goldfields, and is still being developed as one of the largest low grade gold deposits in the world.In 1995 the majority shareholder, Anglo American Corp, decided to offer JCI to the new political dispensation in South Africa as a Economic Empowerment vehicle. A new Chairman, Khumalo, took over the mining side, whilst the property and investment side was separated and morphed into Communications. The platinum interests were moved into American Platinum, Amplats.JCI was always at the forefront of technical development  trackless mining, ferrochrome processing (CMI, Lydenburg), computer control of process plants, treatment of refractory gold ores  to name a few areas where pioneering work was done.Alleged FraudIt has been alleged by Four Corners that Kebble, John Stratton, and others in their roles as Chairman and directors of the company respectively defrauded and conspired to defraud the company of some 7.6 billion rand.  Additionally, it was alleged that John Stratton then procured Brett Kebbles murder, with which Agliotti has been charged.In August 2010, an American company Hemispherx was awarded $188 Million Judgment Against JCI by Court in Miami, alleging that JCI wrongly obtained confidential information as part of an effort to devalue Hemispherxs stock price and gain control, according to court papers. References* company page* Four Corners Bad Company transcript* Four Corners Bad Company references*  Bloomberg article on court case against JCI
14155532
Blue_Spur
In Zealand there are two geographic areas called Blue Spur.The first one is situated close to the District Capital of Hokitika. It stretches from the Sea in the west about  eastwards towards the area of Humphreys and the Blue Spur Range.(Blue Spur States) It can be accessed by road along the Blue Spur Tourist Drive from the center of Hokitika. During the 1860s, the time of the New Zealand rush, The Spur (as the locals always called it) was inhabited by more than 2,500 people. There was a school, several hotels, busy bars and a theater. Since around the year 2000 the area is gradually being rediscovered (and repopulated) as it offers rural living close to town. The second place named Blue Spur is the area of the historic gold rush town and gold mining fields near Lawrence, Otago, New Zealand.(Lawrence)The etymology of the term blue spur not well known. The gold diggers of the 1860s gold rush went after the gold on the spur, i.e. in a great hurry/rush. Alluvial gold may often be found close to a layer of blueish clay. Miners frequently talk about mining down to the blue clay, thus a blue spur could somehow elucidate the hasty process of digging for the gold pursuing a blueish layer of clay. Other potential meanings could refer to a blueish color of mountains (blue mountains) as it can be spotted in certain light at distant mountains at both locations. Besides these gold rush related connotations we know about a blue spur flower,(Daves Garden) and the blue spur in coats of arms.(Red Flag)References
14168168
Sonic_Studio
Sonic Studio is an American company manufacturing digital audio production tools for engineering professionals. The company was created when Solutions divested itself of its audio product lines in order to concentrate on DVD and multimediaoriented products. History  Overview Under the auspices of Sonic Solutions, the Sonic Studio audio workstation has driven the professional production and delivery of commercial Compact Discs. The original Sonic System pioneered the desktop delivery of Red Book masters on recordable CD, in the same way that the original Macintosh and LaserWriter spawned the publishing revolution. Prior to the introduction of the Sonic System, Compact Disc were assembled and premastered using bulky, expensive and unreliable U-matic videotapebased systems. Early years The Sonic System began life as research into realtime, computerbased audio production. The Signal Processor (or ASP) hardwarebased audio signal processor, designed by A. Moorer, after work on the Hydra audio project at Stanford Universitys CCRMA, was a proof of concept for what is now considered a audio workstation. The ASPs design (Rubin 2005, pp. 198) started life in 1980 and was designed primarily for realtime, multichannel EQ and mixing. SoundDroid (Rubin 2005, pp. 444&ndash;446), an inhouse project of Lucasfilm Ltd.s Sprocket Systems that was later spun off as part of Droid Works, was a hard diskbased, nonlinear, second generation digital audio workstation that leveraged the research done on the ASP. Though the SoundDroid project was never commercialized and The Droid Works was later sold to Avid, the audio development team went on to first create the NoNOISE restoration system in 1987, hosted on a Motorolapowered SUN 1 (Rubin 2005, pp. 435), the first true, general purpose computer workstation, which had been developed in cooperation with Lucasfilm  (Rubin 2005, pp. 168&ndash;169). The SUN ran UNIX, developed by Labs and refined at UC Berkeley. Sonic Studios current flagship product run on Mac OS, a modern version of that same UNIX variant, BSD Unix, that powered the original SUN workstation.After evaluating the cost and complexity of their SUNs, the Sonic team decided to tap a new platform, Apple Computers II, also powered by a Motorola 68000, to create the first production version of the Sonic Station later that year.(http://mixonline.com/TECnology-Hall-of-Fame/sonic-solutions-nonoise-090106) By 1988, the Sonic Station was in service at EMI Abbey Road and Finesplice in London, and MCA in California, performing miraculous feats of restoration and starting a trend of mining back catalog that continues to this day. That first system employed a dedicated NuBus hardware coprocessor, with 4 Motorola 56000series Digital Signal Processors (DSP), beginning a trend that continued through seven generations of hardware.Demand grew for a turnkey Compact Disc preparation system and, in 1990 with the addition of the worlds first CD-R product, Sonys $30,000, two piece, E-1/W-1 Compact Disc-Recordable system in conjunction with START Labs new media, the complete Sonic System was born. After a few years of development, the product was renamed SonicStudio and development continues to this day. Present day In 2002, Sonic Solutions decided to divest themselves of their original audio product line. To concentrate solely on the DVD content creation market, they formed a joint venture and, in 2004, that business was transferred to Big Endian, LLC to carry on the development, sales, and support of Sonic Solutions audio workstation products.Based in San Anselmo California, Sonic Studio, LLC continues to manufacture products that address the needs of the worlds most discriminating audio professionals with powerful PCM and DSD origination, editing and processing capabilities, and integrated premastering for both CD, SACD and rich media distribution. Sonic Studios NoNOISE noise and distortion reduction tools and streamlined workflow have allowed the product lines to remain at the forefront of restoration for DVD postproduction and archival rerelease. Pioneering work Over the years, development of the product lines have resulted in many breakthroughs now considered commonplace in the professional audio community. Some of the features and technologies brought to the pro audio market by Sonic Studios forbearers include:* graphical digital waveform displays (Rubin 2005, pp. 444)* 24 bit AES digital I/O* SDIF-2 digital I/O* 4point editing model, borrowed from videotape editing paradigm* integrated, 9 pin machine control* integrated digital restoration tools* mutlitasking DSP* integrated desktop CD preparation* the PreMaster CD delivery format* ultrahigh speed data network with multiuser, filelevel read/write (Anderson 1993)* 96 kHz & 192 kHz, single and double wire AES I/O support* double precision internal signal processing (Moorer 1999)* integrated DVD-Audio & SACD production (Moorer 1998)ReferencesNotations* Moorer, James A; (1982). The Audio Signal Processor: The Next Step in Digital Audio. New York: Audio Engineering Society. Preprint Number: Rye-020* Moorer, James A.; Borish, Jeffrey; Snell, John; (1985). A Gate-Array Multiplier for Digital Audio Processing. New York: Audio Engineering Society. Preprint Number: 2243* Moorer, James A.; Borish, Jeffrey; (1986). An Optical Disk Recording, Archiving, and Editing Device for Digital Audio Signal Processing. New York: Audio Engineering Society. Preprint Number: 2376* Lawrence M. Fisher; (1988). Removing the Static From Old Recordings. The New York Times* Cumming, David P.; Moorer, James A.; Ogawa, H.; Ishiguro, T.; Nakajima, Hisashi; (1990). CD Mastering Using a Recordable -Red Book Standard- CD and Graphical PQ Subcode Editing. New York: Audio Engineering Society. Preprint Number: 3006* Reichbach, Jonathan D.; Kemmerer, Richard A.; (1992). SoundWorks: An Object-Oriented Distributed System for Digital Sound. New York: IEEE. 0018-9162/92/0300-0025* * Moorer, James A; (1996). Breaking the Sound Barrier: Mastering at 96 kHz and Beyond. New York: Audio Engineering Society. Preprint Number: 4357* TECnology Hall of Fame; (1997). 1997 TEC Awards. Penton Media Inc. Mix Magazine* * * Jacobson, Linda; (2004). Silicon Audio. Penton Media Inc. Mix Magazine* * TECnology Hall of Fame; (2006). 1987 Sonic Solutions NoNoise. Penton Media Inc. Mix Magazine External links * Web site* Resume of Dr. J.A. Moorer
14175839
1813_in_Wales
This article is about the particular significance of the year 1813 to Wales and its people. Incumbents*of Wales - George, Prince Regent *of Wales - of Brunswick Events*January - Sir Joseph Bailey sells his 25% share in Cyfarthfa ironworks for 20,000.*April - Price (Carnhuanawc) moves to Crickhowell to take over several parishes in the vicinity.*November - Sir Homfray is forced to sell his house at Cwm Rhondda to settle his debts.*Hill and his two brothers go into partnership at the Plymouth ironworks.*The Branwen ferch Llr sepulchral urn is discovered on the banks of the river Alaw in Anglesey (later placed in the British Museum by Llwyd). *The first permanent military barracks in Wales are opened at Brecon.*An Independent minister, David Davies, is forced to leave his teaching post at Academy after charges of immorality are made against him.*Daniel Davis is appointed a physician at Queen Charlottes Hospital in London.*James Apperley becomes agent for his brother-in-laws estates in Caernarvonshire, taking up residence at T Gwyn, Llanbeblig.*Barham, Baroness Barham, settles in Gower.*Charles of Bala publishes his rules for the conduct of Sunday schools.*Richard Parry Price, heir to the Puleston estates, is created a baronet.*Waring founds a new periodical, The Cambrian Visitor: a Monthly Miscellany, which fails after eight months.Arts and literatureNew books*Hugh Davies - Welsh Botanology  A Systematic Catalogue of the Native Plants of Anglesey, in Latin, English, and Welsh*Davies (Gwallter Mechain) - General View of the Agriculture and Domestic Economy of North Wales*William Owen - Lloffion o Faes Boaz*Williams (Gwilym Peris) - Awengerdd PerisMusic*Births*30 - Prideaux Tregelles, Biblical scholar (d. 1875)*2 - Jones, industrialist (d. 1880)*30 - Briscoe, translator (d. 1895)*1 - Ambrose (Emrys), poet (d. 1873)*12 - Daniel Jones, missionary (d. 1846)*10 - William Adams, mining engineer (d. 1886)*date unknown - Edwards (Meiriadog), poet (d. 1906)Deaths*23 - Augusta of Great Britain, daughter of Prince of Wales and mother of Caroline, later Princess of Wales (b. 1737)*17 - Edwards (Yr Hwntw Mawr), murderer*11 (or 12) - John Price, librarian, 78*date unknown - Cave, poet (b. 1754)
14200426
Williston_Basin
thumb|North America showing position of Williston Basinthumb|Location of Williston Basin (USGS)The Williston Basin is a large intracratonic sedimentary basin in eastern Montana, western North and Dakota, and southern Saskatchewan known for its rich deposits of petroleum and potash. The basin is a geologic basin but not a topographic depression; it is transected by the River. The oval-shaped depression extends approximately  north-south and  east-west.The Williston Basin lies above an ancient Precambrian geologic basement feature, the Trans-Hudson Orogenic Belt that developed in this area about 1.8-1.9 billion years ago, and that created a weak zone that later led to sagging to produce the basin.(Gibson, R.I., 1995, Basement tectonics and hydrocarbon production in the Williston Basin: An interpretive overview: 7th Intl. Williston Basin Symposium, 1995 Guidebook, p. 3-11) The Precambrian basement rocks in the center of the basin beneath the town of North Dakota lie about  below the surface.thumb|Stratigraphic chart showing 12 hydrocarbon source beds and 15 reservoir rocks in the Williston BasinDeposition of sediments began in the Williston area during Cambrian time, but subsidence and basin filling were most intense during the Ordovician, Silurian, and Devonian Periods, when thick accumulations of limestone and dolomite, with lesser thicknesses of sandstones, siltsones, shales, and evaporites were laid down. Subsidence continued on a reduced scale into the Mississippian and was largely ended by Pennsylvanian time. Regional subsidence returned during the Mesozoic Era, although total sediment thicknesses were much less than during the Paleozoic. Near the end of the Cretaceous, tectonic activity during the Orogeny rejuvenated several basement structures in the Williston Basin to produce anticlines that serve as oil traps today. (Geologic Atlas of the Rocky Mountain Region, Rocky Mountain Association of Geologists, Denver, CO, 1972: p. 81-85, 88-89, 94-97, 168, 184)Natural resourcesPetroleumImage:WillistonoilproductionDOE.jpg|thumb|Annual oil production in the US part of the Williston Basin (NDNorth Dakota, SDSouth Dakota, MTMontana)( Oil production chart source)The long history of sedimentary deposition in the Williston Basin included deposition of rocks well suited to serve as hydrocarbon source and reservoir rocks. The basins oil and gas fields are found in a wide range of geologic ages, as indicated by the generalized stratigraphic column.(Peterson, J., Williston Basin Province, in U. S. Geological Survey 1995 National Assessment of United States Oil and Gas Resources, Digital Data Series DDS-30, Release 2, CD-ROM)Oil was first found in the Williston Basin along the Creek Anticline in southeastern Montana, in the 1920s and 1930s.( Oil Exploration History of Williston Basin) The basin did not become a major oil province until the 1950s when large fields were discovered in North Dakota. Production peaked in 1986, but in the early 2000s significant increases in production began because of application of drilling techniques, especially in the Formation. (Diagenesis and Fracture Development in the Bakken Formation, Williston Basin: Implications for Reservoir Quality in the Middle Member, by Janet K. Pitman, Leigh C. Price, and Julie A. LeFever, U.S. Geological Survey Professional Paper 1653, 2001)Cumulative basin production totals about  of oil(Cumulative oil production) and  of natural gas(Cumulative gas production).  The largest oil fields are listed in the following table, showing estimated ultimate recoveries.(PotashPotash produced from the Williston Basin makes Canada the worlds leading producer of that commodity.(S.M. Jasinski, Potash, Mining Engineering, June 2010, p.69-70.)  Major potash-producing companies include the Corporation of Saskatchewan.CoalThe Williston Basin holds large coal deposits, primarily in the Union Formation of mostly Paleogene age. References 
14227524
Eldev_Coal_Mine
Eldev Coal Mine () is  in Dalanjargalan sum (district) of Province in South-Eastern Mongolia. This mine is 21 km N from sum center (Olon Ovoo railway station of the Railway) and 300 km SE of Mongolian capital Bator.Eldev mine is operated by Mongolyn Alt Corporation LLC, a domestic coal producer of Mongolia. Annual production rate is 0.5 million mt of bituminous coal marketed domestically and abroad to China via railroad. Major customers of the Eldev coal mine in Mongolia:- Erdenet Mining Corporation- Khutul Cement & Lime Plant- Darkhan Metallurgical Plant- Ulaanbaatar Railway JV, an operator of the Trans-Mongolian Railway- Darkhan City Power PlantReferencesEldev Coal Mine owners web site
14240996
Business_Intelligence_Development_Studio
Business Intelligence Development Studio (BIDS) is the IDE from Microsoft used for developing data analysis and Intelligence solutions utilizing the SQL Server Analysis Services, Reporting Services and Integration Services. It is based on the Visual Studio development environment but customizes with the SQL Server services-specific extensions and project types, including tools, controls and projects for reports, ETL dataflows, cubes and mining structure.External links*Introducing Business Intelligence Development Studio
14251224
James,_Ontario
footnotes                James is a township in the Canadian province of Ontario, located within the Timiskaming District. The primary community within the township is Elk Lake, which is located at the junction of Highway 65 and Highway 560.The township had a population of 414 in the 2006 Census.(Canada 2006 Census: Community Profiles)HistoryElk Lake began as a mining boom town when native silver was discovered in James Township in 1906. Mining activity peaked between 1907 and 1913, when there were about thirty active mining properties in the area. The population at one point reached almost 10,000 people. By 1908 the town included six large hotels, many stores, warehouses, banks, lawyers offices, a post office, a hospital and a Mining Recorders Office. The town of Elk Lake was incorporated in 1909 as the Corporation of the Township of James. The Townships first Reeve was the famous athlete and prospector Jack Monroe.Access to Elk Lake was initially only by motorboat via Heather River. By 1909 the road from Elk Lake to Charlton could be traversed by coach, although commercial steamers on the Montreal River continued to provide summer access from Latchford for most heavy equipment and freight. The steamboat era on the Montreal River lasted only a few years, ending when a branch of the Temiskaming and Northern Ontario Railway was built into Elk Lake in 1913.Commercial logging in the Temiskaming area dates back to the 1840s. In 1905, the Montreal River Pulp Concession, an area of , was sold to J.R. Booth. From 1907 to 1923, Booth maintained a large pulpwood depot in Elk Lake. In the spring of 1930, Booth completed the last log drive on the Montreal River shortly after he sold his local interest to the E.B. Eddy Company.Today, Elk Lakes economy continues to be driven by a sustainable forest industry. The town also boasts a significant number of tourist camps and lodges offering excellent packages for the outdoor sports and nature enthusiasts.(History of Elk Lake)The Makobe River Provincial Park protects the Makobe River. This popular whitewater canoeing route flows into the Montreal River at Elk Lake.DemographicsPopulation:(Statistics Canada: 1996, 2001, 2006 census)* Population in 2006: 414 (2001 to 2006 population change: -11.3 %)* Population in 2001: 467* Population in 1996: 483* Population in 1991: 524Private dwellings, excluding seasonal cottages: 177 (total: 221)Mother tongue:* English as first language: 49.4 %* French as first language: 45.8 %* English and French as first language: 2.4 %* Other as first language: 2.4 %Art and literatureCanadian songwriter Hayden Desser has recorded an album entitled Serenade.ReferencesExternal links* Township of James* Friends of Temagami
14276392
List_of_games_in_Star_Trek
The fictional Trek universe is memorable for various elements of imagined future culture, including a variety of sports, games and other pastimes. Some of these fictional recreational activities are closely associated with one race, although they may have gained adherents from other backgrounds. Others thrive on the interaction of different species.Some of the games below were central to the plot of a single episode. Others were recurring plot elements, spanning multiple television series of the Star Trek franchise.Holodeck gamesThe holodeck is a facility that simulates reality; it can replicate a wide variety of environments. It is found on starships and starbases in all the series that are set in the 24th century, i.e. Trek: The Next Generation, Trek: Deep Space Nine and Trek: Voyager. The holodeck is sometimes used for research or training, but is frequently shown in use for various forms of entertainment.Some programs depicted in the various Star Trek shows include a Klingon calisthenics program, used heavily by Lieutenant Commander Worf; a park-like setting where Riker first encounters Data in at Farpoint; various social programs, such as a mud-bath and a pool hall; and Picards Hill holonovels.Other settings have sometimes been shown, such as the Jupiter Station Diagnostic Program which was used to maintain the Emergency Medical Hologram on various Starfleet vessels, the Planitia Shipyards, several Holmes programs created by Data for his exploration of humanity, and various Shakespeare programs enjoyed by Picard.In Voyager, an entire holographic village and its population were created. The Fair Haven program was originally designed for occasional enjoyment by the crew of Voyager, but the characters become sentient by the time of the follow-up episode Spirit Folk, and the captain orders that the holodecks be modified so that the program could remain running continuously.Also in Voyager, Seven of Nine is continuously frustrated by Captain Janeways superior skill at Velocity, a game played in a racquetball-type arena where opponents try to be the first to acquire the target of a flying discus and shoot it. The game is scored in points. Each time a player is unable to acquire the disc and is hit by it the other player scores a point. The game is played to ten points.SportsBaseballAccording to the history presented in Star Trek, the Earth game baseball suffered from a decline in popularity that culminated in the final Series, which was played in 2042 before a crowd of 300 and won by legendary player Buck Bokai.(Wishes Were Horses (Star Trek: Deep Space Nine episode)) By the 24th century, the now-obscure game was appreciated by a relatively small number of aficionados including Captain Sisko, Sisko and Yates. The only organized baseball mentioned is a six-team league on the distant Cestus III.(Business (Star Trek: Deep Space Nine))  A Vulcan Starfleet crew formed a team under the leadership of their captain and challenged a team led by Captain Sisko in 2375.(Me Out to the Holosuite (Star Trek: Deep Space Nine episode))Parrises SquaresParrises Squares is a vigorous athletic game, mentioned in several episodes of Star Trek: The Next Generation and Voyager.It is often implied that the game involves a high risk of serious personal injury; nevertheless, much to the concern of parents, the game was quite popular with teenagers during the 24th century. The game involves the use of a piece of equipment called an ion mallet and a ramp, and players often wear special padded uniforms.(Imperfect (Star Trek: The Next Generation episode))While healing a deep cut on Rikers face, Dr. Crusher lectured him to stop playing Parrises Squares as if youre 21, further advising him that one day, youll break your neck, and I wont be able to heal that as easily.((Star Trek: The Next Generation))When The Doctor created a holographic family for himself in 2373, his daughter Belle was on her schools Parrises Squares team. This worried her parents, because Parrises Squares can be a dangerous game for someone her age. It later turned out their worries were justified, as she later died of complications from a Parrises Squares injury.(Life (Star Trek: Voyager))While in Starfleet Academy, Harry Kim played Parrises Squares, and was the Academy champion three times.(Tsunkatse (Star Trek: Voyager episode))Parrises Squares is mainly mentioned as a game played by humans, but other species participate. MKota RCho was the first Klingon to play the game, when he participated in the controversial Championship Finals of 2342.(of Hell (Star Trek: Voyager episode))RacquetballRacquetball is a game played inside a room where the players use racquets to hit a small ball. In Trek: Deep Space Nine, Miles OBrien and Bashir enjoy the sport.Water PoloCaptain Jonathan Archer (Star Trek: Enterprise) enjoys water polo and played when he was on Earth. In the episode Catwalk, he is seen watching a water polo match on a portable viewing device while trying to fall asleep. He is also seen on several occasions bouncing a water polo ball off the wall in his quarters.BasketballIn one episode of Star Trek: Enterprise, most of the crew is briefly seen playing basketball.DartsOBrien and Bashir are frequently seen playing darts at Quarks bar in DS9. Martial artsGladiatorial combatIn the memorable original series episode Gamesters of Triskelion, Captain Kirk and some of his crew are forced to participate as gladiators in combat against other humanoids, for the entertainment of unseen masters who wager Quatloos among themselves on the outcome in the arena.Anbo-jitsuAnbo-Jitsu (or anbo-jyutsu) is a fictitious Japanese sport shown in Trek: The Next Generation. In it, two armored opponents facing each other wear a solid visor, rendering them blind, and fight with a large staff. A proximity sensor is worn by each combatant, alerting them to their opponents location with an audio signal. A protective cushion is worn on one arm and can be used to shield or deflect attacks. It is called the ultimate evolution in the martial arts in the context of the show.Riker and his father settled a long-standing grudge with this game in the episode Icarus Factor.TsunkatseTsunkatse is a form of martial arts, similar to kickboxing and some Japanese sports. Each opponent wears a round device on both the front and back of their harness which sends the wearer a shock when it is touched by an opponents counterpart, worn on the feet and hands. Each match is designated by a color code, red meaning to the death, blue meaning until one opponent is defeated.The sport is practised by various species in the Delta Quadrant. In the Voyager episode of the same name, of Nine was kidnapped and forced to compete in the sport.FencingCaptain Jean-Luc Picard engages in fencing matches on at least two occasions. First, in the episode Always Have Paris, Picard is in a match against an un-named crew member.  Picard scores a point, and then the match is cut short because of a strange time loop (which serves as the plot for the main story). Second, he matches against Guinan in the episode Borg. Guinan feigns injury and Picard lowers his guard to help, at which time she strikes for an easy point. She does this to warn Picard against feeling sorry for the injured Borg that the crew has saved (which serves as the plot for the main story).Sulu in the original series is known to be a fencer, as demonstrated in the episode Naked Time. In the 2009 movie, Sulu mentions he has combat training, which he later tells Kirk is Fencing. He carries a auto-foldout sword during the space jump to the mining probe over Vulcan.Games of chanceDaboDabo is a Ferengi game of skill and chance. The game relies on the spinning of a dabo wheel similar to a roulette wheel. During various betting hands (similar to poker) each player either buys or sells or converts their gold-pressed latinum (money) in preparation for the next spin of the dabo wheel.About ten players can sit around the dabo wheel. When something good happens, everyone around the table yells Dabo!The game is most often seen played in Quarks bar on Deep Space Nine.Dabo girlsDabo girls are attractive women of various species who run the games in Ferengi establishments. Leeta, who was a Dabo girl in Quarks bar, maintained that Dabo girls not only had to look appealing enough to lure customers to play, but also be able to quickly calculate odds and ensure a house victory in the long run, typically by enticing gamers to stay until they lose.The character therefore turns around the stereotype of the blonde or bimbo; while Dabo girls may be intentionally giving that impression to customers, they take advantage of those who view a Dabo girl as no more than that. One was quoted as saying The first rule of Dabo is watch the wheel, not the girlThe character Leeta, played by Masterson, made the role of Dabo girl significant in Star Trek fandom. Other Dabo girls who appeared or were referred to in multiple episodes include Siskos date Mardah, played by Jill Sayre, and MPella, played by Cathy Debuono. Aluura, played by Symba Smith, had a central role in the episode and Lace.In the non-canon Star Trek novel series Mission Gamma, Treir, one of Quarks dabo girls, hires Hetik, an Orion male, as the first ever dabo boy in the games history. Quark is initially dubious about the introduction of a dabo boy, but Hetik soon becomes popular among female patrons.TongoTongo is a game played predominantly by the Ferengi. The game centers around a roulette-type wheel with an elevated pot in the middle. On each turn the wheel is spun, and the player has the choice to evade, confront, acquire, or retreat. Each choice has its purchase price, sell price, and its risk, all of which are interrelated.A Global Tongo Championship is held each year on Ferenginar.PokerPoker is a game played on many TNG episodes. The Enterprises crew (NCC 1701-D) plays dealers choice, usually five-card stud, which is one of the more rare variants of poker by 20th and 21st century standards. Draws have also been picked as well as an unknown variation on 5 card stud, as well as 7 card stud. Commander Riker is typically the better poker player.FizzbinFizzbin is a fictional card game created by Kirk in the Original Series episode A Piece of the Action. While being held hostage on Sigma Iota II with Spock and McCoy, he spontaneously invented a confusing card game to distract the henchmen guarding them.The rules were intentionally very complex. Each player gets six cards, except for the player on the dealers right, who gets seven. The second card is turned up, except on Tuesdays. Kirk dealt the henchman two jacks, which are a half-fizzbin. When the henchman said he needs another jack, Kirk warned that a third jack is a shralk and is grounds for disqualification. With two jacks, one wants a king and a deuce, except at night, when one wants a queen and a four.At this point, Kirk dealt a third jack, but to keep the ruse going, he ignored the disqualification rule he had just made up. He explained that, had a king been dealt instead of a jack, the player would get another card, except when its dark, in which case hed have to give it back. The top hand is a royal fizzbin, but the odds of getting one are astronomical: when Kirk asked Spock what the odds are, Spock truthfully replied that he had never computed them.Kirk called the last card a kronk and then purposely dealt a card such that it fell on the floor. As the henchman being taught reached down, Spock nerve-pinched him while Kirk and McCoy attacked the other guards, allowing the three to escape.Once in Deep Space Nine, Quark mentioned the game as a way for him and Odo to while away the time while traveling on a runabout;(Ascent (Star Trek: Deep Space Nine)) whether it had become a real game or if it had been a reference was never explained. Playable versions of the game have been invented, and it featured in the episode Nantucket Sleighride of the animated series Starcom.In the iCarly movie with Victorious, Puckett threatens to give Carlys boyfriend a royal fizzbin (presumably something like a Texas wedgie.)See also: Mornington CrescentGames of strategy and logicDom-jotDom-jot was featured in the episode Tapestry, and mentioned in DS9 as a game for hustlers. It appears to be a futuristic version of pool. Jean-Luc Picard (as a Starfleet cadet) was stabbed in the heart by a Nausicaan after a fight that ensued because his friend rigged a Dom-jot table to thwart a cheating Nausicaan.Kadis-kotKadis-kot is a game played on a six-sided board with three sets of coloured tiles: red, green, and orange. Visually, the game appears to be a variant of Reversi or Othello. It appears to be a game of logic and strategy for 2 players, but as many as 5 players have been shown playing together.The characters of Wildman and of Nine played the game sometimes, after the events of the episode Regress.Kal-tohKal-Toh (kal-toe) is a Vulcan game of logic. According to Tuvok, Kal-Toh is to chess as chess is to Tic-Tac-Toe. Its goal, according to him, is not about striving for balance but about finding the seeds of order even in the midst of profound chaos.(Ego (Voyager episode)) It first appeared on Star Trek: Voyager, often played by Tuvok and a partner.The game itself involves a large number of small gray holographic rods called tan, generated from a platform below. They are arranged in a specific manner, which eventually produces an icosidodecahedron. Kal-Toh can be played singly or against an opponent, each taking a turn to place a piece.KotraKotra is a Cardassian board game, seen played only once in the entire franchise, in the Trek: Deep Space Nine episode Nor.StrategemaStrategema is a game central to the episode Peak Performance of Trek: The Next Generation.Strategema is a game played on a holographic board. The object of Strategema is to manipulate circular icons to gain control of your opponents territory while defending your own.Strategema is generally played on a specially-designed computer. Both players sit at the computer-controlled Strategema table, facing each other, with the board continuously rotating in the middle. The game is controlled with metal thimbles placed on the players fingers. Electronics in these thimbles then calculate the movement of the fingers and send the information to the computer.The duration of a Strategema game depends on the competence of the players. Generally, games last only a hundred moves at most. However, experienced master players can achieve games of well over a thousand moves.The longest game of Strategema on record was between Zakdorn master strategist Sirma Kolrami and Lieutenant Commander Data, lasting over 30,000 moves. Kolrami, realizing that Data was playing to achieve a draw, eventually threw down his controls in disgust and resigned the game to the delight of the Enterprise-D crewmembers who were watching.The GameIn the Trek: The Next Generation episode The Game, an undesignated reality game was introduced to the crew of the Enterprise in which players wore an optical headset and used mental commands to manipulate holographic funnels to catch virtual disks.The Game was eventually revealed to be deliberately addictive, stimulating the pleasure centers of the players brains, and was designed by aliens called the Ktarians, as a stratagem to take control of the Enterprise.Tri-Dimensional ChessThe game of tri-dimensional chess (Tri-D Chess) can be seen in many Star Trek episodes and films, most notably played by Spock against Kirk or McCoy in the original series.Rules for the game were never explained within the series; in fact, the boards are sometimes not even aligned consistently from one shot to the next within a single episode. The Tri-D chessboard set was made popular by its inclusion in the Star Trek Star Fleet Technical Manual  by Franz Joseph, who invented starting positions for the playing pieces and short additional rules. With his approval, Andrew Bartmess first developed the Standard Rules in 1976.GoGo can be seen on Trek: Enterprise, in the episode Cogenitor.TerraceTerrace is a board game introduced in 1992, and was subsequently featured on Trek: The Next Generation as a permanent prop.DurottaDurotta is a board game played by Paris and Torres in the Star Trek: Voyager episode Night. The props used were from the real world game Quarto.ReferencesExternal links********** Tapestry episode at StarTrek.com, with a picture of a Nausicaan playing Dom-jot***** The Game at Memory-Alpha****
14293813
Joseph_Henry_Collins
signature         Joseph Henry Collins FGS, (18411916), mining engineer, mineralogist and geologist. Of Cornish descent, he was born in London.(CareerHe was at various times the secretary or president of the three learned societies of Cornwall - Geological Society of Cornwall (President from 19031904, and 19111912) (), the Cornwall Polytechnic Society and the Institution of Cornwall. He also lectured for, and was secretary of, Miners Association.Collins pioneered systematic exploration for clay in the Austell area, and had a long association with the area, as well as introducing both the press and the monitor to the china clay industry.()Contributed significantly to the Transactions of the Royal Geological Society of Cornwall, and was awarded the Bolitho Medal by the RGSC in 1898.()Collins was the founding Secretary of the Society in 1876 and was involved in founding the of Mining and Metallurgy, becoming its Vice-President in 1892.Chief chemist and metallurgist Rio Tinto mines in Spain.LifeCollins was educated at The Working Mens College and College in London.His sons included L. Collins, a mine manager murdered in America, and Edward Collins, of Gibraltar in Europe.He died at his home in Crinnis, near St Austell, on 12 April 1916.(Transactions of the of Mining and Metallurgy, 1916, p393) A memorial to him was erected by the Mineralogical Society in Charlestown church.In 2008, the Society established a new annual award, The Collins Medal(Collins medal, Mineralogical Society), to recognise the lifetime contributions of scientists to pure or applied aspects of Mineral Sciences and associated studies. The Collins medal was first awarded in 2010, to Dr Henry Emeleus. Selected publications* A Handbook to the Mineralogy of Cornwall and Devon, 1871* Principals of Metal Mining, 1874* Mineralogy, 1877* The Hensbarrow Granite District, 1878, republished 1992, ISBN 0951941917References(
14306280
2007_Zasyadko_mine_disaster
shaft of the Zasyadko coal mine. Local cemetery seen on the foreground is the burial place for most of the victims.Image:Donetsk-Ukraine-map.png|thumb|225px|Location of Donetsk (red) and Oblast (pink) on the map of Ukraine.The 2007 Zasyadko mine disaster was a accident that happened on November 18, 2007 at the coal mine () in the eastern Ukrainian city of Donetsk.  At present, 101 miners are dead:()the worst accident in Ukraines history. At the time of the explosion, 457 miners were in the complex.()()Causes and investigationThe accident was caused by a methane explosion located more than  below ground level.()One of the most dangerous mines in the world,( . ..  .  RIA Novosti,  November 19, 2007) the Zasyadko Mine is equipped with up-to-date and permanently renovated safety-monitoring systems.(,   .    RIA Novosti,  November 18, 2007) However, an independent mining expert recently claimed that the company management, linked to a powerful local clan, interferes with hazard-measuring equipment on a permanent basis, in order to present underground situation as being within the standards, and so to prevent production from closure by the government inspectors.(     (TSN news on 1+1), November 22, 2007 (video of the report)) President Yushchenko blamed the cabinet for failing to implement safe mining practices in the coal industry.( A criminal investigation is also underway.Government reactionFamilies of the deceased miners will receive compensations totaling 100,000 hryvnias,() (approx. $20,000 USD) which constitutes part of the 15 million hryvnias that the Cabinet of Ministers has set aside for renovation of the mine which would prevent future accidents from happening.()On November 19, 2007, President Yushchenko signed a decree that calls for investigation into Zasyadko mine disaster as well as prevention of such disasters in the future.() The President also signed a decree making November 20 a Day of National Mourning.() Mining accidents trendWithin the past decade, the frequency of mining accidents has increased in the Donbas coal region. The Zasyadko mine accident is the deadliest ever accident in Ukraine, surpassing the Barakova Mine accident in 2000, which killed at least 80 workers.(The Zasyadko Mine, Ukraines largest and most equipped mine, employs 10,000 people and produces up to 10,000 tons of coal per day.() It has had four other major mining accidents in the past that killed more than 130 workers.()()Recurring accidentsTwelve days later, on December 1, 2007, at 5:55 local time another methane explosion happened in the same mine section injuring 52 miners.()After this, at 21:20 local time on December 2, another explosion occurred,() killing at least 5 workers and injuring 30 more.()See also* Ukraine coal mine collapse, gas explosion in June 2008Referencesgrnicza w kopalni im. Zasiadki (2007)    (2007).. 2550Zasyadko kmr madeni facias    (2007)zh:2007
14327636
Henry_Thornton_(magazine)
Henry Thornton is an Australian online news and culture magazine created in 1999. Henry Thornton is named for the one of the famed founders of the Sect, and prominent abolitionists Henry Thornton - a prominent economist, banker, philanthropist and parliamentarian of late 18th and early 19th Century Britain.Henry Thornton brings together the views from an array of contributors including economist and founder Peter Jonson, Chief Executive of Morgan Research, Michele Levine, the late political commentator PP McGuinness, Executive Director of the of Public Affairs, Roskam, Chief Economist of the ANZ, Saul Eslake, Former CEO of Western Mining Corporation (WMC) and former member of the Board of Directors of the Bank of Australia, Hugh Morgan, policy adviser, diplomat and professor, Ross Garnaut and owner and executive director of Morgan Research, Gary Morgan.(Henry Thornton Contributors)right|750px|thumb| Henry Thornton logoOrigin of Henry ThorntonHenry Thornton was founded in 1999 by professional director and economist Peter Jonson. Peter has in the past been chairman of ANZ Funds Management, Group Managing Director of Union Australia and Financial Services and Head of Research at James Capel Australia. Between 19721988, Peter held a number of senior positions at the Bank of Australia as an economist under Sir John Phillips (19721975), Sir Harold Knight (19751982) and Bob Johnston (19821988).(Reserve Bank Board Members through the years) Peter was Chairman of the Melbourne Institute Advisory Board between 19922002, and now serves as Chair Emeritus whilst running the day-to-day operations of Henry Thornton.Links to PoliticsIn 2008 Dr Peter Jonson sought Liberal preselection for the federal seat of Kooyong. See also * in Australia References (External linksHenry Thornton Blog on The Australian External links *Henry Thornton.com
14337255
Parton,_Cumbria
Parton is a village and parish on the Cumbrian coast, overlooking the Firth, 2km north of the town of Whitehaven. Formerly a port and a mining centre, it is now purely residential, benefiting from its location between the A595 trunk road and the Cumbrian Coast railway line.HistoryBeginningsThe sheltered anchorage in Parton Bay was used by the Romans, who had a fort on the high ground to the north of the present village. Later, the bay was used by the inhabitants of Low Moresby, the hamlet which grew up to the east of the old fort in the Middle Ages. In Elizabethan times a number of small merchant vessels were based in the bay, trading as far as Chester; by this time there was probably also a salt-pan in operation. The port was developed in the early 17th century to cater for Moresbys coal trade, but fell into decline after two generations of the family turned the hamlet of Whitehaven into a major port. Although the Lowthers theoretically had the legal power to prevent port development at Parton, entrepreneur Thomas Lamplugh teamed up with Henry Fletcher, of the manor of Moresby, to repair the harbour at Parton, following which Fletcher sold off plots for development along the shore. Within about five years (boosted by Lamplughs private of Parliament in 1705 to break the Lowthers legal power) a new port community had developed, mainly serving local collieries, but also including industrial facilities such as a glassworks- which was able to export bottles as far as London thanks to the improved harbour.18th century prosperityleft|thumb|165px|The original villageUnfortunately, Parton Bay is not as well sheltered as Whitehaven, and within about 15 years, Lamplugh was unable to afford maintenance costs (possibly a contributory factor to the closure of the glassworks and salt-pan about this time). The manor of Moresby was bought in 1722 by one Thomas Brougham, who was able to sideline Lamplugh and develop the port himself, but ironically, in 1738, he sold his rights to the Lowther family. Surprisingly, rather than shut down the port which rivalled Whitehaven, they used it themselves for some of their coal shipments, and Parton prospered for decades. New industries developed, most notably a brewery, but everything was nearly wrecked in 1795, when a storm destroyed the harbour breakwaters. With such extensive damage, the harbour reverted to being a little fishing haven, but the village industries had enough local custom to survive, for a while at least. Surprisingly, a new and important industrial concern opened to the north of the village in 1800- the Lowca engineering company. In 1817, the large tannery at the south end of the village was bought for development as a colliery; the coal being mined some distance inland and brought to Parton along a tunnel called the Parton Drift, which also drained the mine workings. To convey coal to the port of Whitehaven a horse-drawn tramway was built along the foot of the cliffs. 19th century onwardIn 1840 the Lowca engineering works made the first locomotive for the new and Carlisle Railway, but ironically, it had to be transported from Parton by seagoing barge. Not until several years later was the technically challenging railway extension to Whitehaven via Parton developed. The railway soon supplanted the old tramway, and brought new opportunities for Partons industries. The colliery, the engineering works and the brewery all thrived, an iron-foundry opened next to the new railway station, and in the 1870s an ironworks was established on the shore near the Lowca works. Unfortunately, the end of the 19th century was a period of industrial consolidation, and Partons relatively small businesses began to struggle. By the 1920s, almost all were gone, and Parton became a dormitory town for collieries around Lowca and Whitehaven. Many of the houses in the old village were over 200 years old by this time, and were classified as slums, so over the next half-century new housing estates were developed on top of the Brows- the escarpment overlooking the old port. Although the local collieries have all closed, Partons dormitory function continues, thanks to its good transport access. Hall (now a hotel) and parish church remain, just outside the village boundary, on the high ground to the north of Parton.none|thumb|500px|The north of Parton, with the site of the former harbour (now a green space) at bottom left, 20th century development on the hill at right, and Lowca village on the hills in the distance.Further reading*Bradbury, D. Parton Part One, Whitehaven, PastPresented (2002) ISBN 9781904367048*Bradbury, D. Parton Part Off, Whitehaven, PastPresented (2003) ISBN 9781904367192External linksnl:Parton(Kumbria)
14350198
Claude_Gravelle
 footnotes        Claude Gravelle (born October 26, 1949) is a Canadian politician, who was elected to represent the electoral district of Belt in the 2008 Canadian federal election. He is a member of the Democratic Party.Gravelle is a retired machinist and union organizer at Incos mining operations in Sudbury, where he was a member of the Steelworkers union. Gravelle first entered politics in 1997 on the town council of Rayside-Balfour. He did not run for re-election to Sudbury City Council following the municipal amalgamation in the 2000 municipal election, but became co-chair of the Rayside-Balfour action network. He ran for re-election to city council in the 2003 municipal election, but was not elected.Gravelle ran as the federal New Democratic Party candidate in Nickel Belt in the 2004 and 2006 federal elections, losing narrowly to incumbent MP Bonin both times. He won the riding in 2008 following Bonins retirement, easily beating the new Liberal candidate, former city councillor Louise Portelance.Electoral recordReferences(External links* Claude Gravelle* 
14367382
San_Benito_Mountain
 easiest_route  San Benito Mountain is a mountain located in the Range of California. The mountain, which rises to an elevation of , is the highest point in San Benito County and the Range and is also the highest point in the Francisco Bay Area, though due to distance from other cities and the inner core of the region, Mount Hamilton is considered the regions highest point. The mountain gets some snowfall during winter.(  )The Clear Creek Management Area, which encompasses the San Benito Mountain Research Natural Area, has been subject to a temporary closure by the BLM since May 2008 due to concerns of visitor exposure to naturally occurring asbestos (chrysotile).()  The area was a major OHV riding area prior to the closure.  The core area of the Clear Creek Management Area (approximately 35,000 acres) is the New Idria serpentine mass.  The serpentine is highly sheared/pulverized and contains abundant chrysotile asbestos.Extreme shearing of the bedrock, combined with soil nutrient imbalances, has resulted in extensive areas of natural barrens completely devoid of vegetation.  The serpentine soils harbor several rare plant species, including the Federally listed Threatened San Benito evening primrose (Camissonia benitensis).  A unique pine and incense cedar forest occurs at the highest elevations of the mountain.  The serpentine mass contains two superfund sites, Atlas Mine and Johns-Mansville.  Both were associated with the mining and processing of chrysotile asbestos.  Other minerals mined from the serpentine mass included cinnabar, chromite, magnesite, and jadeite.  The Gem mine (private) located within the serpentine mass is the only source of gem-grade benitoite in the world.  The rare minerals neptunite and joaquinite have also been found there. References  External links * 
14384942
Inverse_exchange-traded_fund
An inverse exchange-traded fund is an fund (ETF), traded on a public market, which is designed to perform as the inverse of whatever index or benchmark it is designed to track.  These funds work by using short selling, trading derivatives such as contracts, and other leveraged investment techniques. By providing, over short investing horizons and excluding the impact of fees and other costs, performance opposite to their benchmark, inverse ETFs give a result similar to short selling the stocks in the index. An inverse S&P 500 ETF, for example, seeks a daily percentage movement opposite that of the S&P. If the S&P 500 rises by 1%, the inverse ETF is designed to fall by 1%; and if the S&P falls by 1%, the inverse ETF should rise by 1%.  Because their value rises in a declining market environment, they are popular investments in markets.(Article on inverse funds in Thestreet.com)Short sales have the potential to expose an investor to unlimited losses, whether or not the sale involves a stock or ETF. An inverse ETF, on the other hand, provides many of the same benefits as shorting, yet it exposes an investor only to the loss of the purchase price. Another advantage of inverse ETFs is that they may be held in IRA accounts, while short sales are not permitted in these accounts.Strategies for buy-and-hold investorsThere are a numbers of scenarios where a long-term investor could benefit from short or inverse ETFs. Investors trapped in a long position during a prolonged bear market might want to reduce their losses by using a short or inverse ETF. Another instance might be where a long-term investor has a large paper gain but doesnt want to pay taxes. Rather than watch a market decline eat away at the value of the investors portfolio, selling short a market-tracking ETF, or purchasing an inverse or short ETF would help reduce losses. Systemic impact Because inverse ETFs and leveraged ETFs must change their notional every day to replicate daily returns (discussed below), their use generates trading, which is generally done at the end of the day, in the last hour of trading. Some have claimed that this causes significant increases in volatility , while others that these are not significant (WSJ article cites dissent).Fees and other issuesFeesInverse and leveraged inverse ETFs tend to have higher expense ratios than standard index ETFs, since the funds are by their nature actively managed; these costs can eat away at performance.Short-terms vs. long-termIn a market with a long-term upward bias, profit-making opportunities are limited in long time spans.  In addition, a flat or rising market means these funds might struggle to make money.  Inverse ETFs are designed to be used for relatively short-term investing as part of a timing strategy.(Marketwatch article on inverse funds)Volatility lossAn inverse ETF as any leveraged ETF needs to buy when the market rises and sell when it falls in order to maintain a fixed leverage ratio. This results in a volatility loss proportional to the market variance.(http://olympiainv.com/Memos/ETFs.pdf) Compared to a short position with identical initial exposure, the inverse ETF will therefore usually deliver inferior returns. The exception is if the market declines significantly on low volatility so that the capital gain outweighs the volatility loss. Such large declines benefit the inverse ETF because the relative exposure of the short position drops as the market fall. Since the risk of the inverse ETF and a fixed short position will differ significantly as the index drifts away from its initial value, differences in realized payoff have no clear interpretation though. It may therefore be better to evaluate the performance assuming the index returns to the initial level. In that case an inverse ETF will always incur a volatility loss relative to the short position. As with synthetic options, leveraged ETFs needs to be frequently rebalanced. In financial mathematics terms, they are not Delta One products: they have Gamma. The volatility loss is also sometimes referred to as a compounding error.Hypothetical exampleIf one invests $100 in an inverse ETF position in an asset worth $100, and the assets value changes to $80 and then to $60, then the value of the inverse ETF position will increase by 20% (because the asset decreased by 20% from 100 to 80) and then increase by 25% (because the asset decreased by 25% from 80 to 60). So the ETFs value will be $100*1.20*1.25$150. The gain of an equivalent short position will however be $100$60$40, and so we see that the capital gain of the ETF outweighs the volatility loss relative to the short position. However if the market swings back to $100 again, then the net profit of the short position is zero. However, since the value of the asset increased by 67% (from $60 to $100), the inverse ETF must lose 67%, meaning it will lose $100. Thus the investment in shorts went from $100 to $140 and back to $100. The investment in the inverse ETF, however, went from $100 to $150 to $50.Historical exampleFor instance, between the close of November 28, 2008 and December 5, 2008, the iShares Dow Jones US Financial () moved from 44.98 to 45.35 (essentially flat, properly an increase of 0.8%), so a double short would have lost 1.6% over that time. However, it varied greatly during the week (dropping to a low of 37.92 on December 1, a daily drop of 15.7%, before recovering over the week), and thus the ProShares UltraShort Financials (), which is a double-short ETF of the IYF moved from 135.05 to 117.18, a loss of 13.2%.Expected lossGiven that the index follows a Brownian motion and that a fraction x of the fund A_t is invested in the index S_t, the volatility gain of the log return can be seen from the following relation.(http://olympiainv.com/Memos/ETFs.pdf) \Delta \ln(A_t)x \Delta \ln(S_t)+(x-x^2)\sigma^2\frac{\Delta t}{2}where \sigma^2 is the variance of the index process and the last term on the right hand side constitutes the volatility gain. We see that if x or x>1, as is the case with leveraged ETFs, the return of the fund will be less than x times the index return (the first term on the right hand side).List of fundsSome inverse ETFs are:Direxion* Direxion Financial Bear 3X - * Direxion Technology Bear 3x - * Direxion Russell 1000 Bear 3x - * Direxion Russell 2000 Bear 3x - * Direxion Russell MidCap Bear 3x - ProShares * ProShares Short Dow 30 - * ProShares Short S&P 500 - * ProShares Short S&P MidCap 400 - * ProShares Short S&P SmallCap 600 - * ProShares Short Nasdaq 100 - * ProShares Short Russell 2000 - * ProShares S&P 500 Bear 3x - Horizons BetaPro* HBP S&P/TSX 60 Bear Plus ETF - * HBP S&P/TSX Capped Energy Bear Plus ETF - * HBP S&P/TSX Capped Financials Bear Plus ETF - * HBP S&P/TSX Global Gold Bear Plus ETF - * HBP S&P/TSX Global Mining ETF - * HBP NYMEX Crude Oil Bear Plus ETF - * HBP NYMEX Natural Gas Bear Plus ETF - * HBP COMEX Gold Bullion Bear Plus ETF - * HBP S&P500 Bear Plus ETF - * HBP NASDAQ-100 Bear Plus ETF - * HBP U.S. Dollar Bear Plus ETF - * HBP MSCI Emerging Markets Bear Plus ETF - * HBP DJ-AIG Agricultural Grains Bear Plus ETF - * HBP U.S. 30yr Bond Bear Plus ETF - See also* Securities* List of exchange-traded funds: leveraged & short ETFsReferences* *:Will Leveraged ETFs Put Cracks in Market Close?, by Jason Zweig, Wall Street Journal, discussing Cheng & Madhavan reportExternal links* New York Times article on inverse funds:  Here Come the Bears* Dow Jones Marketwatch article on inverse ETFs, January 27, 2008
14408416
Dyersville,_Colorado
Dyersville was a mining town  now a town  in Summit County, Colorado, States.  It was named after Methodist minister Lewis Dyer.  Nothing remains of the town except the roofless walls of a couple of log cabins.HistoryMethodist minister and prospector Lewis Dyer, better known as Father Dyer, built a cabin in a secluded location along the upper reaches of Indiana Creek in January 1881.  He was soon joined in his seclusion by miners and merchants connected to the nearby Warriors Mark mine.  The community named itself after its first resident, Father Dyer.(Mark Fiester (1980) Look for me in Heaven, Boulder, Colo.: Pruett, p.380-385.)Notable residents* Lewis Dyer, pioneer Methodist minister.GeographyThe site of Dyersville, is at , at an elevation of 10,879 feet (3316 m) above mean sea level.  The site is in Indiana Gulch, six miles southeast of Colorado.See alsoof ghost towns in ColoradoReferences(External links* Rocky Mountain Profiles:  Dyersville Colorado Townsite - Ghost town* Ghosttowns.com:  Dyersville
14416011
List_of_Canadian_disasters_by_death_toll
List of Canadian disasters by death toll is a list of major disasters (excluding acts of war) which occurred in Canada or involved Canadian citizens, in a definable incident, where the loss of life was 10 or more. 200 or more deaths100 to 199 deaths* 200 - Ruby shipwreck near the Azores, December 16, 1758 (ref?)* 189  mine disaster, Alberta, 19 June 1914* 182+ - Victoria , Ontario, ferry capsized 24 May 1881(historic plaque commemorating event)(londonhistory.org  The Victoria Day Disaster1881)* 174  SS Southern Cross shipwreck, Newfoundland, 31 March 1914* 173  SS Florizel shipwreck, Newfoundland and Labrador, 23 February 1918* 160  Fire, Brunswick, October 1825 * 150  Nanaimo mine explosion, British Columbia, 3 May 1887* 136  SS Valencia shipwreck, Vancouver Island, British Columbia, 22 January 1906* 129  Franklin expedition  Erebus (1826) and Terror (1813) lost in Passage, 18451848* 125  First mining disaster, Nova Scotia, 21 February 1891* 118  Air Lines Flight 831 aircrash, Quebec, 29 November 1963* 118 - SS Noronic fire,  Toronto, 17 September 1949* 115  HMS Acorn, shipwreck, Halifax NS, 14 April 1828 * 109  Canada Flight 621, near Toronto, 5 July 1970* 102  HMS Feversham shipwreck, Island, Nova Scotia, 7 October 171110 to 99 deaths* 99 - of Columbus Hostel fire, Johns, Newfoundland, 12 December 1942* 99  train disaster, River, Quebec, 29 June 1864 train disaster in Canada* 84  Ranger oil platform sinking, Banks, 15 February 1982* 81  Hazel, Toronto, October 1954 fatalities only* 78  SS Newfoundland seal hunt disaster, Newfoundland, March 1914* 77  Palace Theatre Fire, Montreal, 9 January 1927* 76  Bridge first collapse, 29 August 1907* 74  Third mining disaster, Nova Scotia,  23 October 1958 * 73-200 - Porcupine Fire, Ontario, 10 July 1911* 70  Slide, Mountain (Alberta), 29 April 1903* 70  Canal train disaster, bridge collapse, 12 March 1857* 64  Pacific Airlines Flight 402 (CP402) McDonnell Douglas DC-8-43 crashed on landing, Japan 4 March 1966* 62 - Pass avalanche, Pass, Columbia, 4 March 1910.* 59  Despatch shipwreck, Isle aux Morts, Newfoundland,  12 July 1828(Brief History of the Workington brig Despatch / Dispatch)* 55  Ellice Bridge Disaster, British Columbia, 26 May 1896* 52  Pacific Airlines Flight 21 Douglas DC-6B crashed near Dog Creek, Columbia when a bomb blew its tail section away, 8 July 1965* 52  Great Western Railway passenger train collides with the tail end of gravel train at Baptiste Creek, Canada West. 27 October 1854 * 48 - Opmiska Community Hall fire, Quebec, 31 December 1979* 44  Les boulements bus accident, Quebec, 13 October 1997* 44  Spanish River derailment, Northern Ontario, 21 January 1910 * 43 - SARS outbreak, Toronto, Ontario, February - September 2003* 43  Fire of 1922, District, Ontario, 45 October 1922 * 42  Western Airlines Flight 314,  Cranbrook/Rockies International Airport, 11 February 1978 * 40 - SS Islander (Canadian Pacific Steam Navigation Company), sunk by iceberg, Canal south of Juneau, Alaska* 40  rockslide, Diamant, 19 September 1889* 39 - Almonte train wreck, 27 December 1942 * 39  Second mining disaster, Nova Scotia, 1 November 1956* 37  Pacific Airlines Douglas C-54 A-10-DC disappeared en route without trace out of British Columbia for Alaska, 21 July 1951* 37  Great Labrador Gale of 1867, 9 October 1867 * 37  Bird Caf fire, Montreal, 1 September, 1972* 35  Escuminac Hurricane, Gulf of St. Lawrence, 19 June 1959* 31  Quebec mudslide, 4 May 1971 (CBC News Indepth: Forces of nature - Flooding)* 31  train disaster, Manitoba, 1 September 1947* 29  Grand Banks earthquake and tsunami, Peninsula, 18 November 1929* 29 - Edmund Fitzgerald, Superior November 1975, went down with all hands* 28  American ice storm of 1998, January 1998 fatalities only* 28  Cyclone, Saskatchewan, 30 June 1912* 28 - Lasalle Heights Disaster, Quebec, 1 March 1965* 27  Tornado, Alberta, 31 July 1987* 27  Pacific Airlines Flight 301 Britannia crashed in Hawaii, 22 July 1962* 27  Memorial Second Narrows Crossing bridge collapse, Vancouver, 17 June 1958* 27 - SS Viking, explosion, Islands (Newfoundland and Labrador), 15 March 1931* 26  Mine methane explosion, Plymouth, Nova Scotia, 9 May 1992* 26+  HMS Speedy shipwreck in snowstorm, Ontario, 8 October 1804* 24  9/11, 11 September 2001 fatalities only* 24  Ontario Flight 1363, near Ontario, 10 March 1989* 23  train collision, Alberta, 8 February 1986* 23  Canada Flight 797, aircraft fire, Kentucky International Airport, 2 June 1983* 23  Airways DC-3 bomb sabotage, Saint-Joachim, Quebec, 9 September 1949 See Guay* 22 - Bus crash Current, Saskatchewan, 28 May 1980 * 21 - MV Flare bulk carrier shipwreck, Strait, 16 January 1998* 19  level crossing accident, Quebec, 7 October 1966* 17  disease outbreak, Toronto, 2005(Legionnaires disease claims another life in Toronto)* 17  Helicopters Flight 91, off Newfoundland, 12 March 2009* 15  air disaster, Ontario, 15 May 1956 * 15  Pacific Airlines Flight 307 Douglas DC-6B aircrash, near Bay, Alaska, 29 August 1956* 15 - Ottawa & New York Railway Bridge (south channel crossing) bridge collapse, Cornwall, Ontario, 6 September 1898* 14 - Polytechnique Massacre, shooting rampage, 6 December 1989* 14 - Titanic, sank April 15, 1912 -- Canadian deaths only of 1,517 total. (The Demographics of Titanic Passengers)* 13 - MS Arctic Explorer shipwreck, off Anthony, Newfoundland, 3 July 1981* 13  Les boulements bus accident, Quebec, 1974* 13  Bridge second collapse, 11 September 1916* 13  Point, Ontario, head-on train collision, 9 February 1904* 12  Air Flight 6560 a 737 crashes near Resolute Bay, Nunavut, 20 August 2011* 12  Lake, Alberta Tornado, 14 July 2000* 11  Pacific Airlines De Havilland DH-106 Comet 1A CF-CUN Empress of Hawaii, crashed on takeoff from Pakistan, 3 March 1953 (first passenger jetliner involved in a fatal accident)(ASN Aircraft accident description de Havilland DH-106 Comet 1A CF-CUN - Karachi)* 10 - Metropolitan Store explosion, Ontario, 25 October 1960(Windsor Fire and Rescue Services History)See also* of disasters involving Canadians by death toll * of disasters in Canada (by date)* of wars and disasters by death toll (worldwide)* of disasters in Australia by death toll* of New Zealand disasters by death toll* of United Kingdom disasters by death toll* of United States disasters by death toll* of Canada-related topics* in CanadaReferencesExternal links*Canadian Disasters: an historical survey by Robert L. Jones*SOS! Canadian Disasters, a virtual museum exhibition at Library and Archives Canada*Canadian Disaster Database* Maritime Museum of the Atlantic: Marine Heritage Database
14433672
James_R._Robinson
James R. Robinson (18601950) was an industrialist, inventor, and author of a seminal book on mine ventilation (1922).(Pittsburgh: J.R. Robinson, 1922. OCLC 1688262) The book documents his invention of a new device for ventilating mines and preventing the buildup of explosive gases underground, thereby dramatically improving mine safety. He founded the Robinson Ventilating Company, forerunner of todays Industries, one of the nations leading designers and manufacturers of fans. Early life J.R. Robinson was born in Scotland where his father, B. Robinson, worked as a master mechanic for the English Crown Coal Company. In 1863, when Robinson was three, his family emigrated to the United States, settling in the country of western Pennsylvania.Upon his arrival in the U.S., Samuel enlisted in the Army to fight in the Civil War. When the war ended, he used his coal mining skills to land a job as a designer for the Coal Company, eventually rising to the position of plant superintendent. By the time he was 12, Robinson was helping his father in the coal mine, earning certification as a journeyman machinist by the time he was 20.Education and New Ventures Robinson studied engineering at University, after which he returned to Pennsylvania. In 1892 he and Samuel co-founded the Robinson Machine Company, which provided machinery and ventilation for the many mines in the region. J.R. served as chief engineer. In that capacity he directed numerous product innovations, including the development of fans, boilers, engines, hoists, crushers, and haulers for coal mines and mills. In 1907 Samuel retired and sold the company. The following year, James founded the Robinson Ventilating Company in Pittsburgh, which sold industrial fans he designed and were manufactured by two other companies. Americas entry into World War I in 1917 placed heavy demands on the nations manufacturers, leading Robinson Ventilating to establish its own manufacturing plant in Blairsville, Pa. In 1921, Robinson moved the plant to Zelienople, Pa., where the headquarters and main manufacturing facility of Robinson Industries are still located today. Legacy As a result of his work with the mining industry, Robinson became a major authority on mine ventilation. Until the early 1900s, the principal method of providing ventilation for miners was through natural draft ventilation, which meant simply digging large holes above the mines for ventilation purposes. The problem with this was that methane gases were too heavy to rise through the ventilating holes, and instead accumulated beneath the surface, often triggering explosions. He designed and built a ventilating device that could bring fresh air into mines or force out old air. He summarized his work in a technical article and in his 1922 book Practical Mine Ventilation, which quickly became required reading in college mining and engineering classes. The book remained a staple of course syllabi for many years afterward. It is still held in roughly 30 U.S. libraries.(WorldCat)  Robinsons innovations were not limited to the ventilation industry. On a winters day in 1927, while driving to State University to visit his son Rodger, he experienced a great deal of difficulty seeing through the snow and ice accumulating on his windshield. Rather than returning home after his visit he stayed at the university and used his engineering expertise to design and create a device for heating windshields. To ensure that the company would stay in the family, he placed the majority of Robinson Ventilating stock in a trust for his children. Many of his children and their descendants have remained in the business and have helped to grow it and make technical innovations.References External links Timeline of Robinson Industries, Inc. http://www.robinsonfans.com/index.php?prHistoryA History of Innovation http://www.robinsonfans.com/media/History_Brochure.pdf
14437216
El_Paso_County,_Kansas_Territory
El Paso County was a county of the States of Kansas that existed for two years from 1859-02-07, to 1861-01-29.HistoryIn July 1858, gold was discovered along the Platte River in Arapahoe County of the of Kansas (now in the of Colorado). This discovery precipitating the Peak Gold Rush.  To provide local government for the gold mining region, the Territorial Legislature split Arapahoe County into six counties on 1859-02-07: a much smaller Arapahoe County, Broderick County, El Paso County, Fremont County, Montana County, and Oro County.  None of these six counties were ever organized.  Many residents of the mining region felt disconnected from the territorial government, and they formed their own of Jefferson on 1859-10-24.Following the Republican Party election victories in 1860, the States Congress admitted Kansas to the Union.()  The Kansas Act of Admission excluded the portion of the Kansas Territory west of the meridian west from Washington from the new state, and El Paso County and the rest of this region reverted to unorganized territory.On 1861-02-28, the Territory was organized to govern this unorganized territory and adjacent areas of the Mexico Territory, the Territory, and the Territory.()  The new General Assembly organized 17 counties on 1861-11-01, including a new El Paso County for the Colorado Territory.See also*Paso County, Colorado*Historic Colorado counties*of Colorado*of Kansas*Peak Gold Rush*of Colorado*of Jefferson*of KansasReferencesExternal links*Colorado County Evolution by Don Stanwyck*Kansas State Historical Society website*Colorado State Historical Society websitePaso County (Kansas-Territorium)
14444976
HMS_Quail_(G45)
{|Ship notesBadge: On a Field per fess Blue and Green, a quail White.|}HMS Quail was a Q class destroyer of the Navy.  She served during the World War but her career lasted less than a year before she was damaged by a mine and withdrawn from active service.Construction and commissioningQuail was ordered on 2 April 1940 to serve with the 3rd Emergency Flotilla.  She was laid down on 30 September 1940 from the yards of Leslie & Company, Hebburn and launched on 1 June 1942.  She was commissioned on 7 January 1943 having cost a total of 436,576, excluding equipment supplied by the Admiralty such as armaments, wireless and radar equipment.  She was adopted by the civil community of Islington. London in March 1942 following a successful Week for Savings.(Quails career)CareerConvoy escortAfter spending December 1942 undergoing contractors trials, Quail was commissioned on 7 January 1943.  She then took passage to join the Fleet at Flow, where she carried out working up exercises.  In February she was nominated to escort the joint military convoys WS27 and KMF10A during their passage from the Clyde.  WS27 was bound for the East via the of Good Hope, whilst KMF10A was headed for the Mediterranean via Gibraltar.  Having completed the escort duties, the naval command intended that Quail would join the 3rd Flotilla in the Ocean.(  She joined Convoy WS27 in the Clyde on 27 February, along with the battleship HMS Malaya and the destroyers HMS Raider, Quadrant, Queenborough and Wolverine as the ocean escort for the convoys passage through the Atlantic. Quail remained with Convoy WS27 when the ships of KMF10A were detached on 2 March to sail to Gibraltar.  On 5 March HMS Quadrant was detached and on 8 March Quail, Queenborough and Raider were detached from the convoy on its arrival at Freetown, Sierra Leone.  They were then retained at Freetown for convoy defence, whilst the planned transfer to the Indian Ocean was cancelled to due to future requirements in support of the planned allied landings in Mediterranean.(Fleet screeningOn 11 March Quail was deployed with Queenborough and Raider to cover the passage of convoy WS27, bound for Durban.  They escorted it to Durban, arriving on 24 March when they were detached.  They returned to Freetown in April, where Quail was nominated to return to the UK.  She took passage from Freetown on 29 April in company with HMS Quality.  They arrived in the UK, and rejoined the flotilla at Scapa Flow in May.  In June Quail was nominated to support the allied landings in Sicily (Operation Husky).(  She sailed for Gibraltar as part of an escort for capital ships of the Home Fleet that were also assigned to cover the landings.  She deployed out of Malta and on 8 July sailed as part of a screen for the battleships HMS Nelson, Rodney, Warspite and Valiant, the carriers HMS Indomitable and Formidable and the cruisers HMS Aurora, Penelope, Cleopatra and Euryalus, with the destroyers HMS Quilliam, Queenborough, Isis, Faulknor, Echo, Intrepid, Raider, Eclipse, Fury, Inglefield, Ilex, Troubridge, Tyrian, Tumult, Offa, the Greek Vasilissa Olga and the Polish ORP Piorun in the Western Mediterranean.(  They provided cover against Italian interference in the allied landings, and by 12 July the escorting destroyers were deployed on interception patrols.  On 14 July Quail and Quilliam deployed with the cruisers Cleopatra and Euryalus off the east coast of Sicily.(BombardmentsQuail continued on these duties throughout August and on 21 August she carried out a bombardment of the Italian mainland from the of Messina.(  Ten days later on 31 August she was part of a screen for the battleships Nelson and Rodney and the cruiser HMS Orion during the preliminary bombardment of the Italian coast between Calabria and Pessaro before the allied landings in Italy.  Quail carried out bombardments and screening duties with the destroyers HMS Offa, Petard, Queenborough, Quilliam, Tartar, Troubridge, Tyrian and ORP Piorun in early September.  On 2 September Quail bombarded the area south of Reggio and from 9 September to 16 September she joined other destroyers in screening the battleships Nelson, Rodney, Warspite and Valiant, and the aircraft carriers Illustrious and Formidable.  They provided gunfire support off the beach head and carried out anti submarine and E-boat patrols.(  In October Quail was transferred to the Adriatic and based at Bari to support military operations and escort convoys. On 22 October she intercepted and captured an enemy merchant ship during a patrol.(Mining and sinkingOn 15 November, whilst on patrol in the Adriatic, Quail struck a mine that had been part of a barrage laid by U-453 on 25 October.(  She was beached the following day to await salvage.  In December she was towed to Bari to undergo temporary repairs.(  She spent the period between January and April 1944 under temporary repair to allow her to make passage to Taranto for permanent repairs.  She was towed to Taranto but whilst there it was arranged that she would be repaired at Malta.  After further preparations, she departed under tow for Malta in May, but capsized and sank en route in the of Taranto on 18 May.(On 5 June 2002 an Italian diver team led by Serpieri discovered the wreck of HMS Quail and filmed it. She currently lies at a depth of 90 metres.(Uboat.net)NotesReferences** External links*HMS Quails wartime career*HMS Quail at Uboat.net Quail (G45)
14451697
Saratoga_County,_Jefferson_Territory
Saratoga County was a county of the extralegal States of Jefferson that existed from November 28, 1859, until February 28, 1861.HistoryIn July 1858, gold was discovered along the Platte River in County, Kansas Territory.  This discovery precipitated the Peak Gold Rush.  Many residents of the mining region felt disconnected from the remote territorial governments of Kansas and Nebraska, so they voted to form their own of Jefferson on October 24, 1859.  On November 28, the General Assembly of the Territory of Jefferson organized 12 counties:  Arrappahoe County, Cheyenne County, El Paso County, Fountain County, Heele County, Jackson County, Jefferson County, Mountain County, North County, Park County, Saratoga County, and St. Vrains County.()  The legislation that created Saratoga County declared:That the territory comprised within the limits of what is known as the Middle Park, be erected into a county called Saratoga.Saratoga County was named for Springs, New York, because the hot mineral springs found in the county.  Saratoga County encompassed much of what is today Grand County and County, Colorado.The Jefferson Territory never received federal sanction, but on February 28, 1861, President Buchanan signed an act organizing the of Colorado.()  On November 1, 1861, the General Assembly organized 17 counties, including Grand County, for the new Colorado Territory.County SeatThe Saratoga County seat was at the mining town of Breckinridge.  Now known as Breckenridge, it is now the seat of Summit County.Elections And Elected OfficialsSaratoga Countys first office holding official was John W. McIntyre, appointed by Governor Williamson Steele in December 1859 as President Judge of Saratoga County.  He was to hold office until the countys first popular election was held on January 2, 1860.See also*County, Colorado*Historic Colorado counties*of Colorado*Peak Gold Rush*of Colorado*of Colorado*of JeffersonReferencesExternal links*Colorado State Historical Society websiteCounty (Jefferson-Territorium)
14467111
Brnbach
thumb|BrnbachBrnbach is the smallest city of the district of Voitsberg, Austria.The city is popular for its church (designed by Hundertwasser), manual glass manufacturing and coal mining (surface mining).Today the coal mine is closed, because it is uneconomical. Culture and Sightseeings Magnet of tourism is the church of Saint Barbara (patron of miners) which was built in 1948 and was renovated by Hundertwasser in 1987.There is museum of history and technique of glass manufacturing in the Stlze Oberglas company and a museum of castles in the castle Altkainach. Infrastructure Brnbach has a small railway station, connecting it with Kflach and Graz. The nearest Autobahn (Freeway) is the A2 Sdautobahn, the nearest connections are Modriach and MooskirchenThe most important Road is the B70 Packerbundesstrae connecting Brnbach with Graz and Villach.Most of the inhabitants are commuters and use the B70 to reach Graz.Distance to Graz: approx. 48 km Economy Because of the infrastructural situation industry is not very interested in Brnbach. Exhaust manufacturer Remus have had their headquarters in the city since 1990. In former times the important industrial locations were the coal mines, the steam-powerplant Voitsberg III and the glassworks.The powerplant was closed in 2006, but there are plans to open it again.Today the glassworks closed the industrial production section, but the glassblowing and glass art section are still existing. Most of the people work in neighbouring cities or in Graz.Brnbach also has a mall, called WEZ (Weststeirisches Einkaufszentrum  Weststyrian Shopping centre) which is the biggest mall in the district. External links *Website of Brnbachbs:Brnbachde:Brnbachfr:Brnbachit:Brnbachnl:Brnbachpl:Brnbachru:sk:Brnbachvi:Brnbachvo:Brnbachwar:Brnbach
14482403
Johan_Sebastiaan_Ploem
 footnotes  Member of the Society of Analytical Cytology, the Dutch Society of Cytology, the International Academy of Cytology and the Royal Microscopical Society, for which he served as president in 1986.Johan Sebastiaan Ploem (born 25 August 1927, Sawahlunto) is a Dutch microscopist and artist, who made significant contribution to the field of microscopy.Personal lifePloem was born on Sumatra, then part of the East Indies, where his Dutch father was employed as a coal-mining engineer. At the age of two he returned with his parents to the Netherlands where he remained for the rest of his youth in Heerlen, a town in the south of the Netherlands. He started painting as a small boy and was educated in drawing and painting in Maastricht but after finishing high school opted to study medicine instead of art. During Ploems entire career painting has remained a factor in his life, even during extensive scientific work in medicine, medical research and advanced microscopy.CareerPloem received his education at the of Utrecht in the Netherlands, University and the of Amsterdam. He has since then been employed by a number of academic institutions, including the of Miami, the University of Amsterdam, and the of Leiden, where he served as a professor at the Faculty of Medicine. He also cooperated with industry, in particular in the branch of optics and concentrated on research in image analysis, participating in a project aiming to automate cancer cell recognition.Work on fluorescence microscopyAround 1962 Ploem started work in collaboration with Schott on the development of dichroic splitters for reflection of blue and green light for microscopy using epi-illumination ((illumination and detection from one side of the sample)). At the time of his first communication 1965 and publication on epi-illumination with narrow-band blue and green light, he was not aware of the development of a dichroic beamsplitter for UV excitation with light by Brumberg and Krylova. Neither was the Leitz company, from which he obtained an Opak epi-illuminator with a neutral beamsplitter. This illuminator had to be modified to contain a slider in the incident light path containing four dichroic beamsplitters, for respectively UV, violet, blue and green excitation light. This device, developed at the University of Amsterdam, permitted the easy exchange of different dichroic beamsplitters in the incident light path. The wavelength of the excitation light could thus be easily and rapidly changed.Soon it became clear that excitation with narrow-band blue and green light opened optimal possibilities for the detection of the widely used immunofluorescence labels isothiocyanate (FITC) and isothiocyanate (TRITC). The use of blue and green excitation also minimized autofluorescence of tissue components, an undesired effect encountered with conventional transmitted illumination with light. FITC could now be excited with narrow band blue light (using a band interference filter with a half width of 16 nm), close to the excitation maximum at 490 nm (long wavelength blue), with clear observation of the green fluorescence peak emission at 520 nm. Autofluorescence of tissue components was minimized (Fig. 2a, b) resulting in a high image contrast. Excitation of FITC near its excitation maximum enabled such an efficient excitation that even a mercury high-pressure arc lamp, having no strong emission peak in the blue wavelength range, could be used. Furthermore epi-illumination with a green reflecting dichroic mirror enabled for the first time the excitation of Feulgenpararosaniline with the strong mercury emission line at 546 nm (Fig. 3a, b). Image:Ploem_2a.jpg| Fig. 2a: Tissue cells marked with an immunolabel (FITC) illuminated with wide-band UV excitation. Note the tissue structure with blue autofluorescence. Image:Ploem_2b.jpg| Fig. 2b: Same tissue and same immunostaining with FITC label illuminated with epi-illumination using narrow-band blue (490nm) light. Note the increased image contrast (Ploem, 1967) Image:Ploem_3a.jpg|  Fig. 3a: Liver tissue. Nuclei stained with Feulgen-pararosanilin for DNA, and visualized with transmitted green light. This stain was known as absorbing stain and not known to be fluorescent. One on the nuclei is illuminated with incident narrow-band green light (546nm) resulting in a red fluorescence emission. Image:Ploem_3b.jpg|  Fig. 3b: Liver tissue. Nuclei stained with Feulgen-pararosaniline for DNA. Epi-illumination with narrow band green light (546nm) and a dichroic beam splitter for reflecting green light. Probably the first example of microscope excitation with green light (Ploem, 1965). Note large image contrast.  In his second publication on the multi-wavelengths epi-illuminator, describing a Leitz prototype with four dichroic beam-splitters, Ploem could acknowledge the contribution of Brumberg and Krylova. The inaccessibility of Russian research in that time period, and the absence of any major industrial development of epi-fluorescence microscopy in Russia or East Germany was the reason that Leitz had not been aware earlier of such a development. The possibility to introduce epi-illumination with UV light, although useful for several applications, had not been a motive for a new technological development at Leitz, since they had already excellent transmitted dark field UV excitation available. The increasing worldwide use of routine immunofluorescence microscopy in medical diagnosis and molecular biology research could, however, profit from the new possibility of epi-illumination using narrow band excitation with blue and green light. Since standard high-pressure mercury arc lamps could be used, this seemed a practical proposition. Subsequently Leitz developed a novel multi-wavelength fluorescence epi-illuminator (Leitz PLOEMOPAK) with four rotating dichroic beamsplitters for respectively UV, violet, blue and green light. In successive generations of Leitz illuminators (containing four dichroic beamsplitters) barrier filters and a rotating turret for excitation filters were added. Finally an elegant epi-illuminator was constructed by Kraft containing multiple sets of a combination of an excitation filter, a dichroic beamsplitter and a barrier or emission filter, mounted together in a filter cube, also called filter block (Fig. 4). Since this illuminator permitted the filter cubes to be rapidly turned into the optical light path, multi-wavelength illumination of the same section of tissue became a practical proposition. Moreover, the four filter cubes in the illuminator could be exchanged by the user (Fig 1). Different sets of four filter cubes could be assembled, chosen from many filter cubes, containing combinations of excitation, barrier filters and dichroic beamsplitters, developed for different applications. Following suggestions by Ploem, Leitz also produced an inverted microscope with epi-illumination. For a review of the Leitz PLOEMOPAK illuminator for multi-wavelength fluorescence microscopy, the reader is referred to a review by Pluta.thumb|left|  Fig. 4: Complete Leitz (Leica) filter cube (block) for fluorescence microscopy containing: excitation filter, dichroic beam splitter and emission (barrier) filter. The Leitz (Leica) filter cube system was so efficient that now, >45 years later, similar types of filter cubes are still used by most microscope manufacturers for multi-wavelength fluorescence microscopy. This development finally led within Leica to the development of automated multi-wavelength fluorescence epi-illuminators accommodating eight filter cubes for various wavelength ranges. When switching between filter cubes, pixel shift on the computer monitor is avoided or stays below the resolution power of a 35 mm film due to a 0-pixel shift technology. This illuminator is now used for fluorescence in situ hybridisation methods (FISH) in the study of chromosomes.Ploem, van der Ploeg and Ploem and Nairn and Ploem further explored the filter combinations that had to be developed for many biomedical applications. This was done in collaboration with Schott and Leitz. Rygaard and Olson developed a novel shortwave pass high transmission interference filter with a very high transmission for blue light and a sharp cut-off towards wavelengths longer than 490 nm.Ploem combined this SP filter with a 1 mm GG 455 filter from Schott, which blocked UV excitation, and suggested the development by Balzers of a similar filter ( SP 560  KP560) for excitation with green light and a filter for excitation with violet light (LP 425  KP 425). The latter filter was applied in the investigation of neurotransmitters. In Fig. 6a, b the resulting blue fluorescence can be observed. From the optical industry side, early contributions and reviews on these developments were written by Kraft, Walter,Trapp and Herzog.The main classes of filters used in epi-illumination fluorescence microscopy were defined in (1) the primary excitation filters LP (long pass) and SP (short pass)  in the German literature known as KP filter  and (2) the secondary filters such as barrier filters and emission filters. The latter were also described as fluorescence selection filters; these are for instance used to limit the observation to the peak fluorescence at 520 nm of FITC. A recent extensive review on filters for fluorescence microscopy has been given by Reichman. Cormane was the first to demonstrate that narrow band blue light epi-illumination of the fluorescent label FITC gave an optimal contrast in immunofluorescence studies of human skin disease. Transmitted-light excitation with UV light used to cause such a strong auto-fluorescence of elastic fibres in the skin, so that visualization of the fluorescent antibody was severely hindered. The pioneering work of Leitz in epi-illumination fluorescence microscopy coincided in the seventies with a worldwide increase in the application of immunofluorescence and other molecular biology methods like FISH in medical diagnosis and research. Hijmans et al. were the first to demonstrate the usefulness of the new Leitz multi-wavelength excitation epi-illuminator for the selective detection of certain classes of immunoglobu lines in cells, using antibodies conjugated with green fluorescent FITC and red fluorescent TRITC. They applied the two-wavelengths excitation method using blue and green light and the selection of the peak fluorescence of FITC by an emission filter at 520 nm (Fig. 7). Brandtzaeg and Klein et al. made similar discoveries in identifying immunologically important cell types, using two-wavelength excitation with the Leitz epi-illuminator. In a staining of blood with rosette formation, the two-wavelengths excitation method using UV and green light can demonstrate erythrocytes around a mononuclear cell (Fig. 8). Image:Ploem_6a_small.jpg|  Fig. 6a: Mesenterium of the rat with small blood vessel surrounded by a blue fluorescent adrenergic (CA) nerve-plexus and yellow fluorescent mast (5-HT) cells. Formaldehyde-induced neurotransmitter fluorescence of CA and 5-HT fluorophores. Image:Ploem_6b.jpg|  Fig. 6b: Same tissue and staining as Fig. 6a: Epi-illumination with narrow-band violet excitation light (LP 3mm GG 400 and SP(KP)425 interference filter), a dichroic beam splitter 495nm, reflecting violet light and a barrier filter LP460nm. The filter cube permitted for the first time the observation of blue fluorescent adrenergic nerve fibers, distinctly different from yellow fluorescent mast cells (Ploem, 1971). Image:Ploem_7.jpg|  Fig. 7: Bone marrow cells stained with anti-kappa TRITC conjugate and an anti-IgG FITC conjugate. Epi-illumination with narrow band green and blue light, resulting in red fluorescence of cells containing TRITC and green fluorescence of cells containing FITC. Some cells contain both FITC and TRITC. Image:Ploem_8.jpg|  Fig. 8: Human blood cells, rosette formation. Erythrocytes stained with the blue fluorescent stain stilbene using epi-illumination with UV light. Lymphocytes stained with the orange-red stain eosine after excitation with green light (1965).  Digital Paintingthumb|left|  Meadow near Sauto, Pyrenees, France Early daysBas Ploem started painting as a small boy, making copies of paintings in the house of his parents in Heerlen, a town in the south of the Netherlands. He lived there until he was eighteen. While still at secondary school he used to take the train to the nearby town of Maastricht to attend an evening course in drawing and painting at the Kunstnijverheidsschool Maastricht, which was later converted into the Academie Beeldende Kunsten Maastricht (Academy of Art, Maastricht). After finishing high school he had the chance to opt for a further education in art, but decided to study medicine instead.Meeting with the painters Frits and Yves Klein in ParisDuring his medical studies at the University of Utrecht in the Netherlands, he had the opportunity to work as an intern in the Hospital Broussais in Paris under the supervision of professeur Pasteur Vallery-Radot, the grandson of Louis Pasteur. Ploems presence in Paris was important for his knowledge and interest in art since he could regularly visit his cousins in Paris, the painter Frits Klein and his son Yves. He visited the Kleins when Yves was making his first monochromes.Analogue paintingsDuring Ploems entire career, painting remained a factor in his life, its intensity varying with the workload, first in medicine and later in medical research. On the basis of this lifelong activity as a Sunday painter an exposition of his analogue paintings was organized in 1992 in Pulchri Studio in The Hague on the occasion of his retirement as a professor from Leiden University, The Netherlands.Computer image analysis for the creation of digital graphicsIn the last years of his activities at the faculty of medicine at Leiden University, he concentrated on research in image analysis. He was asked to participate in a European project with the aim of automating cancer cell recognition using computer analysis. It concerned a collaborative project with the German optical company Leitz/Leica Microsystems, and the Institute for Mathematical Morphology in Fontainebleau, France. Together with a team, Professor Jean Serra at this institute had developed an image analysis method, now internationally known as Mathematical Morphology (MM). With his experience as a analogue painter, Ploem quickly saw the possibility of also applying the methods of mathematical morphology to human faces, landscapes, buildings and flowers. Instead of looking at cells, the computer programmed for image analysis, can also look at the optical information of an image scanned into its memory by e.g. a camera. Unfortunately not Mathematical Morphology program was then available for use on a PC. It was only years later, on a visit to the firm Leica Imaging Systems in Cambridge, England, that Ploem accidentally saw a CD with the Mathematical Morphology program that could run in Windows on a PC. He received a copy of this program on loan and immediately started to use it for digital painting experiments.thumb|left|  In the valley of the Eyne, Pyrenees Mountain flowers as the first topic for digital image analysisSince Ploem is a nature enthusiast, he started with the application of mathematical morphology programs to the image analysis of meadows covered with mountain flowers. To get inspiration for his art work he frequently made nature walks in the region of the Pyrenees known as the Cerdagne, and specifically in the Eyne valley also known as the La Valle des Fleurs. These first digital graphics of nature scenes were shown in his exposition at an regional art centre in the Pyrenees (Ossega, June, 1997).Scientific interest in computer graphics created with mathematical morphologyAs he was probably the first person to systematically use mathematical morphology for the creation of digital art, Ploems work attracted international attention and he was invited as a plenary speaker at an international mathematical conference in Amsterdam in 1998 to explain his new type of digital art. He also received an invitation to show his art work in an exposition at this conference. The organisers of this meeting asked Ploem to write a chapter on his novel technique for digital art in a book (Kluwer, ISBN 0-7923-5133-9) that was published on the occasion of this meeting.Exposition at universitiesWhen scientists in France became more aware of Ploem as a digital artist, they invited him for a symposium on Art et Science at the University of Caen, France (April, 2001). At the art exposition connected with this symposium, he presented 6 digital graphics that were dominated by chaotic transformations of rock art themes. A similar invitation was made by the University of Basel in Switzerland (April, 2002). His exposition of digital graphics in Basel also showed works which were created with the so called watershed transformation of Mathematical Morphology, resulting in pictures resembling mountain ranges.Acceptance of digital artGenerally spoken, digital art still suffers from a lack of acceptance by a wider public. One of the reasons may be that this type of art is sometimes difficult to understand or to explain. For Ploem as one of the early developers of digital graphics using image analysis, it was encouraging that the well known museum Fondation Beyeler in Basel, Switzerland already had a separate curator for digital art in 2002. At the time of his exposition in Basel he was invited for a discussion with this curator about the future of digital art. They discussed the massive interest in digital art while still waiting for the emergence of more significant digital art by young artists who have been growing up with computers. The words Digital Art typed in together in the advanced search made of Google now results in more than 300 million references! thumb|left|  David and Goliath (multiple image transformations) Portraits and architectureIn recent years Ploem has spent time studying more conventional topics in art like portraits and scenes with architecture. The availability of special mathematical morphology software such as the Top Hat transformation made his attempts at creating portraits rather interesting. This famous algorithm was developed by Fernand Meyer. As an assistant of Professor Jean Serra in the earlier mentioned Institute of Mathematical Morphology, he came to the University of Leiden, the Netherlands in order to write programs for the recognition of cancer cells visualized under the microscope. He is now director of this institute in Fontainebleau. The Top Hat algorithm enhances the recognition of structures mainly based on contrast in the image rather than on edge detection. If applied to a human face it makes a novel type of drawing that is different from a drawing made by most artists. If followed by several other MM image transformations, it can produce (digital) portraits characterized by structures that were not directly evident in the original picture.For the painting of scenes with architectural components Ploem used a program for 3D rendering, that permits structures drawn in 2 dimensions to be visualised in 3D. This enabled him to effectively use perspective in some of his paintings.Whatever the future judgment about the artistic value of Ploems art form will be, it is clear that he has created novel approaches for the creation of digital graphics on the basis of image analysis, and as such he can be considered as a real pioneer in this field.
14499988
Saint_Peters_Village
 refnum  03001189()Saint Peters is a community located in County, Pennsylvania. The village is a historic 19th century industrial company village at the Falls of French Creek in Warwick Township.Located in a narrow ravine along French Creek, Saint Peters has its origins in the French Creek iron mines established in 1845. In 1880, granite quarrying began and the Excursion House hotel opened, distinguishing the community as both an industrial village and recreational weekend retreat. The bulk of the residence and businesses were built following the hotels opening.Spurs of the and Northern and Delaware River and Lancaster railroad lines once ran through the village servicing the local mining, forging and quarrying operations. thumb|left|250px|Rocks on French CreekBy the early 1970s industrial operations had ceased and the village was developed by its owners as a local tourist destination. Owned until 1978 by the Knauer family, it subsequently changed hands several times and portions of it are now privately owned. Historical preservation efforts, however, have led to the appearance of the village today that is almost entirely of its historic period. Local ordinances prevent exterior alterations to historic structures and limit new construction in designated areas in and around the village. The main street, St. Peters Road, is lined with private residences, a hotel and restaurant, and number of small specialty shops. The boulder-strewn French Creek running directly adjacent is one of the areas most popular attractions.Saint Peters Village was entered onto the Register of Historic Places in 2003.ReferencesExternal links*http://www.livingplaces.com/PA/Chester_County/Warwick_Township/Saint_Peters.html*http://www.mindat.org/loc-4077.html
14518179
Verbena_californica
Verbena californica is a rare species of verbena known by the common names California vervain and Red Hills vervain. This flower is endemic to County, California, where it is known from ten or eleven occurrences in the Red Hills, a section of the Sierra Nevada foothills near Chinese Camp. It grows in moist woodland habitat, often on soils. It is a federally listed threatened species of the United States.This is a green herb about half a meter in height with a fuzzy stem and long, grasslike leaves. It bears spike inflorescences of tiny purple flowers.  This rare plant is threatened by a number of factors, including cattle grazing, trash dumping, mining, vehicles, and development in its habitat.(The Nature Conservancy) The plant reproduces asexually by sprouting from its underground bulb; this may be a factor in its limited distribution.(USFWS. Red Hills Vervain Species Account)ReferencesExternal links*Jepson Manual Treatment*USDA Plants Profile*Photo gallerycalifornica
14536976
Campaign_for_Human_Rights_in_the_Philippines
The Campaign for Human Rights in the Philippines (CHRP for short) is a small but highly active human rights watchdog based in the United Kingdom. It has the backing of the British T.U.C(http://www.unison.org.uk/file/A2866.pdf), International, and several educational institutions including a very close relationship with the of Oriental and African Studies.It is run by volunteers and has the support of cross-party members of both the House of Lords and House of Commons.Its aim is to highlight the 900+ extrajudicial political killings in the Philippines, and the second highest (to Iraq) murder rate of journalists in the world. Its motto, ...and justice for all, not only refers to the Philippine Constitution but to the fact that no one has been convicted of the extrajudicial killings in the Philippines.It is currently aiming to highlight Prince Andrews involvement with mining in the Philippines, and with the Philippine government. Both of which groups have been linked to killings in the country.Its current Chairman is Canon Barry Naylor.Recent activity includes a successful protest against the arrival of Gloria Macapagal-Arroyo, and her visit with Prince Andrew in his capacity as an ambassador for British business, and especially for companies interested in exploiting the countrys mining and energy resources. Guardian states that Amnesty highlighted political killings and disappearances, torture and arbitrary arrests, which may be one reason why the visit has been kept low-key, unlike at the presidents previous port of call in Spain, where she was publicly feted by King Carlos(People | Guardian daily comment | guardian.co.uk).Canon Barry Naylor of Leicester, president of the Campaign for Human Rights in the Philippines, who has found himself officially denounced as being in the pay of bin Laden by the Philippine President stated: As far as I was aware, my only funding is from the of England. References ( External links *Website of CHRP
14555687
Nyrstar
intl             yesNyrstar N.V is the worlds largest zinc metal producer and is also one of the worlds largest primary lead smelting and refining companies. It was formed on 31 August 2007 through a merger between the zinc alloys operations of the Belgian company Umicore and the zinc and lead smelting operations of the Australian zinc miner Zinifex. It claims to be the worlds largest producer of zinc.Incorporated in Belgium and with its corporate offices in Zrich (Switzerland), the company produces zinc and lead, as well as other products, such as silver, copper and gold. It has three segments: Smelting, which comprises the smelters, such as Auby (France), Balen (Belgium), Budel (Netherlands), Clarksville (United States), Hobart (Australia) and Port Pirie (Australia); Mining, which involves the Tennessee mines (United States), the Coricancha, the Contonga and Pucarrajo mines (Peru) and the zinc streaming agreement with the Talvivaara mine (Finland), and Other & Eliminations, which contains Galva 45 (France), GM Metal (France) and the eliminations of the intra-group transactions. During the year ended December 31, 2010, it produced approximately 1.076 million tons of zinc metal. On January 5, 2011, it acquired Farallon Mining Ltd. On July 19, 2010, it acquired the Contonga and Pucarrajo polymetallic mines in Peru. On July 7, 2010, it acquired the remaining 15% interest in the Coricancha mine in Peru. Operations  Mining  Zinc streaming agreements  Smelting  Other operations and development projects  Rights Offering On 29 October 2007, Nyrstar listed on the Euronext Brussels stock exchange through an public offering (IPO) and joined the BEL20 index in its annual reshuffle on 4 March 2008.() The firm lost its position in the index a year later.On May 5, 2011 Nyrstar announced that it had successfully completed the placement of its five-year 5.375% fixed rate bonds due 2016 (the Bonds) through a public offering in Belgium and Luxembourg. Due to strong demand the offering was increased from EUR 150 million to EUR 525 million and the subscription period, initially planned to close on 6 May 2011, has been closed early on 2 May 2011.(http://www.reuters.com/finance/stocks/NYR.BR/key-developments) Management  Board of directors * Julien De Wilde, Chairman Non-Executive* Roland Junck CEO, Director Executive* Peter Mansell, Director Non-Executive* Karel Vinck, Director Non-Executive* Ray Stewart, Director Non-Executive* Oyvind Hushovd, Director Non-Executive Management committee * Roland Junck Chief Executive Officer* Heinz Eigner Chief Financial Officer* Greg McMillan Chief Operating Officer* Russell Murphy Chief Human Resources Officer* Michael Morley Chief Corporate and Development OfficerFile:The Zinc Works and Incat.jpg|thumb|center|800px|Nyrstar zinc works at Lutana in Hobart, TasmaniaReferencesExternal links* de:Nyrstarfr:Nyrstarnl:Nyrstar
14569753
CASAR
CASAR Drahtseilwerk Saar GmbH is a rope producing company based in Kirkel, Germany. CASAR develops, produces and distributes Special Wire Ropes for cranes and other lifting devices. CASAR has 380 employees. The production capacity is 18.000ts (2007).HistoryThe company CASAR Drahtseilwerk Saar was founded in 1948 by consul Verreet . CASAR is an abbreviation for the French term Cblerie Sarroise. CASAR produced the first 8-strand ropes already in 1949 - in a time, where six-strand-ropes have been usual. CASAR became one of the leading manufacturer of Special Wire Ropes. The Mountain at EuroDisney for example works with a special designed rope from CASAR. On the OIPEEC mining conference in Athens, 2006, CASAR presented a new solution to decrease the weight of ropes, by using composite ropes(). In 2007, again on the OIPEEC, CASAR presented their results of this new developed rope, which shows interesting results.Since 2007 CASAR is part of WorldGroup, former WRCA( )( Cranes Today: WRCA buys CASAR).See also* ropeReferences(External links* CASAR website* WireCo Worldgroup website
14595509
Universidad_Nacional_de_Ingeniera_(Nicaragua)
The National University of Engineering () is located in Managua, Nicaragua.HistoryOn February 7, 1983, the Military Junta of National Reconstruction issued the Decree 1234 that founded the National University of Engineering (UNI). Previously, the engineering and architectural education in Nicaragua was located in the Autonomous University of Nicaragua (UNAN) and the Centroamericana (UCA).Nowadays, the UNI is one of the most prestigious universities in Nicaragua, it attends around 10,880 students, organized in six schools in three different campus, offering eleven specialties.BackgroundThe first signs of the discipline called engineering in Nicaragua go back to 1680, in the San Ramon Seminary located in the city of Leon, where were taught the first courses of arithmetic, geometry, algebra and physics; this seminary reached the level of university by royal decree on January 10, 1812. In 1881 was founded the School of Arts and Crafts in Managua under the direction of French engineers, for the education and guiding of railway train rails workers, this in response to the construction of the railway tracks at that time. This work would be the most influential focus in the development of the engineering.However, the genesis of UNI dates back to 1941, when it was created the School of Engineering under the leadership of the Engineer Julio Padilla Mendez. In August 1941, the recently created Central University of Nicaragua was joined to this effort and the result was the Faculty of Physics-Mathematics Sciences. In this Faculty were taught courses for the career of Civil Engineering, and an extension to the careers of Architecture, Mining Engineering and Electrical Engineering.The first graduation of civil engineers was in 1946; the graduated persons were: Anibal Arana, Emilio Cuadra, Salvador Garcia, Armando Hernandez, Francisco Molina and Emilio Jarqun. That year the Central University of Nicaragua was closed due to student protests against the regime of General Anastasio Somoza Garcia. The Faculty of Physics-Mathematics Sciences continues to run despite the governments actions against university community. In 1947 the University of Leon is elevated to a National University and the Faculty of Physics-Mathematics Sciences was joined to it.The Faculty of Physics-Mathematics Sciences until 1959 remains unchanged its curriculum and academic system. Since 1958, the year of University Autonomy, begins the analysis regarding the operation, academic performance, content of the curriculum and the insertion of new careers. In 1959, is being debated publicly about the deficiency in math presented by high school graduates who enter the career of Engineering, as well as the low graduation of 90 students graduated 3 or 5 nothing more, per year. In 1959 was publicly discussed the deficiency in math presented by high school graduates entering the engineering career as well as the low graduation. Only 3-5 graduated from an enrollment of 90 students. Starting this year was applied an examination for admission to applicants to engineering career. This examination was maintained until the year 1967 that was transformed into an examination of classification.In 1962, the founder of Faculty Engineer Julio Padilla Mendez died leaving a worthy example of perseverance and dedication to the training of engineers. The Deanship is assumed by one of the graduates of the second promotion Engineer Carlos Santos Berrotern.In 1964 was founded the School of Architecture, ascribed to the aforementioned Faculty, because before that professionals in the architecture made his professional education outside of Nicaragua. The Faculty of Physics-Mathematics Science expands its field with setting up the careers of Topography and Geodesy (1967) and short courses of Master Works and Industrial Supervisors (1972) and finally establishing the career of Agricultural Engineering.It is important to note that in this period there is a notable event for university life in the country. In 1964 the University Community of the Faculty of Physics-Mathematics Science successfully demanded the government delivery of 104 blocks of land. This release was in exchange for the land where was working the Faculty in the center of Managua City. In these areas began to be built in 1969 and relates to current Recinto Universitario Ruben Dario of the National Autonomous University of Nicaragua, Managua campus.In 1968 was approving the first curriculum transformation and, the new curriculum for the career of Civil Engineering.  This was developed based on the recommendations of the Second Round Table of Engineering Faculties of Central America. This transformation meant the updating of engineering education in line with the other Central American countries and the adoption of the semester system and the system of credits.The engineering education in Nicaragua was wide with the creation of the Centroamerican University (UCA) in 1961 in Managua City. In Engineering Faculty of UCA is created the Civil Engineering, Electromechanical Engineering and Chemical Industrial Engineering careers.The Engineering Faculty of  UCA rapidly expanding their field of training with the creation of eight specialties in the year 1980: Electrical Engineering, Electromechanical Engineering, Industrial Engineering, Industrial-Chemical Engineering, Civil Engineering, Civil-Management Engineering, Electronic Engineering and Computer Sciences.In 1979 after the victory of the Sandinista Popular Revolution, begins in higher education a profound transformation of the entire system. The most significant elements of this transformation are as follows:	Creation of the National Council for Higher Education (CNES, by its initials in Spanish) with the purpose of regulating and controlling the academic, financial and administrative activities of higher education institutions in the country.	Separation of UNAN in two campus: UNAN-Len and UNAN-Managua with the intention that both campuses would be autonomous.	Return to annual regime and blocks system removing the semester regime and the credit system.	Conformation of new curricula and programs of subjects from defining the areas of occupation of each of the specialties.	Relocation of careers and training courses to non-university centers involved.In October 1982, President of CNES Dr. Ernesto Castillo Martinez contacted the Engineer Juan Sanchez Barquero, proposing to coordinate a committee comprising the Dean of Engineering at the UCA and the dean of the Faculty of Physical-Mathematics Science of the UNAN, to found an institution of higher education linking engineering and architecture education in Nicaragua to initiate activities in 1983.In February 1983 by Decree 1234 of the Governing Board of National Reconstruction the National University of Engineering began serving on the teaching of engineering and architecture with a planning stage of education technology. According to Engineer Juan Sanchez Barquero, chancellor founder, a study was conducted during the first year of operation for the purpose of estimating the demand for professionals who needed the country based on investment projects to be executed at that time. This with the aim of not wasting the resources of the state and thus achieve a good investment in education*.Creation of the unique Technological Institute of NicaraguaThe birth of the UNI was not easy, because Nicaragua was threatened with invasion by the United States of America due to the reforms introduced by the Sandinista Revolution. At the beginning there were limited resources, therefore the University Council decided to organize a foundation for development of the UNI involving government institutions to support transportation, materials and aids in the development of practical classes of students.In addition, this foundation is proposed to get the cooperation of other countries, visiting embassies and explaining that it was of utmost priority for the country train engineers. The responses were impressive, because in a short time managed to gain the support of 28 embassies. Countries such as Germany, France, Cuba, United States, Peru, Venezuela, Soviet Union, Brazil, Mexico and Centroamerican universities offered a world of possibilities.On the other hand, the ambassadors visited the infrastructure of the former Immaculate College destroyed by the earthquake of 1972, and observed the physical limitations of the site and found the will to work for human beings involved in the academic project. Then they signed cooperation agreements made support for the construction of laboratories and to train university teachers.It was a time of searching, of overcoming and international solidarity, was a great event. We had up to 30 foreign teachers of high academic standing who left his family and resigned to earn excellent wages in their respective countries for the sole purpose of supporting the development of UNI, Engineer Julio Maltez said, the first general secretary of UNI.It was amazing that during the American assault came a dean of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology (MIT) to join us for coffee breaks. Another memorable event was a dean of the Polytechnic University of Madrid do the same. Everything was magic, was a universal communication, without ideological flags, which made us overcome the challenge, Engineer Juan Sanchez Barquero said.It was so obvious the international support that in 1985 the Pan American Health Environmental Engineering in the National University of Engineering.3Academic challenges of the new millenniumIn the initial period, UNI focused on teaching at the undergraduate. It developed some activity in research and extension around DINOT, also started some activity in the postgraduate program with the first two masters degrees in the INGAM. Highlights in this period the opening of training programs for teachers in the Project SAREC-KTH linked to the Faculty of Engineering Chemistry (FIQ) and the Faculty of Electrotechnology and Computer (FEC).In the intermediate stage is placing priority on the activity of teaching and increase efforts to enhance research work. Efforts are made to define lines of research that would provide answers to the scientific-technical problems of Nicaragua, strengthened and expanded research programs in the faculties and INGAM, this became the Research and Teaching Environment Program, PIDMA, prioritizing research in various areas of Environment and were developed five technical cooperation projects with international support. In Biomass several projects were developed on an industrial scale. Was organized research groups, including renewable energy and conducted the first forums, conferences, to explain the scientific production.At the stage of maturity driven are different expressions of the University Extension focusing on increasing the presence of the university in companies and municipalities. Was founded the Cleaner Production Center (CPML) with support from ONUDI. Creating programs to ensure the linkage as the Promoting the Municipal Development Program (FODMU), Care Enterprises Program (PAE) and Public Policy Program (PPP). In addition, agreements were signed with state institutions, municipal governments and enterprises. Were opened instances in some faculties to develop outreach university.In scientific research efforts have been made to develop a culture of research in the university community. Mechanisms have been established for the purpose of involving greater number of teachers and students. These calls are designed to select projects that provide answers to the problems of Nicaragua and are funded through the budget allocated to UNI.A highlight fact is the creation of the Research and Development Vicechancellorship (VRIyD) in 1998.4External links* Official website of the Universidad Nacional de Ingeniera (UNI)References* http://www.uni.edu.ni/historia.php*Dr. Juan Espinoza Cuadra,http://www.uni.edu.ni/historia.php; http://poemasdejuanespinozacuadra.blogspot.com/*3 Dr. Juan Espinoza Cuadra,http://www.uni.edu.ni/historia.php; http://poemasdejuanespinozacuadra.blogspot.com/*4Dr. Juan Espinoza Cuadra,http://www.uni.edu.ni/historia.php; http://poemasdejuanespinozacuadra.blogspot.com/Nacional de Ingeniera (Nicaragua)
14611016
Imaging_informatics
IntroductionImaging Informatics, also known as Radiology Informatics or Medical Imaging Informatics, is a subspecialty of Informatics that aims to improve the efficiency, accuracy, usability and reliability of medical imaging services within the healthcare enterprise.() It is devoted to the study of how information about and contained within medical images is retrieved, analyzed, enhanced, and exchanged throughout the medical enterprise. As radiology is an inherently data-intensive and technology-driven specialty of medicine, radiologists have become leaders in Imaging Informatics. However, with the proliferation of digitized images across the practice of medicine to include fields such as cardiology, dermatology, surgery, gastroenterology, obstetrics, gynecology and pathology, the advances in Imaging Informatics are also being tested and applied in other areas of medicine. Various industry players and vendors involved with medical imaging, along with IT experts and other biomedical informatics professionals, are contributing and getting involved in this expanding field. Imaging informatics exists at the intersection of several broad fields:*biological science - includes bench sciences such as biochemistry, microbiology, physiology and genetics*clinical services - includes the practice of medicine, bedside research, including outcomes and cost-effectiveness studies, and public health policy*science - deals with the acquisition, retrieval, cataloging, and archiving of information*physics / engineering - entails the use of equipment and technology for a medical purpose*science - studying human computer interactions, usability, and information visualization*science - studying the use of computer algorithms for applications such as computer assisted diagnosis and computer visionAreas of InterestKey areas relevant to Imaging informatics include:*Archiving and Communication System (PACS) and Component Systems*Imaging Informatics for the Enterprise*Image-Enabled Medical Records*Radiology Information Systems (RIS) and Hospital Information Systems (HIS)*Digital acquisition*processing and enhancement*Image compression*visualization and multimedia*recognition*diagnosis (CAD).*Imaging facilities design*Imaging vocabularies and ontologies*mining from images databases*the Radiological Interpretation Process (TRIP)(TRIP - an initiative between the then of Computer Applications in Radiology (SCAR), now known as the Society of Imaging Informatics in Medicine (SIIM) http://www.scarnet.net/trip/html/What_is_TRIP.htm)*DICOM, HL7 and other standards*Workflow and modeling and simulation*assurance*Archive integrity and security*Teleradiology*Radiology informatics education*imagingTrainingRadiologists who wish to pursue sub-specialty training in this field can undergo fellowship training in Imaging Informatics. Medical Imaging Informatics Fellowships are done after completion of Board Certification in Diagnostic Radiology, and may be pursued concurrently with other sub-specialty radiology fellowships.The American Board of Imaging Informatics (ABII) also administers a certification examination for Imaging Informatics Professionals.ReferencesExternal links*The Society for Imaging Informatics in Medicine*American Board of Imaging Informatics
14630215
Yanzhou_Coal_Mining_Co._Ltd.
#REDIRECT Coal Mining Company
14640630
Iferouane
Image:Air massif sat map south.png|right|thumb|300px|Map of the southern Mountains.Iferouane (), also spelled Iferouan, is an oasis town in northern Niger, in Department. It is located northwest of Arlit in the northern Ar,()in the Ighazar valley()near the Tamgak Range.()Iferouane is also the location of the headquarters of the Ar and Tnr Natural Reserves, a Heritage Site covering more than .()The Project for the Conservation and Management of the Natural Resources of the Ar-Tnr, a venture between the government of Niger, the Conservation Union (IUCN), and the Wide Fund for Nature (WWF), is also based in Iferouane.(The town has one airport: Airport . History The Mission, a French military expedition led by Foreau and Lamy, spent a number of months at Iferouane in 1899. The expedition stopped at Iferouane on February 24, 1899 to acquire additional animals, their number having dwindled from 1,004 to 585, and departed on June 10, 1899, heading for Agadez. During this time, the force faced multiple attacks by Tuareg nomads and saw the size of its caravan dwindle from 585 camels to 75.()()During Nigers colonial period, Iferouane was the northernmost military outpost in the colony.( In 1964, a few years after independence, the population of Iferouane cercle was approximately 10,000.() Second Tuareg Rebellion Iferouane was the site of the first attack carried out by the Movement for Justice (MNJ),()which marked the beginning of the Tuareg Rebellion. Numerous clashes between rebel and government forces subsequently took place near the town, including an attack in early December 2007 against a supply convoy heading for Iferouane that resulted in the deaths of three soldiers and, according to the government, eight rebels.()()In October 2007, the president of the SOS Ifrouane Initiative, a local organisation involved with delivering supplies to the town, reported that  due to the insecurity caused by the rebellion  the residents of Iferouane had been without food for a number of weeks. He also reported an increase in the incidence of malaria and diarrhea among the towns residents.()In November, Iferouanes mayor reported that the towns entire population  approximately 5,000 residents  had left due to shortages of food, the Tuareg rebellion, and harassment by the army. The central government, based in Niamey, confirmed that supplies to the town were blocked due to the mining of roads by rebels, but denied that the town had been emptied.()In November 2008, a France International reporter visited the town and described it as empty of inhabitants, with the entire population having fled to Arlit or Agadez.() During 2009, the inhabitants started to return and by September, about 90% of the population had returned and agriculture had restarted, despite damaged infrastructure.(.) Climate Iferouane receives, on average, in excess of 50 mm of rainfall per year, which falls in the course of a few heavy downpours during the summer months.()Mean rainfall per annum was  from 1940 to 1989, and  between 1990 and 2004.()Temperatures as low as  and as high as  have been recorded.( See also * Aouderas* Timia* mining References de:Iferouaneet:Iferouneru:
14659955
Sam_Waller_Museum
The Sam Waller Museum is dedicated to preserving the history and artifacts of this region of northern Manitoba.  The collections include Nations, fur trading, mining, transportation (from the steamboat to the railway and aviation era). The museum is located in the old courthouse, located in downtown Pas, Manitoba.The highlight of the museums year is the Northern Manitoba Trappers Festival held annually in mid-February in The Pas, Manitoba.External links* Sam Waller Museum* Northern Manitoba Trappers Festival
14660718
Geometallurgy
Geometallurgy relates to the practice of combining geology or geostatistics  with metallurgy, or, more specifically, metallurgy, to create a spatially- or geologically-based predictive model for processing plants.  It is used in the hard rock mining industry for risk management and mitigation during mineral processing plant design.  It is also used, to a lesser extent, for production planning in highly variable ore deposits.There are four important components or steps to developing a geometallurgical program,(Bulled, D., and McInnes, C:  Flotation plant design and production planning through geometallurgical modeling.  Centenary of Flotation Symposium, Brisbane, QLD, 6-9.  June 2005.):*the geologically-informed selection of a number of ore samples*laboratory-scale test work to determine the ores response to mineral processing operations*the distribution of these parameters throughout the orebody using an accepted geostatistical technique*the application of a mining sequence plan and mineral processing models to generate a prediction of the process plant behaviorSample selectionThe sample mass and size distribution requirements are dictated by the kind of mathematical model that will be used to simulate the process plant, and the test work required to provide the appropriate model parameters.  Flotation testing usually requires several kg of sample and grinding/hardness testing can required between 2 and 300 kg.(McKen, A., and Williams, S.:  An overview of the small-scale tests required to characterize ore grindability. International Autogenous and Semi-Autogenous Grinding Technology 2006, Vancouver, Canada, 2006)The sample selection procedure is performed to optimize granularity, sample support, and cost.  Samples are usually samples composited over the height of the mining bench.(Amelunxen, P. et al:  Use of geostatistics to generate an orebody hardness dataset and to quantify the relationship between sample spacing and the precision of the throughput estimate.  Autogenous and Semi-Autogenous Grinding Technology 2001, Vancouver, Canada, 2006)  For hardness parameters, the variogram often increases rapidly near the origin and can reach the sill at distances significantly smaller than the typical drill hole collar spacing.  For this reason the incremental model precision due to additional test work is often simply a consequence of the limit theorem, and secondary correlations are sought to increase the precision without incurring additional sampling and testing costs.  These secondary correlations can involve multi-variable analysis with other, non-metallurgical, ore parameters and/or domaining by rock type, lithology, alteration, mineralogy, or structural domains.(Amelunxen, P.:  The application of the SAG Power Index to ore body hardness characterization for the design and optimization of comminution circuits, M. Eng. Thesis, Department of Mining, Metals and Materials Engineering, McGill University, Montreal, Canada, Oct. 2003. International Autogenous and Semi-Autogenous Grinding Technology 2006, Vancouver, Canada, 2006)(Preece, Richard.  Use of point samples to estimate the spatial distribution of hardness in the Escondida porphyry copper deposit, Chile. International Autogenous and Semi-Autogenous Grinding Technology 2006, Vancouver, Canada, 2006)Test workThe following tests are commonly used for geometallurgical modeling:* Bond ball mill work index test(Allis Chalmers.  Crushing, Screening and Grinding Equipment, Metallic Ore Mining Industry.  Rock Grinding - Training Session.  White Paper, Undated.)* Modified or comparative Bond ball mill index(Smith, R.W., and Lee, K.H..  A comparison of data from Bond type simulated closed-circuit and Batch type grindability tests.  Transactions of the SME.  March 1961 - 91.)(Berry, T.F., and Bruce, R.W., A simple method fo determining the grindability of ores. Canadian Gold Metallurgists, July 1966. pp 63)* Bond rod mill work index and Bond low energy impact crushing work index (Barratt, D.J., and Doll, A.G., Testwork Programs that Deliver Multiple Data Sets of Comminution Parameters for Use in Mine Planning and Project Engineering, Procemin 2008, Santiago, Chile, 2008)* SMC test(Morrell, S.  Design of AG/SAG mill circuits using the SMC test.  International Autogenous and Semi-Autogenous Grinding Technology 2006, Vancouver, Canada, 2006)* JK drop-weight test(Mineral Comminution Circuits:  Their Operation and Optimisation.  ed. Napier-Munn, T.J., Morrell, S., Morrison, R.D., and Kojovic, T. JKMRC, The University of Queensland, 1996.)* Point load index test* Sag Power Index test (SPI(R)) (Kosick, G., and Bennett, C.  The value of orebody power requirement profiles for SAG circuit design.  Proceedings of the 31st Annual Canadian Mineral Processors Conference.  Ottawa, Canada, 1999.)* MFT test (Dobby, G., Kosick, G., and Amelunxen, R.  A focus on variability within the orebody for improved design of flotation plants.  Proceedings of the Canadian Mineral Processors Meeting, Ottawa, Canada, 2002)* FKT, SKT, and SKT-WS tests (www.aminpro.com.  Aminpro - FKT, SKT and SKT-WS flotation kinetic testwork procedures.  2009.)GeostatisticsBlock kriging is the most common geostatistical method used for interpolating metallurgical index parameters and it is often applied on a domain basis.(Dagbert, M., and Bennett, C., Domaining for geomet modelling:  a statistical/geostatical approach. International Autogenous and Semi-Autogenous Grinding Technology 2006, Vancouver, Canada, 2006.)   Classical geostatistics require that the estimation variable be additive, and there is currently some debate on the additive nature of the metallurgical index parameters measured by the above tests.  The SPI(r) value is known not to be an additive parameter, however errors introduced by block kriging are not thought to be significant .(Amelunxen, P.:  The application of the SAG Power Index to ore body hardness characterization for the design and optimization of comminution circuits, M. Eng. Thesis, Department of Mining, Metals and Materials Engineering, McGill University, Montreal, Canada, Oct. 2003.)(Walters, S., and Kojovic, T., Geometallurgical Mapping and Mine Modeling (GEM3) - the way of the future.  International Autogenous and Semi-Autogenous Grinding Technology 2006, Vancouver, Canada, 2006)  These issues, among others, are being investigated as part of the Amira P843 research program on Geometallurgical mapping and mine modelling.Mine plan and process modelsThe following process models are commonly applied to geometallurgy:* The Bond equation* The SPI calibration equation, CEET (Dobby, G. et al., Advances in SAG circuit design and simulation applied to the mine block model.  Autogenous and Semi-Autogenous Grinding Technology 2001, Vancouver, Canada, 2006)* FLEET(** SMC model(Morrell, S.,A new autogenous and semi-autogenous mill model for scale-up, design, and optimisation.  Minerals Engineering 17 (2004) 437-445.)* Aminpro-Grind, Aminpro-Flot models (www.aminpro.com, 2009)See also*metallurgy*Geostatistics*Mining*ProcessingNotes(General references*Isaaks, Edward H., and Srivastava, R. Mohan. An Introduction to Applied Geostatistics.  Oxford University Press, Oxford, NY, USA, 1989.*David, M., Handbook of Applied Advanced Geostatistical Ore Reserve Estimation.  Elsevier, Amsterdam, 1988.*Mineral Processing Plant Design, Practice, and Control - Proceedings.  Ed. Mular, A., Halbe, D., and Barratt, D.  Society for Mining, Metallurgy, and Exploration, Inc. 2002.*Mineral Comminution Circuits - Their Operation and Optimisation.  Ed. Napier-Munn, T.J., Morrell, S., Morrison, R.D., and Kojovic, T.  JKMRC, The University of Queensland, 1996
14670006
Red_Dog_mine
The Red Dog mine is a zinc and lead mine located in a remote region of the Arctic, within the boundaries of the Red Dog Mine place in the Northwest Arctic Borough of the state of Alaska.The mine is the worlds largest producer of zinc and has the worlds largest zinc reserves.(http://www.commerce.state.ak.us/oed/minerals/pub/InfoCirc_058Final.pdf)() Red Dog accounts for 10% of the worlds zinc production.(The Giant Red Dog Massive Sulfide Deposit Dr. David Leach. Pesquisador do USGS e Conferencista da Society of Economic Geologists) Red Dog accounted for 55% of the mineral value produced in Alaska in 2008.( In 2008 the mine produced 515,200 tons (507,100 LT; 567,900 ST) of zinc, 122,600 metric tons (120,700 LT; 135,100 ST) of lead, and 283 metric tons (9,100,000 ozt) of silver, for a total metal value of over one billion dollars.( At the end of 2008 the mine had reserves of 61,400,000 metric tons (60,400,000 LT; 67,700,000 ST) of zinc at a grade of 17.1% and 61,400,000 tonnes (60,400,000 LT; 67,700,000 ST) of lead at a grade of 4.5%, as well as significant additional zinc and lead in the less well-measured resource category.(Teck Cominco, Annual Information Report, March 13, 2009)Red Dog is located on land owned by the Regional Corporation and is operated by the commercial mining company Teck Resources in partnership with Development Corporation.(Zinc Mining  Red Dog Mine. Teck Cominco Ltd.) Ore concentrate taken from the mine is trucked westward to a shipping facility on the Sea and stored there until the shipping season.The mine, which produces from an open pit, is expected to exhaust its currently-permitted ore in 2012. Teck Cominco has applied for permits to expand mining into the Aqqaluk orebody, immediately adjacent to the current pit, containing an additional 56 million metric tons (62 million short tons) of lead and zinc ore. The expansion would keep the mine operating until 2031.(Environmental Protection Agency pulls approval of Red Dog water permit, Mining Engineering, Nov. 2007, p.16.)HistoryIn the mid-1950s, pilots and geologists noted mineral staining in the region. In 1968 a U.S. Geological Survey geologist sampled rocks and stream sediments in the area, including samples from the future site of the Red Dog mine, and named Red Dog Creek after the red dog of local pilot Bob Baker, a frequent flier in the area (Tailleur; USGS Open File 70-319).(Tailleur; USGS Open File 70-319) In the mid and late 1970s, interest in the area from major mining companies and NANA intensified. In 1980 the National Interest Lands Conservation Act (ANILCA) became law and NANA officially selected the land underlying the deposits. Drill exploration of the deposits began in 1980, by Cominco American. In 1982 NANA and Cominco American (a mining company that had staked the land, and later became Teck Cominco) signed an agreement to develop the deposit. In 1986 the State of Alaska agreed to fund and take ownership of a road (DeLong Mts. Transportation System) from Red Dog to the coast, and a shallow-water port site. Also in 1986, residents of Kotzebue and 10 other area villages voted to form the Northwest Arctic Borough, to be economically based on taxing the Red Dog mine. Construction of the road, port site, and mine began in July 1987. Mine operations commenced in December 1989.(Alaska Resource Data File, USGS Open File 00-23, p.2.)EconomicsUnder the terms of the Teck Cominco/NANA agreement, NANA received royalties of 4.5% until the capital costs of the mine were recovered, which occurred in late 2007. At this point, the royalty due to NANA increased to 25%, and will increase by an additional 5% every year, to a maximum of 50%. Under the terms of the Native Claims Settlement Act of 1971 (ANSCA), which created NANA and the other native corporations in Alaska, NANA must share approximately half of its profits from natural resources with the other eleven land-based regional native corporations. If the mine remains profitable at the current level, this will mean a distribution of several hundred million dollars a year of mine profits to the regional native corporations.(http://www.alaskajournal.com/stories/090907/foc_20070909003.shtmlwebpage, Red Dog mine tightens belt, produces record profit, Alaska Journal of Commerce, 9 Sept, 2007)(http://www.adn.com/money/industries/native_corporations/story/9480170p-9391345c.htmlNatives in for big Royalty Boost as mine reaches Profitability; Anchorage Daily News; 26 Nov 2007)GeologyThe Red Dog area has the worlds largest known zinc deposits: the four at Red Dog as well as Anarraak and Su-Lik, respectively  northwest. They are stratiform massive sulfide bodies hosted in Carboniferous black shale and carbonates.(http://www.alaskaminers.org/abstracts2002.pdf)Mesozoic mountain-building tectonic events (i.e. the Brookian orogen that built the Range) deformed and faulted the sedimentary strata that host the deposits and the deposits themselves. Subsequent uplift and erosion exposed parts of the deposits at todays earth surface.(http://econgeol.geoscienceworld.org/cgi/content/abstract/99/7/1415Structure of the Red Dog District, WesternBrooks Range Alaska; DeVera, J., etal; Economic Geology; Nov 2004, v.9; n.7; p.1451-1434)Red Dog is an example of a sedimentary exhalative deposit, with the zinc-lead ore considered to have been deposited on the sea floor as a strata of sulfide sediment.() Zinc, lead, silver, and barium were deposited in black muds and carbonates on or beneath the seafloor, in a deep quiet ocean basin, some 338 million years ago in the Mississippian period.(LRombach and Layer;Economic Geology;Nov 2004;v.99;no.7;p.1307-1322.)Fluids probably percolated through a huge mass (hundreds of square kilometers) of sediments. The nature of the fluids caused them to absorb and concentrate trace amounts of zinc and lead contained in the rocks the fluids were passing through. These metals were then caused to precipitate, by chemical or biological or physical agents, from the fluid onto or into the seafloor to form the Red Dog deposits.One model holds that very saline brines formed in a restricted ocean basin within a hundred kilometers of the site of the Red Dog deposits. The brine fluid infiltrated the subsurface and was tectonically pumped through the rock mass, becoming enriched in metals as it stripped those metals from the rocks it passed through. The fluid traveled several kilometers below the earths surface. The fluid eventually reemerged through fault systems focused on the location of the Red Dog deposits, in a manner somewhat similar to the process surrounding black smokers.(Leach, et al.;Economic Geology;Nov 2004;v.99;no.7;p.1449-1480.)Reserves and resourcesOre bodies and contained zinc at Red Dog consist of;*Main pit ore body with 19.5 million metric tons (21.5 million short tons)of ore containing 20.5% zinc. The figures represent the orebody before mining began in 1989. This is the currently permitted area of active mining, which is expected to be mined out by 2012. The ultimate size of this pit will be 5,200 ft by 3,000 ft by 400 ft (1,600 m x 900 m x 120 m) deep.*Aqqaluk ore body with 55.7 million metric tons (61.4 million short tons) at 16% zinc. This is adjacent to the Main pit. It is well understood geologically and metallurgically. A Supplemental Environmental Impact Statement is expected to be produced in 2008 as part of the process of permitting the development of this ore body. Most of the waste rock from this operation is expected to be placed in the depleted Main pit.*Qanaiyaq ore body with 4.7 million metric tons (5.2 million short tons) at 23.7% zinc. Also an open-pit target, studies of the ore characteristics of Qanaiyaq continue.*The Paalaaq ore body with 13 million metric tons (14.3 million short tons) at 15% zinc and the Anarraaq ore body with 17.2 million metric tons (19.0 million short tons) at 15% zinc are both deep underground and will be accessed by tunnels and shafts, if they are eventually mined.((http://www.alaskajournal.com/stories/110407/nat_20071104022.shtmlAlaska Journal of Commerce, 4 Nov, 2007)GeographyRed Dog mine is located at  (68.071989, -162.876044). It is in the DeLong Mountains in the remote western Range about 90 miles (144 km) north of Kotzebue and 55 miles (88 km) from the Sea.RegionalThe mine lies within the Northwest Arctic Borough, the boundaries of which are exactly coincident with the boundaries of the NANA Regional Corporation. The borough, which is approximately the size of Indiana, has only 11 communities and a population of only 7,208 people, 84% of which are native or part native, and 40% of which report speaking native at home. No roads connect the communities. The nearest permanent settlements to the mine, roughly  west and  south respectively, are the villages of Kivalina, population 377, and Noatak, population 428, at the 2000 census.Although native populations have historically used areas around the mine and port for seasonal food-gathering there are no permanent residents at the mine or port site. The workforce consists of about 460 employees and contractors, of which somewhat more than half will be on-site at any given time. All staff work on a rotation, most on either a 4 weeks on/2 weeks off or 2 week on/1 week off schedule. At the mine, everybody stays in the single large housing unit, tucked in among the process buildings near the edge of the open pit. A small portion of the work force stays at the port site. NANA shareholders comprise 56% of the mines workforce.((Operation and Site Performance 2006 Red Dog Mine, Teck Cominco Limited))The Red Dog mine provides over a quarter of the boroughs wage and salary payroll. While many of the boroughs residents benefit from the mine and associated economic activities, virtually all of the boroughs residents rely on subsistence activities which are dependent on a healthy environment.(Alaska Economic Trends, Alaska Department of Labor, Vol. 19, Num. 1, January 1999.)Environmental concernsBefore discovery of the mineral deposits at Red Dog, the creek draining the deposit was too toxic to support life. It now meets drinking-water standards. On June 13, 2007 the State of Alaska removed two creeks (Red Dog Creek and Ikalukrok Creek) near the Red Dog mine in Northwest Alaska from the most-polluted waters list with EPAs approval.() The mine discharges treated water into Red Dog Creek, a tributary of Ikalukrok Creek. Pre-mining studies on Red Dog Creek revealed naturally high concentrations of cadmium, lead, zinc, aluminum, and other metals. Before mining began, aquatic life uses were not present in the main stem of Red Dog Creek because of the natural toxic concentrations and low pH. After mining began, year-round release of treated mine wastewater allowed a population of Arctic Grayling to establish themselves in Red Dog Creek. That fish population is now protected by regulations.()Toxic waste releasesAccording to the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), Red Dog Mine creates more toxic waste than any other operation in the United States. But, almost all (over 99%) of the toxic waste reported by Red Dog is just rocks (waste rock and tailings) which naturally contain >2% sulfide minerals, thus making them reportable as toxic waste.() All of the waste rock and tailings material remains in permanent disposal on-site, contained, and treated as necessary by the mine operations. The EPA notes about Red Dogs rank, No conclusions on the potential risks can be made based solely on this information.(facilities.tcl?fips_state_codeEntire%20United% 20States&typemass&categorytotal_env&modifierna&sic_2All%20reporting% 20sectors&how_many100 Pollution Rankings by Facility. Scorecard.org)Leaching of metals and acids from waste rocks into the environment is a valid concern. The waste rock piles are contained and all runoff water is monitored and treated to water quality standards.( Monitoring, and mitigation if necessary, will need to continue throughout the mine life and for many decades after mine closure.Heavy metals (lead and cadmium) in mosses adjacent to the haul roadA 2001 study for the National Park Service (NPS) reports in its Executive Summary that,Concentrations of Cd and Pb...exceed medians (and in most cases maxima) from all 28countries in the Nordic moss monitoring program, including many of the most pollutedcountries in Central and Eastern Europe and all areas of western Russia.(Heavy Metals in Mosses and Soils on Six Transects Along the Red Dog Mine Haul Road Alaska Western Arctic National Parklands National Park Service Jesse Ford, Ph.D.,Linda Hasselbach, M.S.,May 2001,NPS/AR/NRTR-2001/38http://www.mveirb.nt.ca/upload/project_document/1192211966_Heavy%20Metals%20in%20Mosses%20and%20Soil%20report.p)That sentence is often misunderstood as a comparison of levels of pollution at Red Dog to levels of pollution at industrial sites elsewhere. The 2001 NPS study does not comparepollution at Red Dog to pollution at polluted sites in Europe: it does not conclude that theRed Dog area is more polluted than the worst-polluted areas of Central and Eastern Europe or western Russia. There are hundreds of sites in Central and Eastern Europe and western Russia that are incomparably more polluted than the Red Dog area, e.g., Dzerzinsk and Norilsk in Russia,(Untitled) Chernobyl in Ukraine, and Baia Mare in Romania (Journal of Radioanalytical and Nuclear Chemistry, Vol. 254, No. 1 (2002) 109115 Atmospheric deposition of heavy metals around the lead and copper-zinc smelters in Baia Mare, Romania, studied by the moss biomonitoring technique, neutron activation analysis and flame atomic absorption spectrometry, O. A. Culicov,1 M. V. Frontasyeva,1* E. Steinnes,2 O. S. Okina,3 Zs. Santa,4 R.Todoran4http://www.geo.edu.ro/sgr/mod/downloads/PDF/Culicov-JRNCh-2002.pdf)(Reuters AlertNet - (OFFICIAL)Worst polluted sites in Russia, China, India)The statement quoted above compares samples collected in 2001 adjacent to Red Dog industrial activity to samples collected for the Nordic moss monitoring program: samples which are deliberately collected as far from urban and industrial areas as possible. The Nordic moss monitoring program follows a protocol that demands that samples be collected at least 300 meters from a road and that samples be collected in non-urban areas. Significantly, samples for the study at Red Dog included the loose dust on the moss, while the Nordic moss monitoring program moss samples were shaken to remove dust.(Rhling  and Steinnes E. 1998. Atmospheric heavy metal deposition in Europe 1995- 1996. NORD 98:15. Nordic Council of Ministers, Copenhagen)The 2001 NPS study also collected and analyzed soil samples at the moss-collection sites: no elevated levels of lead or cadmium were detected. Additional studies conclude that the concentrations of heavy metals detected in water, soil, caribou, fish, and berry samples collected from the Red Dog mine area do not pose a public health hazard.(The Alaska Division of Public Health will evaluate the data generated by the fish monitoring project from a public health pers) It is generally agreed that years of operation of tarp-top haul trucks (one every 15 minutes) carrying lead-zinc concentrate resulted in lead and cadmium-bearing dust contamination along the edges of the haul road. Fortunately this poor practice has not resulted in a threat to human safety. The entire concentrate-haulage system has been improved, including tight-fitting seals on side-dump trucks and enclosure of conveyor belts at the port site.(State of Alaska, DEC - Division of Air Quality - Teck-Cominco Red Dog Mine)Measurable direct effects of the mine on human healthRepeated testing of blood samples from area villagers, and repeated testing of area villagewater supplies have shown no elevated levels of lead or other heavy metals. Blood tests of mine workers, for lead levels, are done regularly. A few mine workers have experienced elevated lead levels.(The Alaska Division of Public Health will evaluate the data generated by the fish monitoring project from a public health pers)Proposed port site expansionLocal inhabitants have expressed concerns that the proposed expansion of docking facilities may detrimentally change the migratory patterns of marine life.TransportationA  long haul road connects the mine to the mines port site on the Chukchi Sea. The mine and port site are accessible only by air, except during the 100-day shipping season. Mine workers from remote villages in the region are ferried to the mine on small aircraft. Airlines is contracted by the mine to fly other mine workers out of Anchorage. Until 2007, gravel-strip capable Boeing 737-200 Combi aircraft were used. These ships have a cargo door in the front part of the aircraft and a separate rear passenger cabin. In 2005 the runway was paved, in anticipation of newer Boeing 737-400 Combi aircraft which are not equipped to land on gravel.()See also* exhalative deposits* mine drainage* rehabilitation* mining* MetallurgyReferencesExternal links*NANA Regional Corporation*Red Dog Mine
14681527
Periphery_(BattleTech)
The Periphery is the outer spacial area surrounding the Sphere within the fictional universe of BattleTech.Within the BattleTech universe, the residents of the Periphery are seen by their counterparts within the Inner Sphere as barbarians and pirates, even though several nation-states within the Periphery are just as capable of waging war on a scale on thought possible by the Inner Sphere armed forces for centuries.The Periphery can be defined in three ways: cultural, technological parameters, and physical distance from Terra, the homeworld of Humanity. Though the personalities across the Periphery are as diverse as the cultures of the Inner Sphere, this stunning diversity is due to the peoples independence and self-reliance.HistoryThe following is an abridgement of historical events related to the region of space designated as the Periphery within the fictional universe of BattleTech.The BeginningIn canon, during the time of mass colonization outside the Sol system colonies of what would become the Inner Sphere and Periphery were both colonized. Though the colonies closer to Terra were able to benefit and prosper while colonies farther had to survive solely on their own with almost no external support.The first extent of dissent among the colonies was the Outer Reaches Rebellion, the military forces of the Terran Alliance was unable to put down the rebellion thus causing great upheaval within the alliance. With change came a new policy with dealing with the rebellious colonies, forced self-sufficiency. This meant that colonies unfortunate to be outside of the thirty light-year radius of Terra were forced to survive on its own. This caused many that were on barely sustainable planets but still needed outside aid for support either moved to another colony or moved deeper into what would be called the Periphery in search of an habitable planet to colonize.Reunification WarThose that were able to survive outside of the Inner Sphere far from what would become the Age of War was soon to find themselves facing the heirs to the Great Houses and might of the States under the flag of unification and peace of the League.With end of the Age of War, came with the creation of the Star League led by First Lord Ian Cameron. The Star League and the Houses offensives were aimed at the Periphery due state to bring the rest of humanity under a single ruling. Also to weaken the Houses forces and bring more troops to fight directly under the banner of the Star League than their patron state.Following twenty years of war the major states within the periphery experienced much hardship and bloodshed but still had to submit to the will of the Star League. Even with submission the periphery states still were treated with discontent by their InnerSphere counter-parts.The Amaris CoupThe Star League Council, members of each member state, ruled and voted for a tax edict on the Periphery Territorial States as it ias called during the time of the Star League. The Periphery states rejected the edict due to the financial strain it would cause on their economies. Forcing then Richard Cameron II to order General Aleksandr Krensky to lead the Star League forces back into the Periphery to quell the rebellion.While the Star League forces fought and waged battle with the Periphery states, Stefen Amaris became close to the Camerons, pretending to sympathize with the ruling family. During a tragic event the First Lord was killed, leaving the son of Richard to inherit the throne. Unwilling to allow a boy to rule a vast interstellar empire, the Star League Council placed General Aleksandr Krensky as Regent and Protector of the Star League until the boy matured and was able to assume rule.Following the end of the coup and the Exodus of the SLDF from human space the Peiphery sates were left to nurse their wounds from waging war against the SLDF. This was in due part to the States waging war with each for the next few centuries during what would be called the Succession Wars.Major Periphery StatesThe Taurian ConcordatFounded as an attempt to develop a free, egalitarian state that would be free from the oppressive nature of the Terran Alliance. The concordat is located within and around the Haydes-Cluster, a spacial feature, within the fictional universe of Battletech. Samantha Calderon led a fleet of ships and colonist who wish to avoid another Outer Reaches Rebellion and the turmoil that came from it.The planets within the nebula were rich and habitable, a rare find as most planets within the fictional universe are usually hostile and barely capable of sustaining human life. After a century the concordat grew beyond its birthplace and colonized other planets outside the nebula.The concordat grew through colonization expand ever so, soon this success caused the Federated Suns, seeing the Periphery state as an easy target. Davion made pushes into Taurian territory which each was soon repulsed. Davion soon found that the concordats forces were more than willing to stop any invading force at all cost. Realizing that what seemed an easy target at first was in fact a animal that if backed into a corner would ensure that the entrapper would not come out unscathed.Following the incursions by Davion the Tuarina Defense Force stood alert for any attempt of aggression by the hated Davions. This was soon replaced by further colonization efforts ever again expanding the concordats region of controlled space ever further. Colonization efforts were multiplied with a sect of explorers named Far Lookers soon followed by tax cuts and economic sanctions that were to give  those that were willing to leave their past lives would have much beneficial chances at success.With the fourth Succession War came a change pf policy within the concordat. Fear of invasion od a new and stronger Federated Commonwealth caused much great concern to the leader of the nation. The TDF was placed on constant alert all tax exempts for colonization were revoked and many taxes were installed to fund the TDF. Time passed and with minor incidents that showed true invasion the ruling body of the Taurian Concordat felt that the rights of the people had been abused and neglected for to long stood against the Protector, ruling member of the Calderon family that represented the Taurian Concordat. The protector was replaced by another Calderon bringing much of the dissident groups back into line without any bloodshed spilled with the forced changed of rule.Magistracy of CanopusThe Magistracy of Canopus is an interstellar nation in the fictional setting of BattleTech.The magistracy was formed by defectors and soldiers from forces attached to the defense forces of Andurien, led by Kossandra Centrella, a captain of the Free Worlds League armed forces. After the creation of the magistracy, Kossandra realized that without expansion, the Houses Marik and Liao and other periphery states would attempt to conquer the newly created state. Negotiating deals with the two houses led to the rule of six more planets. A mere twenty years into the life span of the Magistracy, it had become a nation of thirty-six star systems. As years and decades passed, successive Magestrixes continued to build upon the foundation created by Kossandra Centrella. The Magistracy Armed Forces placed in a neutral defensive stance from creation would have to face the Star League Defense Force and regiments of Marik.The Magistracy, like all nation-states in the periphery, was sought after by  the Star Leagues First Lord; he wanted to bring all of humanity under a single banner, doing what no other person, government, or even ideology had done. The MAF and the populations of every world touched by the might of the invading forces fought to stem the invaders with the spirit found common among most periphery populists.What should have taken the Star League a mere year to conquer ended up taking two decades of non-stop fighting.  The Magistracy and its people wanted the freedom that their ancestors had come to find, and tried to make the cost too high for the Star League.  In the end, spirit and determination could not overwhelm the might of steel and industrial power the League wielded. With the end to the Runification war the magistracy enjoyed much wealth and the business supplied by many wanting to experience the fruits of the magistracys entertainment business, which changed from gambling to more illicit enterprises.With the Amaris Coup came the downfall of the magistracys economy, due to the loss of the entertainment sector, which was the main source of income for the nation; the coup and the following wars meant few outside the magistracy were willing to travel into hostile territory for an experience easily found within their own borders. Except for the Canopus-Taurian war, the armed forces of the magistracy saw very little action throughout the Succession Wars.Canopian-Anderian warShortly following the end of hostilities of the Fourth Succession War, the newly formed Federated Commonwealth and the Worlds League and Federation. The Magistrix seeing for a chance to turn the magistracy into a formidable power. Allied with the recently succeeded state of Andurien formerly of the Free Worlds League. Both parties believing that the weakened Capellan federation in part thanks to territorial losses due to the Fourth Succession War and the succession of the ST. Ives Province. Had weakened and demoralized Capellan troops and would allow their combined forces to overwhelm the smallest State within the InnerSphere.Even with the combined forces the allies were unable to concentrate as a single cohesive strike force forcing the two allies to fight on single fronts. Though initially several worlds fell with ease others bogged down until the war ended. Capellan forces learning from the Fourth Succession War instead of futile hold outs would retreat leaving the invading forces to deal with any local uprisings until what federation forces were able to muster for a counter-attack. Before the second phase of the invasion began, within the third year of the invasion Capellan forces began to retake former Liao holdings. Many Adurien and Canopian forces that were left to slow the advancing forces were drawn down causing both nations military much distress.With the end of the Canopus-Andurien war leadership of the magistracy changed with the daughter of Magistrix Kyalla taking rein as her mother was escorted out of her own palace by her own personal guards. Immediately supported by the council the new Magistrix, Emma Centrella, brokered an new peace with the FWL doing what no Magistrix before was able to do. Emma hero of the war with Liao began operations to rebuild the MAF and the economy of the magistracy developing it and spreading the once dsoley dominated entertainment industry adding several other key industries thus giving the magistracy the ability of limited self sustainability.Trinity AllianceIn a turn of events the magistracy allied to the Tuarien Concordat signed a treaty with Liao. Though many within the magistracy detested the treaty due to that many troops the canopus would fight wars to gain of the magistracy. The magistracy and Concordat used the Capellans wealth and industrial capabilities to increase the wealth of their own nations. Several units of the magistracy deploy within Capellan territory training along side once former enemies.Outworlds AllianceThe Outworlds Alliance is an interstellar nation within the peripheral region within fictional universe of BattleTech.Of all the governments within the Battletech universe the alliance was created with no intentions of grandeur of lust for power; but instead by shear need of a political group manage the needs of several planets that share the same ideals and beliefs. Admiral Julius Avellar appalled by the ever increasing destruction caused by the succession wars. Devoting himself the lifestyle of anit-way and denunciations of the warmongers of the InnerShpere.Though originally planned to live his remain life in peace, thought do to his writings. Such pleas to end wars that the great houses attracted many followers thus creating the Omniss. A philosophical sect advocating the rejection of technology that did not contribute to the advancement or preservation of life. Many seeking a new life-style flocked to Avellar and the Omniss flocked to Alpheratz.As the hundreds grew to be thousands and so forth, Alpheratz population boomed many spreading to nearby star systems bringing the teachings of Omniss with them. As the followers of Omniss grew to large for any one man to manage Avellar was forced to do the one thing he despised the most, the creation of a government to provide for the needs of the many followers of Omniss, resulting in the Outworlds alliance. Born out of necessity rather than desire.Alliance military forces form the creation of the alliance was non-existent only militias of volunteers forming together to defend against pirates or raiders. Though for the most of the first hundred years of the alliance used mainly diplomacy to avoid warfare and engagements with the Successor States armed forces.With the Reunification wars the Outworlds Alliance experienced very little of the fighting that the rest of the periphery experienced, at first the Star League defense forces easily overwhelmed what forces the alliance was willing to defend against the SLDF. Soon following the occupation Craconis forces during a riot caused many riots across the alliance. Using the fear of member states the alliance allowed Davion forces rights to occupation key alliance worlds under the guise of the Runification war. This enabled alliance forces to fight against the Draconis troops without fear of reprisal. With no end sight the Star League ended the war against the alliance with a treaty bringing the nation onto the fold of the Star League with the least amount of casualties suffered in the war.Through the Amaris Coup and the Succession wars the alliance fell victim to many economic depressions with views of technology so adamantly against the alliance had been unable to support itself without the aide of its two neighbors both wanting to cur favor from the periphery state. Due to its untapped resources and strategic location would give either party the ability to strike deep within the territory of the other.Following the clan invasion new leadership was installed as the former president stepped down willing, the new president enacting many plans to bring the alliance into a new economic era has taken a long time as all internal and external decisions must pass with a unanimous vote. This process though ensuring all parties involved agree with what action is taken causes much delay to any economic growth.Minor Periphery StatesNumerous small and even single-system nations fill the Periphery.Rim CollectionThe Rim Collection is a minor periphery state within the fictional Battletech universeA New BeginningOne of the newest states in the periphery. the Rim Collection made up of six planets bordering the Alliance in 3048. The Rim Collection formed form the same planets that had existed as part of the Rim Worlds Republic.The planets after the fall of the Rim Worlds Republic when the League Defense Forces defeated the republics forces during the Amaris Coup. After centuries of independence local political leaders. Realizing that without either outside intervention each planet had no hope of prosperity.Until Professor James Moroney landed on Islington, one of the local councilman on planet being close friends with the professor and seeing one of Moroneys speeches on tape during a trip in the alliance. Convinced the reluctant professor to lead the political group the Unionist in convincing the other surrounding planets into forming an actual government.Though many sided with Moroney most against the proposal claimed that with the economical increase of the planets would make the planets a target for Pirates or even other periphery states. This was shown when pirates attacked several of the planets. With the collection with a standing due to most of the Rim Collection Planets unable to support their own militaries. with the collection of the collection they were still unable to either support a standing army or hire a reputable mercenary force.Ables graceLuckily the Able Aces entered the collection after a contract with the Lyran Alliance went sour and entered the periphery looking for a periphery state to sign up with. Major Able during respite in the Rim Collection went to a rally being held by the Unionist with Professor Moroney there. Inspired by the professor Major Able had his entire Mecernary company land on planet; and announced that he was going to offer the Rim Collection a contract were they would support the state as its first military force and train militia forces during their contract.Many within the Aces went with the Major since he agreed to pay them form his own pocket until the Collection was able to support the Mercenary force with its own contract. Several left the unit seeking their own fortune and fame in the Periphery. After agreeing to the plan Major Able approached the Professor with the contract. Overjoyed with a way to silence the opposition due to a lack of military force to protect the collection against pirates. The Aces after the collection had formed and agreed to the contract landholds were granted to the mercenary company on Otisberg. The Homeworld of the Mercs Leader Major Able.Renewed future and TestWithin the first decade, the Rim Collection had come a long way from what the planets have been before. Many planets that were once barely able to sustain themselves began to trade - at first among themselves, then finally traders from the Alliance and those from the Collection began to cross the border and new materials from the Collection became ever more demanded. As Alliance industries grew, they began seeing the influx of materials from the outside as a way to bring costs down.Worlds League traders and merchants, seeing the Collection as their Lyran counter-parts, started to make trips into the state, bringing more wealth into the Collection. However, the newfound wealth and economic success came with a down side. Pirates began raiding the Collection. Even after the Ables Aces spread among the six planets and helped each raise their own planetary militia, the pirate attacks continued.The most notable of these pirate bands were the Morrisons Extractors, formerly of the Circunis Federation. They have been launching many attacks on the Rim Collection. In order to crush them, Major Able has taken his Aces out of the state in a ploy to convince the Extractors that the Aces had left the Collections employ. The ploy worked: believing the mercenaries left the periphery state to its fate, the Extractors have struck at two planets and took control of them.The Aces, combined with the forces of several planetary militias, returned and struck at the Extractors new base of operations, killing the pirate leader and most of the pirate forces on both of the planets held by them.Rim Worlds RepublicThe Rim Worlds Republic is a former interstellar state located within the spacial area designated as the periphery within the fictional universe of BattletechThe Rim Worlds Republic is known mostly as the home of Stefan Amaris the usurper, who assassinated the Star Leagues First Lord Richard Cameron in the 28th century, touching off the civil war that disintegrated the old Star League and triggered Aleksandr Kerenskys Exodus from the Inner Sphere. The Republic and its ruling family were wiped out in that war.  Most of the former RWR worlds were annexed by the Commonwealth.Mica MajorityThe Mica Majority is a minor Periphery state within the fictional universe of BattleTech.The Mica Majority consists of three mineral-rich worlds located within the Delos IV star system between the Suns and the Alliance.HistoryAbandoned by the Kuritas and with its claim to the world Mica when all major ore deposits were depleted, and the punishing climates of the Mican worlds prevented any formation of any major cities on planet.  Though the life-support domes on Mica II, V, and VII were quite impressive engineering feats when they were first constructed, they remain mere curiosities to date. Known for their extensive deposits of gold, uranium, and other precious minerals, all three planets are host to harsh arctic climate that makes mining operations costly. With only the thinnest of atmospheres, miners must operate in pressurized suits and live dome-towns. Miners, drifters, bartenders, and assorted neer-do-wells vie with one another to cash in on newfound wealth or at least live long enough to spend some of it. Ore from the mining fields is collected at central distribution points and shipped out to the systems Jump Point every summer when scores of merchants from the Suns and the Outworlds Alliance arrive to trade with the Micanites. For several weeks and even months, thousands of miners compete against, barter with, steal from, drink with, lie to, wench with, gamble with, win from, and lose to merchants and other miners aboard the Mican Space Center, built in the days of the Star League. Located near the systems zenith jump point is a huge orbital complex constructed in the late 27th century when the vast resources of the system became known. With only brief interruptions during the Succession Wars, large-scale barter and trade between the descendants of the original Micanite laborers and the Sphere have remained intact.Thus the Suns and the Alliance trader can purchase badly needed resources at one tenth the price asked by Sphere mining concerns. In return the miners receive machinery and modern conveniences, clothing and chemicals, brandies and brides, all of which they need to continue their precarious existence. Given time, a more stabilized form of economic exchange may be developed. For most of its history, the Mica Majority has remained free of any foreign influence, mainly because the Mican worlds provide little incentive for any potential invader. The only recorded invasion of the Mica Majority occurred in 3035, when a Tortuga pirate force entered the system. Within days the pirates realized that the Mican settlements contained only a fraction of the wealth expected to have. Frustrated by the lack of plunder and unaccustomed to the frigid temperatures of the polar worlds, the pirate force abandoned the Mica Majority after a few weeks.Niops AssociationThe Niops Association is a small single system interstellar nation in the universe of BattleTech, situated in the periphery of inhabited space.HistoryForgottenThe site of an astronomical mission for the League. The mission consisted three planets in all, with enough personnel to sustain the project almost indefinitely, though this would be tested when the Amaris Civil War shattered the League. With the fall of the Star League, the research team became isolated from the rest of humanity. Throughout the Succession War refugees fleeing from the Confederation arrived at the Niops system, bringing with them news of the wars ravaging the Inner Sphere. Tales of such disregard for life and absolute destruction convinced the leaders of the research team to allow the universe to forget about them completely. This was aided by the of the only operating HPG succumbing to multiple equipment failures; preferring to remain free of outside influences, the rulers of the Niopian worlds made no effort to restore it. As centuries passed, the educated elite maintained their power by restricting access to education was strictly controlled, and a two tiered society emerged. The educated descendants of the researchers took on the roll of leadership. Most important positions in the government, military and private sector are held by this group. The second grouping consists of the descendants of the Capellan refugees, who provide skilled labor and most of the agricultural output of the Association. Social mobility is extremely limited, as the governments firm control on education and the social life of their citizens makes it difficult for the descendants of the refugees to gain power.Still, Niops provided a safe haven during the turmoil of the Succession Wars. The Association government also provided several stabilizing forces. Although every worker, may not have much political say or chance for economic advancement, but has is assured a comfortable minimal standard of living. Also, the Association had military stability provided by the Star League garrison in system. Furthering the goal of military security, the Association government pursued a build up an contigant of aerospace fighters, capable of engaging hostile forces before they even hit the ground. The strength of Niops military has kept pirate raids to a minimum, as most pirates are more comfortable looking for an easier target to hitTechnocracy and ReligionAnother factor in the development of the Niopian technocracy is the lack of a means to communicate with other states since its only HPG station broke down due lack of spare parts. Preferring to remain isolated from outside influence, partly from fear of attack and partly from the want to keep the lower-class population in check. With no evidence that life could be better, the lower-class citizens of Niops have largely remain docile. The technocracy itself has evolved into a sort of semi-religious organization. The goal of preserving and furthering Star League era technology has become known as the Master Plan.Lothian LeagueThe Lothian League was a minor interstellar nation located within the periphery within fictional Battletech Universe. Conquered by the Marian Hegemony.HistoryThe league is collection of seven planets located beyond the boundaries of the CommonWealth. Lothario was first populated during the Runification war when a group Concordat forces fleeing form League forces. Settled in 2691 Lothario was found to be rich in metals. Thus becoming a principal supplier of copper and iron ores to the Magistracy and the Taurian Concordat, receiving in turn agricultural and mining equipment to sustain its fragile existence. Over the last century such raw materials was used to foster expansion to nearby systems thus forming the Lothian League.The first serious threat to the leagues existence, when renegade mercenaries units that had been shattered in recent battles stumbled across the league by accident, For the next following four years both sides conducted a series of raids and counter-raids. Constant fighting cost the league its few precious Jumpships and Dropships. Finally the renegade forces capitulated and left league territory for an easier target. Due to the logistical loses accrued during the fighting the league was forced to renew trade ties with other planets and nations within the periphery to avoid economic ruin.The Lothian League politically is on good terms with both the Magistracy, Tuarian, Illyrian and Circinian neighbors with little to do with Inner Sphere states. With limited contact with the Inner Sphere through contracted mercenaries bands, contracted for cadre and garrison duties, to deter raids form the ever increasingly aggressive Marion Hegemony.The Endin the 3050s the Marian Hegemony began offensive operations against the league, first beginning with raids on the Lothian planets with ever increasing frequency and ferocity  wearing down defending units. Soon followed by a full-scale assault in 3054 by the Marian Legions. The Lothian League proved to be a tougher adversary than expected, holding out for more than a year against the Marian assault. Dipping deeply into the Lothian treasury to hire additional mercenary units, and with a small Home Guard BattleMech unit to fight against the invaders came an astonishing success; but however, the Legions superior firepower began to overwhelm the Leagues defenders. Making a desperate appeal to the Taurian Concordat for any troops it could spare, but the Concordat refused to send any help, citing the need to keep its troops on alert against the danger of an imminent Federated Commonwealth attack. The Caesar himself leading the assault on Lordinax, the last League planet to fall. Upon the triumphal landing on Lothario, the Leagues former capital world, the Caesar ordered survivors of the ruling family the Logans taken into custody; the Logans disappeared, presumably going in hiding.   Hegemony troops faced continued activity and passive resistance from Lothian citizens who refuse to accept the Marian domination. Forced to deploy two-thirds of the Second Marian Legion across the seven League planets to deal with the insurgents, but the Legion could barely withstand constant harassment form the guerrillas. Further, to impede, government officials installed to enact the Caesars policies must repeatedly deal with blatant disregard for imposed authority. Indicating that Lothian freedom fighters were receiving covert assistance possibly from the Magistracy of Canopus, which had hope to keep the Caesar and his Legions too busy for further conquest; the League rebels had been receiving small amounts of money and supplies from the Illyrian Palatinate, the Caesars next likely target.Circinus FederationThe Circinus Federation is a minor interstellar nation located within the periphery within the fictional universe of BattleTechHistoryThe following is a abridged of historical events related to the Circinus Federation within the region of space designated as the Pheriphery within the fictional universe of BattleTech.The Black warriors a mercenary force accused of contract violation against the Worlds League, narrowly escaping Marik troops and landing on Circinus joining the pirates already populating the planet and joining forces with the pirates in raids against Marik forces. Colonel Zachariah Cirion, leader of the Black Warriors, began a series of raids against outlying Marik agricultural worlds. With both Star League and the Marik House forces occupied by the Amaris Crisis, and so the Circinus pirates flourished in the absence of reprisals.In 2785 a convoy jumpships with settlers fleeing the destruction wrought by war landed on Circinus to begin a new start. The pirates realizing that having the farmers among them came with many advantages for the few cons associated with having non-pirates living with the pirates. Combining the two groups into a single partnership gave the planet a viable economy and culture. The farmers aware that their associates were not of the legal kind asked no questions as long as the need s of the colony were met. Under the guise of covert operations the pirates supported the farmers while they in returned brought internal law and order and the illusion of a respectable, agrarian society without the suspicion of being a pirate heaven.A ChangeDuring lull during the Second succession War House Marik troops occupied Circunis, before pulling out due to the need for more forces to attack or repel enemy assaults. Even with the occupation the federation became one of the most successful of the Bandit Kingdoms, having long since adopted a presidential system of government. Piracy became a major governmental function, with covert agencies responsible both for the raids themselves and for covering them up. The Circinian president merely looks the other way so that he will not have to acknowledge the crimes his government is constantly committing.In recent decades, the inhabitants of Circinus had been cautiously settling neighboring star systems, claiming eight planets between 2990 and 3020. From this new empire, the president of the federation entered into a series of joint reconciliation talks with leaders of both Commonwealth and the Worlds League. Through skillful diplomacy and judicious return of prisoners, and without once admitting to any wrongdoing on the part of his people, Mclntyre has managed to avert a wholesale counterattack against the Federation while playing on the mutual suspicions of both the Marik and Steiner counterparts.The Federation had become ever more powerful as recruits form far and wide form all over the periphery and innersphere bolstering the federation forces ever so. Also by convincing both Marik and Steiner that the federations could be invaluable to both sides; thus receiving needed BattleMech parts and a small contingent of Aerospace Fighters. Even with such increase of strength and power many younger officers within the CFAF yearning for more wealth and power challenge the president.References* SourceBook: 01629 The Periphery* SourceBook: 01692 The Periphery* SourceBook: 01726 Periphery* SourceBook: 10982 Field Manual The Periphery
14705016
Praileaitz_Cave
The Praileaitz Cave (Basque for Rock of the Monk cave) is located in the municipality of Deba (Guipuzcoa, Basque Country).Early in August 2006, various paleolithic cave paintings were found during an archaeological excavation - a non-figurative iconographic grouping made up of smaller groups of red dots, either isolated or forming a series. Researchers have surmised that the paintings were done around 18,000 years ago.The cave also yielded an unusual set of portable art on peebles, with abstract forms that, in one case, suggested to the researchers resembled the figurines found elsewhere in Palolithic contexts. It is dated at the Lower Magdalenian period.Protection concernsThe cave is located next to the Sasiola Quarry, which presents a threat to the conservation of the paintings.On May 24, 2007, the Science Society proposed the establishment of a wide protective area around the cave.On July 17, 2007, the Government adopted (with Ezker Batua and Alkartasuna voting against) a decree that established a 50-meter protective area around the rock sanctuary. This level of protection was deemed insufficient by the Aranzadi Science Society, which was in charge of the achaeological excavation and studying the cave paintings.External links*Praileaitz Cave Paintings Threatened by Mining*Gipuzkoa Kultura: El sorprendente hallazgo (in Spanish, news of the finding, with nice images)*Terrae Antiquae: Praileaitz (in Spanish)de Praileaitzeu:Praileaitz
14716066
Gosau
Gosau is a municipality in the district of Gmunden in Austria, Austria. Location and General Information Gosau is situated along the Gosaubach stream in the Salzkammergut region. The center of the town is at an elevation of 767 (2,516). 58.9 % of the municipality is forested.At the southern end of Gosau there is a road leading to the Vorderer Gosausee, a lake with a scenic view of the Dachstein.Gosau is one of the few Lutheran communities in Austria with about 71% of the population being Lutheran. History The valley around Gosau was settled in the 13th century by monks from St. Peters Abbey in Salzburg. Timber production for the salt mine in Hallstatt was a major industry. In 1490 the town became part of the Principality above the Enns River. The area was repeatedly occupied by the French during the wars. When the Republic of Austria was formed in 1918, Gosau became part of the federal state of Upper Austria. In 1938 the area was annexed by the Reich along with the rest of Austria, and Gosau became part of the Gau Oberdonau, only to be returned to Upper Austria when the Republic of Austria was reconstituted in 1945. Economy In the past timber production and salt mining in neighboring Hallstatt have historically been the major industries in Gosau. Today, tourism is the main source of income, although raising livestock, mainly cattle, is also an important economic activity.(Gosau entry in the German-Language Wikipedia) Politics Gosau is governed by a 25-member Gemeinderat (council) and Mayor Gerhard Gamsjger of the SP.(Brgermeister Zeitung) Referencesde:Gosaufr:Gosauit:Gosauhu:Gosaunl:Gosaupt:Gosauru:sk:Gosaufi:Gosauvi:Gosauvo:Gosauwar:Gosau
14749728
Gana_and_Gwi_bushmen
The Gana and Gwi bushmen are peoples indigenous to the central Kalahari region of Botswana.Since the mid-1990s the government of Botswana has been in the process of relocating the bushmen, against their will, to relocation camps around the periphery of the Central Game Reserve.  The government says this is because the bushmen threaten the survival of game in the reserve, and because it is not practical to provide the bushmen with freshwater in their ancestral home.  The bushmen, and supporters of their right to return to their previous home, claim that they have been evicted to make way for tourism and diamond mining (diamonds were discovered in the reserve in the early 1980s).References* Bushmen beg to keep their freedom, TimesOnline* Survival International* George Monbiot articles: http://www.monbiot.com/archives/2006/03/21/a-bully-in-ermine/, http://www.monbiot.com/archives/2006/03/24/lady-tonge-an-apology/|
14782010
George_Herbert_Farrar
thumb|Sir George Herbert FarrarSir George Herbert Farrar, 1st Baronet, DSO (17 June 1859 Chatteris, Cambridgeshire  20 May 1915 Kuibis, West Africa, was a South African mining magnate, politician and soldier - Colonel and assistant General - Central Force, Defence Forces, Hon. Colonel South African Light Horse.Son of Charles Farrar, a Chatteris medical doctor and Helen Howard, the daughter of John Howard of Cauldwell House Bedford and sister of Sir Frederick Howard of Bedford and Howard MP of Bedford. George Herbert Farrar was educated at Modern School after which he joined Howard, Farrar & Co., the engineering business of his uncle, Sir Frederick Howard, travelling to South Africa in 1879 to work at the firms branches in Elizabeth and East London.In 1887, shortly after the discovery of gold on the Reef, he and his brothers established themselves in Johannesburg. Here he became one of the leading figures in the mining sector on the Rand. His main creation was forming the East Rand Proprietary Mines (ERPM),(ERPM) remaining chairman of the company throughout his life. In 1893 Farrar sold 1,300 claims to the ERPM and received ERPM shares to the value of 705,000 for his claims in the south of Boksburg, excluding Boksburg Lake. Farrar later received further ERPM shares for his claims over Boksburg Lake, and became effectively the controlling shareholder of the ERPM. He was a member of the Legislative Assembly of the Transvaal and Leader of the Opposition. For his part in the Raid he was sentenced to hang, but the sentence was commuted to a fine of 25,000, paid by cheque by Farrars brother Sydney.During the War he raised two regiments of South African Horse, and on 1 December 1900 was appointed Major in the Rifles. He saw service in the River Colony, took part in the defence of Wepener and saw action at Wittebergen, south of the River. He was mentioned in despatches(London Gazette, 16 April 1901.) and was awarded the South Africa Medal with 4 clasps, a DSO(London Gazette, 19 April 1901.) for his military service during the War and was knighted in 1902. He became chairman of the Chamber of Mines. Farrar was an ardent supporter of the scheme to solve the labour problems of the mines by importing poorly paid Chinese workers on 3-year contracts.(Pinfold.) Despite strong opposition, the plan was implemented in 1904 and over 60,000 Chinese were brought into the country over a period of three years, resulting in even further ethnic tensions on the Reef. With the attaining of autonomy for the Transvaal in 1906, he represented Boksburg East in the Legislative Assembly and was leader of the Opposition. He represented Georgetown in the first parliament of of South Africa in 1910-11 and was created Baronet on 2 February 1911. In December 1911 he withdrew from politics and devoted all his time to his enterprises on the Rand.With the outbreak of War I he was visiting England and about to join the staff of General Sir Hubert Hamilton in Belgium, but instead was ordered to South West Africa as Assistant Q.M-General to Brigadier-General Duncan McKenzies force with the rank of Colonel. From Lderitz Bay he was in charge of the restoration of the railway and of supplying the forces with water, critically  important in the semi-desert region. On 19 May 1915 while returning from a tour of inspection, his motor trolley collided with a construction train at Kuibis, near Gibeon, and he succumbed to his injuries the following day. He was buried in Bedford Farm Cemetery east of Johannesburg - Bedford Farm was named for his boyhood hometown. Farrarmere, South Africa is also named after him. He married Ella Mabel Waylen (c.18691922) on 3 June 1893 and had six daughters: Helen Mabel b. 1894; Muriel Frances, Lowther b. 1896; Gwendoline b. 1897; Kathleen Elizabeth b. 1907; Ella Marguerite b. 1911. (Farrar was a champion athlete in his youth, a member of both Boodles and Whites, two gentlemens clubs in London and the founder of the Johannesburg Turf Club.He was the brother of Percy Farrar, soldier and mountaineer.ReferencesSources*Huddle Park history*Geoffrey Wheatcroft. The Randlords - The Men Who Made South Africa (Jonathan Ball 1986) ISBN 0 8650 1352*Standard Encyclopaedia of South Africa (vol 4) (NASOU 1971) ISBN 0 625 00320 9*John Pinfold. Farrar, Sir George Herbert, baronet (18591915), Oxford Dictionary of National Biography, online edn, Oxford University Press, Oct 2007 accessed 23 Dec 2007External linksHerbert Farrar
14793882
Transmashholding
:This article is about Transmashholding, for other russian companies bearing the transmash name see the disambiguation page: TransmashCJSC Transmashholding is the largest manufacturer of locomotives and rail equipment in Russia, with annual sales of US$3.2 billion and a workforce of 55,000 people in 2008. The company includes 14 engineering and production sites in Russia and one production and engineering site in Germany.(About the Company)OverviewCJSC Transmashholding was established in 2002. Two major shareholders are OJSC HC Kuzbassrazrezugol and TransGroup AC, the leading Russian railway operator. Andrey Bokarev is the Chairman of the Board and Andrey Andreev is the General Director.(The company actively works with JSC Russian Railways, the Ministry of Transportation of the Russian Federation, and other Russian Federation ministries, including Ministry of Industry and Power, Ministry of Economic Development and Trade, and Ministry of Finance.Company structure  Russia-based companies The company structure includes several major industrial plants in Russia:(Transmashholding : Enterprises eng.tmholding.ru)*Electrovozostroitelniy Plant (NEVZ) Novocherkassk Electric Locomotive Plant /    ; is the largest electric locomotive producer in Russia.* Machine-building Plant / Bryansk Engineering Plant /    ; is Russias largest manufacturer of diesel shunters, also produces freight wagons and marine diesel engines.* Zavod Kolomensky Plant /   ; produces diesel locomotives and diesel engines and generators.* Machine-building Plant /    ; major producer of electric multiple units.* Metrovagonmach /  ; produces urban (metro) electrical multiple units and railcars, also trucks.* Penzadieselmach /   ; produces diesel and gas generator sets, located in Penza.* Staleliteiniy Plant Bezhitsk Steel Foundry /     ; produces steel castings including coupling parts.* Electrovagonoremontniy Plant Oktyabrsky Electric Railway Car Repair Plant /    ; performs modernisation, repair and overhaul of passenger rolling stock.* Tsentrosvarmash /  ; Russias largest producer of welded products including bogies, railway vehicle superstructure, bridges and mining equipment.* Transconverter /  ; Joint venture with AG producing electric supplies for railway vehicles.* Industrial group /    ; designs and manufacturers passenger vehicle equipment.(    KMT tmholding.ru (russian))(KMT Industrial group tmholding.ru (english))* Vagonostroitelniy Zarod (TVZ) Tver Carriage Works /    (25%) ; develops and produces locomotive hauled passenger vehicles.* VELNII, (  -  -  )()Electric locomotive design company, acquired 2009.() Joint ventures Bombardier transportationOn May 25, 2007, in Russia, Bombardier and Transmasholding signed an agreement to jointly establish an engineering center.( Hogan & Hartson Advises Transmashholding on Joint Venture Project With Bombardier, June 5, 2007)In May 2008, Bombardier and TMH signed an agreement to form a joint company for the production of locomotives. The equal share companies were organised under the previously formed Bombardier Transportation Transmashholding AG, one as an engineering design centre: Transmashholding Bombardier Transportation (Engineering) Rus and another for the manufacturing of inverter drives (based on Bombardiers MITRAC technology) used in electric locomotives: Transmashholding Bombardier Transportation (Industrial) Rus.(Bombardier Transportation and Transmashholding Establish Engineering Joint Venture to Develop New Generation May 21, 2008 reuters.com)(Bombardier Transportation and Transmashholding Establish Engineering Joint Venture to Develop New Generation Locomotives 21st May 2008 marketwire.com)Knorr-BremseIn April 2007, Knorr-Bremse AG and Transmashholding agreed to create a Russian joint venture to manufacture, sell and service rail vehicle braking systems in Russia and the of Independent States.( Knorr-Bremse breaks into Russia 1 May 2007 railwaygazette.com)AlstomIn December 2007, ALSTOM and Transmasholding signed a cooperation agreement that would lead to the formation of joint ventures for the production of railway components in Russia.(Alstom and Transmashholding agree to form joint ventures in Russia 14 December 2007 transport.alstom.com) In October 2008 the partnership was further extended by the formation of a 51:49 joint venture for the production of double decker coaches TMH-Alstom DV.(Alstom Transport and Russian rolling stock manufacturer Transmashholding agree on strategic partnership 6 October 2008 alstom.com) This intent was ratified on March 31, 2009, with Alstom providing ongoing technical expertise for the modernisation of TMHs production sites, and the development of new locomotive platforms; with TMH undertaking more than 75% of the manufacturing. At the same time Alstom took a 25(+1)% stake in TMHs capital holding company.(Alstom and the Russian rail manufacturer Transmashholding sign a strategic partnership agreement 01 April 2009 alstom.com)SiemensTransconverter was formed as a joint venture with Siemens in April 2005 for the production of electrical equipment (high voltage static converters).Former subsidiaries* Dessau AG (Fahrzeugtechnik Dessau ) was part of Transmashholding from 2006 to 2008 and was taken over by the Romanian CTF at the end of 2008.ProductsTransmasholding manufactures diesel-locomotive shunters, main-line and electric industrial locomotives, passenger and freight cars, electric train cars, locomotive and marine diesels, car castings and other products.The company has provided railcars to Metro and Metro, among others.(Transmashholding company press releases eng.tmholding.ru)External links*Transmasholding website*Interview with TMH Chairman Dmitry Komissarov Interview presented by Chris Jackson concerning the first five years of the company from 2002 onwards. railwaygazette.comReferencesde:Transmashholdingru:
14818511
JEA_Northside_Generating_Station
JEA Northside Generating Station in Jacksonville, Florida is a major power plant, one of the three power plants owned and operated by JEA, Jacksonvilles municipal utilities service. It produces electricity by burning coal and coke at Units 1 and 2, the largest circulating fluidized-bed combustors, (CFBs), in the world. These combustors, completed in 2002 and rated at 297.5 megawatts each,()() produce enough electricity to light more than 250,000 households.( In addition, Unit ST3 produces 505 megawatts of electricity by burning fuel oil and/or gas.(The JEA Large-Scale CFB Combustion Demonstration Project, Clean Coal Technology, Topical Report Number 22, The U.S.Department of Energy and JEA (March, 2003)) Location The Northside Generating Station is located north-east of the intersection of Routes 9A and 105 in the city of Jacksonville, Florida. It is  from the Ocean coastline, on the north bank of a back channel of the Johns River, which is being used as a waterway for fuel delivery as well as a source of cooling water. The Northside Generating Station also borders Ecological and Historic Preserve that consists of North Florida wetlands and contains historic sites of Timucua peoples. History The Northside Generating Station began producing electricity for Jacksonville in March, 1966 with oil as its only fuel, when former Unit 1, rated at 275 megawatts, was installed. In June, 1972 a similar Unit 2 was launched,( but had to be shut down in 1983 due to major boiler problems.( A plant expansion in 1977 added a 564-megawatt Unit ST3, which is still in operation today. This expansion enabled the use of oil and natural gas fuels. In 1996, JEA committed to reduce certain pollutants from the Northside Station by at least 10% when it upgraded Unit 2 (non-functional at the time) and Unit 1 by introducing the new coal technology.(http://www.nsrp.org/lean/lean_forum06/Tour_Description_JEA_Northside_Power_Station.pdf)  This most recent upgrade was funded by JEA (234 million USD) and the Department of Energy (75 million USD).( Initial synchronization was achieved for Unit 2 on February 19, 2002, and for Unit 1 on May 29, 2002.( As a result, the facility generates significantly more power now. CFB Technology CFB technology is an advanced method for burning coal and other fuels efficiently while removing air emissions inside the sophisticated combustor system. CFB technology provides flexibility in utility operations because a wide variety of solid fuels can be used, including high-sulfur, high-ash coal and coke.(DOE/EIS-0289, Final Environmental Impact Statement for the JEA Circulating Fluidized Bed Combustor Project (June 1, 2000))In a CFB combustor, coal or other fuels, air, and crushed limestone or other sorbents are injected into the lower portion of the combustor for initial burning of the fuel. The combustion actually occurs in a bed of fuel, sorbent, and ash particles that are fluidized by air nozzles in the bottom of the combustor. The air expands the bed, creates turbulence for enhanced mixing, and provides most of the oxygen necessary for combustion of the fuel. As the fuel particles decrease in size through combustion and breakage, they are transported higher in the combustor where additional air is injected. As the particles continue to decrease in size, unreacted fuel, ash, and fine limestone particles are swept out of the combustor, collected in a particle separator (also called a cyclone), and recycled to the lower portion of the combustor. This is the circulating nature of the combustor. Drains in the bottom of the combustor remove a fraction of the bed composed primarily of ash while new fuel and sorbent are added. The combustion ash is suitable for beneficial uses such as construction material, agricultural fertilizer, and reclaiming mining areas.(The limestone captures up to 98% of the sulfur impurities released from the fuel.() When heated in the CFB combustor, the limestone, consisting primarily of carbonate (CaCO3), converts to oxide (CaO) and CO2 . The CaO reacts with the SO2 from the burning fuel to form sulfate (CaSO4), an inert material that is removed with the combustion ash. The combustion efficiency of the CFB combustor allows the fuel to be burned at a relatively low temperature of about , thus reducing NOx formation by approximately 60% compared with conventional coal-fired technologies.( Greater than 99% of particulate emissions in the gas are removed downstream of the combustor by either an electrostatic precipitator or a fabric filter (baghouse).(The heated combustor converts water in tubes lining the combustors walls to high pressure steam. The steam is then superheated in tube bundles placed in the solids circulating stream and the gas stream. The superheated steam drives a steam turbine-generator to produce electricity in a conventional steam cycle. Fuel supply The plant uses a continuous ship unloader, the only one of its type in the continental United States. The solid fuel is transferred from barges onto the fuel conveyor system, which in turn transports it to the two largest fuel storage domes in North America.( Pet coke and coal travel from the ship to the domes in about twenty minutes, entirely inside a sealed system to prevent dust particles from escaping into the surrounding environment. Water use Northside 02.JPG|thumb|300px|right|View of cooling towers at JEA Northside Generating Station, from SR 105.Water is delivered by an elevated intake flume from the back channel of the Johns River to cool the stations condensers, after which the water is returned to the back channel. This cooling water does not mix with other liquid process streams while in contact with the condensers. Because Unit 2 has been out of service since 1983, the actual demand for cooling water by Northside Generating Station at full load since that time has been approximately 620 million gallons per day (Mgd), or  per minute, to operate Units 1 and 3. Operation of the entire 3-unit plant occurred only from about 1978 until 1980. During that time, the demand for cooling water was approximately 827 Mgd ( per minute): 24.5% for Unit 1, 24.5% for Unit 2, and 51% for Unit 3. This amount of surface water supplied to the station was approximately 10% of the average flow passing through the back channel of the St. Johns River.(DOE/EIS-0289, Final Environmental Impact Statement for the JEA Circulating Fluidized Bed Combustor Project (June 1, 2000)) Before passing through the condensers, noncontact cooling water at Northside Generating Station is treated intermittently with a biocide to prevent biological growth on the heat exchanger tubes. hypochlorite (NaOCl) and occasionally bromide (NaBr) are used. Treatment occurs no more than 2 hours per day per operating unit. The Johns River Power Park taps into the discharge side of the Northside Generating Station condensers to obtain tower makeup. The average surface water flow supplied to the Power Park heat rejection system is 50 Mgd ( per minute). Approximately 25% of this surface water evaporates into the atmosphere from the cooling towers. Cooling tower blowdown is routed back into Northside Generating Stations discharge collector basin. The daily average temperature of the cooling tower blowdown is limited to .( Emissions Preliminary Emission Tests were conducted on Units 1 and 2 over the summer of 2002. Testing was conducted on both units burning coal and petroleum coke. Results are summarized in the table below. Emissionsresults from both units met all emission requirements for particulate, SO2, acid gases and heavy metals.() Conflicts and controversies Soot coming from the JEA Northside Generating Station has prompted Distribution and Auto Services Inc. to threaten leaving Jacksonville area if the problem persists. Vehicle processing companies such as Auto Services Inc. prepare automobiles for dealers by cleaning, inspecting, customizing, and fixing defects. In 2001, such companies at Jacksonville processed 579,924 vehicles. Auto Services Inc. had to wash 50000 cars to remove soot, the letter from the companys attorney said in 2002. The soot did not caused any damage to the vehicles, but a fallout occurring during a drizzle or when dew forms on vehicles could release acid that mars plastic equipment, the letter said. The JEA paid $82000 to the vehicle-processing company to cover the cost of washing automobiles during the summer of 2002, according to JEA spokesman.(Port tenant threatens pullout over soot 11/05/02) References kraftverk
14838420
Chalcolithic_Europe
Chalcolithic Europe, the Chalcolithic (also Aeneolithic, Copper Age) period of Europe lasts roughly 3500 to 1700 BC. It is the period of Megalithic culture, the appearance of the first significant economic stratification, and probably the earliest presence of Indo-European speakers.The economy of the Chalcolithic, even in the regions where copper is not used yet, is no longer that of peasant communities and tribes: now some materials are produced in specific locations and distributed to wide regions. Mining of metal and stone is particularly developed in some areas, along with the processing of those materials into valuable goods.Ancient ChalcolithicFrom c. 3500 to 3000 BC, copper starts being used in the Balkans, Eastern Europe, and Central Europe. However, perhaps more influential on the period than copper itself was the introduction of horses and the resulting increased mobility of cultures. From c. 3500 onwards, Eastern Europe is apparently infiltrated by people originating from beyond the Volga (culture), creating a plural complex known as Stog culture, that substitutes the previous culture, pushing the natives to migrate in a NW direction to the Baltic and Denmark, where they mix with natives (TRBK A and C). This may be correlated with the linguistic fact of the spread of Indo-European languages; see hypothesis. Near the end of the period, another branch will leave many traces in the lower Danube area (culture of culture I), in what seems to be another invasion.Meanwhile the Danubian culture absorbs its northern neighbours of the Czech Republic and Poland for some centuries, only to recede in the second half of the period. In Bulgaria and Wallachia (Southern Romania), the culture evolves into a monarchy with a clearly royal cemetery near the coast of the Black Sea. This model seems to have been copied later in the Tiszan region with the culture of Bodrogkeresztur. Labour specialization, economic stratification and possibly the risk of invasion may have been the reasons behind this development. The influx of early Troy (Troy I) is clear in both the expansion of metallurgy and social organization.In the western Danubian region (the Rhine and Seine basins) the culture of Michelsberg displaces its predecessor, Rssen. Meanwhile in the Mediterranean basin, several cultures (most notably Chassey in SE France and Lagozza in northern Italy) converge into a functional union, of which the most significant characteristic is the distribution network of honey-coloured flint. Despite this unity, the signs of conflicts are clear, as many skeletons show violent injuries. This is the time and area where tzi, the famous man found in the Alps, lived. Another significant development of this period is that the Megalithic phenomenon starts spreading to most places of the Atlantic region, bringing agriculture with it to some underdeveloped regions there.Middle ChalcolithicThis period extends along the first half of the 3rd millennium BC. Most significant is the reorganization of the Danubians in the powerful culture, that extends more or less to what would be the Austro-Hungarian empire in recent times. The rest of the Balkans is profoundly restructured after the invasions of the previous period but, with the exception of the culture in a mountainous region, none of them show any eastern (or presumably Indo-European) traits. The new culture, in Bulgaria, shows the first traits of pseudo-bronze (an alloy of copper with arsenic). So does the first significant Aegean group: the Cycladic culture after 2800 BC.In the North, for some time the supposedly Indo-European groups seem to recede temporarily, suffering a strong cultural danubianization. In the East, the peoples of beyond the Volga (culture), surely eastern Indo-Europeans, ancestors of  Iranians take over southern Russia and Ukraine. In the West the only sign of unity comes from the Megalithic super-culture, which extends now from southern Sweden to southern Spain, including large parts of southern Germany as well. But the Mediterranean and Danubian groupings of the previous period appear fragmented into many smaller pieces, some of them apparently backward in technological matters. From c. 2800 BC, the Danubian culture pushes directly or indirectly southwards, destroying most of the rich Megalithic culture of western France. After c. 2600 several phenomena will prefigure the changes of the upcoming period:Large towns with stone walls appear in two different areas of the Iberian Peninsula: one in the Portuguese region of Estremadura (culture of Nova de Sao Pedro), strongly embedded in the Atlantic Megalithic culture; the other near Almera (SE Spain), centred around the large town of Millares, of Mediterranean character, probably affected by eastern cultural influxes (tholoi). Despite the many differences the two civilizations seem to be in friendly contact and to have productive exchanges. In the area of Dordogne (Aquitaine, France), a new unexpected culture of bowmen appears: it is the culture of Artenac, that soon takes control of western and even northern France and Belgium. In Poland and nearby regions, the putative Indo-Europeans reorganize and consolidate again with the culture of the Globular Amphoras. Nevertheless, the influence of many centuries in direct contact with the still-powerful peoples has greatly modified their culture.Late ChalcolithicThis period extends from c. 2500 BC to c. 1800 or 1700 BC (depending on the region). The dates are general for the whole of Europe, and the Aegean area is already fully in the Bronze Age. ca. 2500 BC the new culture (proto-Cymmerians?), whose origins are obscure but who are also Indo-Europeans, displaces the Yamna peoples in the regions north and east of the Black Sea, confining them to their original area east of the Volga. Some of these infiltrate Poland and may have played a significant but unclear role in the transformation of the culture of the Amphorae into the new Ware culture.Whatever happened, the fact is that c. 2400 BC. this people of the Corded Ware replace their predecessors and expand to Danubian and Nordic areas of western Germany. One related branch invades Denmark and southern Sweden (culture of Individual Sepultures), while the mid-Danubian basin, though showing more continuity, shows also clear traits of new Indo-European elites (culture). Simultaneously, in the west, the Artenac peoples reach Belgium. With the partial exception of Vuedol, the Danubian cultures, so buoyant just a few centuries ago, are wiped off the map of Europe. The rest of the period is the story of a mysterious phenomenon: the people. This group seems to be of mercantile character and to like being buried according to a very specific, almost invariable, ritual. Nevertheless, out of their original area of western Central Europe, they appear only inside local cultures, so they never invaded and assimilated but rather went to live among those peoples, keeping their way of life. This is why they are believed to be merchants.The rest of the continent remains mostly unchanged and in apparent peace. From c. 2300 BC the first Beaker Pottery appears in Bohemia and expands in many directions but particularly westward, along the Rhone and the sea shores, reaching the culture of Vila Nova (Portugal) and Catalonia (Spain) as their limits. Simultaneously but unrelatedly, c. 2200 BC in the Aegean region, the culture decays, being substituted by the new palatine phase of the Minoan culture of Crete.The second phase of Beaker Pottery, from c. 2100 BC onwards, is marked by the displacement of the centre of this phenomenon to Portugal, inside the culture of Vila Nova. This new centres influence reaches to all southern and western France but is absent in southern and western Iberia, with the notable exception of Los Millares. After c. 1900 BC, the centre of the Beaker Pottery returns to Bohemia, while in Iberia we see a decentralization of the phenomenon, with centres in Portugal but also in Los Millares and Ciempozuelos.See also*Europe*Age EuropeNotesEurooppa
14853245
Great_Sierra_Wagon_Road
 refnum  78000373()The Great Sierra Wagon Road was a route through the Sierra Nevada in California, built to bring supplies to the Great Sierra Mine on Tioga Hill in the high country of what was to become National Park. The road was built in 1882 by the Great Sierra Silver Mining Company, extending over , in 130 days. The mine promptly shut down, leaving the road without a purpose. In 1915 the road was purchased by T. Mather, the independently wealthy first director of the Park Service, who donated it to the Park Service. The Park Service opened the road to the public, calling it the Tioga Road. Designated State Route 120, the road traverses the park from its west to east entrances.() The portion of the road that was listed on the Register of Historic Places on August 25, 1978 is now known as the Old Tioga Road, left behind when the Tioga Road was realigned to avoid Aspen Valley in the western part of the park. The Old Tioga Road is a park service road, not open to the public apart from a short section that provides access to private inholdings. The road preserves stone retaining walls, known as Chinese Walls after the Chinese laborers who built them. The service road section remains largely unchanged from its original construction.(References
14887546
South_Australian_state_election,_2010
 after_party  Australian Labor PartyThe 2010 South Australian state election elected members to the 52nd of South Australia on 20 March 2010. All seats in the House of Assembly or lower house, whose current members were elected at the 2006 election, and half the seats in the Legislative Council or upper house, last filled at the 2002 election, became vacant. The incumbent centre-left Labor Party government led by Premier Rann was elected to a third four-year term over the opposition centre-right Liberal Party led by Leader of the Opposition Redmond. Labors landslide 7.7 percent swing to a vote of 56.8 percent at the 2006 election was reversed at this election with a swing of 8.4 percent, finishing with a two-party vote of 48.4 percent, however, Labor retained government with 26 of 47 seats, a net loss of two. Labor lost the inner metropolitan seats of Adelaide, Morialta and Norwood to the Liberals while SA member Maywald lost her rural seat of Chaffey to the Liberals. Independent Hanna lost to the Labor candidate in Mitchell, independents Such in Fisher and Brock in Frome retained their seats (the latter having won at the 2009 by-election), while independent candidate Pegler won Mount Gambier, replacing outgoing independent McEwen.In the upper house, both major parties won four seats each, with the last three to the Greens, Family First, and for Disability. The composition of the upper house therefore became eight Labor, seven Liberal, two Green, two Family First, two independent Pokies, and one Dignity for Disability.Like federal elections, South Australia has voting, uses full-preference voting in single member seats for the lower house and transferable vote voting tickets in the proportionally represented upper house. The election was conducted by the Commission of South Australia (ECSA), an independent body answerable to Parliament.Results thumb|upright|right|Metropolitan seatsthumb|upright|right|Rural seatsLower house:See also: results of the South Australian state election, 2010#Lower houseIndependents: Such, Brock, PeglerSeat movement* *Figure is versus the Liberal Party. In the district of Mount Gambier, the incument independent McEwen did not re-contest his seat, and was expected to revert back to the Liberal Party. However, another independent, Pegler, won the seat.* In the district of Frome, incumbent independent Brock retained his seat won at the 2009 Frome by-election, held at the 2006 election by former leader of the Liberal Party and former Premier, Kerin.PendulumThe following Pendulum works by lining up all of the seats according to the point margin post-election on a two-candidate-preferred basis.  Upper house:See also: results of the South Australian state election, 2010#Upper housePrior to the election, of 22 seats, Labor and the Liberals held eight seats each, Family First and No Pokies held two seats each, and the Greens and Democrat-turned-independent Winderlich held one seat each. Up for election were five Liberal, four Labor, one Family First, and Winderlich. Labor and the Liberals won four seats each, with one each to Family First and the Greens, with the last spot to Dignity for Disability candidate Vincent.()()()() This gives an upper house composition of eight Labor, seven Liberal, two Greens, two Family First, two independent No Pokies, and one Dignity for Disability.()CampaignRann Labor opened the campaign by announcing the duplication (one-way to two-way) of the Expressway, due to be completed by 2014.() Additional specialist math and science teachers for South Australian high schools were announced.() Tens of thousands of extra training places and apprenticeships as part of a pledge to create 100,000 extra jobs during the next six years,() despite a healthy economy, assisted by mining and defence industries, and the lowest state unemployment figures in the country.()Under Labor, the Adelaide Hospital would be abandoned and a new hospital built on the site of the old rail yards, moving Adelaides main hospital from the eastern end to the western end of North Terrace in the Central Business District, within the district of Adelaide. The Liberals and minor party the RAH were campaigning against this, with the Liberals proposing renovations on the current site.()() Football League (AFL) games and other sporting events are expected to be moved away from Stadium to new grounds. The Liberals proposed a new sports stadium on the old rail yards, while Labor proposed a major overhaul of Oval, also in the electoral district of Adelaide.()A large unfunded liability within the compensation scheme known as WorkCover had had built up under both Labor and Liberal governments, which sparked sweeping payout reductions under the last term of the Rann government, with the legislation passed in Parliament by both major parties, but came under sustained criticism from both the left and the right. The left were critical of monetary cuts to injured or otherwise incapable workers (see ParnellBressington filibuster), while the Liberals attacked WorkCovers operations, claiming there was wasteful duplication and a decrease in accountability, argued that this contributed to its budget problems, and that under a Liberal government WorkCovers insurance and regulatory arms would be split.()Attorney-General Atkinson had been the subject of sustained criticism by the internet generation demographic for refusing to allow classification of and therefore legally allow certain types of explicit media (see Atkinson#Media classification and censorship). 4 Croydon was created and contested Atkinsons seat of Croydon, as well as Adelaide, Norwood, Light, Mawson, and the upper house. Though the Liberals had not pledged a different stance on the issue, Atkinson suffered a larger than average primary swing of 16 points and two-party-preferred swing of 12 points in his seat. Following the election, Atkinson announced his immediate resignation from the Rann ministry, and that he would not recontest his seat at the next election. It was announced that the new Rann Labor Attorney General would be Rau, who expressed that he held a different view to his predecessor, and would be talking with his interstate counterparts at the next meeting of Attorney Generals.()The election campaign was overshadowed by affair allegations against Rann.()Although it was apparent only a few hours after the polls closed that Rann Labor had retained government,()() it was four days after the election that Rann officially claimed victory, after Redmond eventually conceded that the Liberals had not won enough seats to be capable of forming a government.() The of South Australia subsequently re-appointed Rann as of South Australia.()Candidates:See of the South Australian state election, 2010RetiringLiberal*Gunn, MHA in Stuart. Preselection is former national basketball player Dan van Holst Pellekaan.*Penfold, MHA in Flinders. Preselection is Australian Farmers Federation Grains Council chairman Peter Treloar.*Robert Lawson, MLC.*Schaefer, MLC.Labor*Stevens, MHA in Little Para. Preselection is former police officer Lee Odenwalder.*White, MHA in Taylor. Preselection is former Labor assistant secretary Leesa Vlahos.Other*McEwen, Independent MHA in Mount Gambier. Liberal preselection is Mount Gambier Mayor Steve Perryman.  Polling Newspoll polling is conducted via random telephone number selection in city and country areas. Sampling sizes consist of just under 900 electors, with the 1418 March 2010 poll consisting of just under 1600 electors. The declared of errors are  3.5 percent and  2.5 percent respectively.DateThe last state election was held on 18 March 2006 to elect members for the House of Assembly and half of the members in the Legislative Council. In South Australia, section 28 of the Constitution Act 1934, as amended in 2001, directs that parliaments have fixed four-year terms, and elections must be held on the third Saturday in March every four years unless this date falls the day after Good Friday or occurs within the same month as a Commonwealth election, or the conduct of the election could be adversely affected by a state disaster. Section 28 also states that the Governor may also dissolve the Assembly and call an election for an earlier date if the Government has lost the confidence of the Assembly or a bill of special importance has been rejected by the Legislative Council. Section 41 states that both the Council and the Assembly may also be dissolved simultaneously if a deadlock occurs between them.(Australian elections timetable: Australian Parliamentary Library)The election campaign must run for a minimum of 25 days or a maximum of 55 days, therefore the Governor would need to have issued writs for the election by 23 February 2010 at the latest. Between 7 and 10 days after that date, the roll is closed, which gives voters a final opportunity to enrol or to notify the State Electoral Office of any changes in their place of residence. Candidates wishing to stand for election can nominate between the issue of the writs and no more than 14 days after the close of rolls for a deposit of $450.()The writs were issued 20 February, the roll closed 2 March, and candidate nominations closed 5 March.Previous Parliament:See also: 2006 election pendulum and mapsThe centre-left Labor Party, led by Premier Rann, and the centre-right Liberal Party, led by Leader of the Opposition Redmond, are the two main parties in South Australia. In the 2006 state election, of 47 seats total, Labor won 28 seats, the Liberals won 15 seats and the Nationals, who are not in coalition with the Liberals in South Australia, retained their seat through minister Maywald (Chaffey). Three seats were retained by independents, minister McEwen (Mount Gambier), Such (Fisher) and Hanna (Mitchell). Smaller parties which held no seats in the lower House but achieved significant votes in 2006 included the Greens and the First Party.Former Liberal Premier Kerin resigned in November 2008, which triggered a Frome by-election on 17 January 2009. Independent Brock won the seat, reducing the Liberals to 14 seats.In the Australian Legislative Council, the Labor Party and the Liberal Party held eight seats each, whilst Pokies and Family First held two seats each. The Greens and an ex-Democrat independent held one seat each. Half of the upper house was up for election in 2010, four Labor and five Liberal, one Family First and one ex-Democrat independent.Pokies MP Xenophon, re-elected in 2006 until 2014, was replaced by former No Pokies candidate John Darley after Xenophons resignation to run for the Senate at the 2007 federal election in which he was successful. Former Liberal MP Brokenshire replaced Family First MP Andrew Evans as an MLC in 2008. The last remaining Democrats MP anywhere in Australia, Kanck, chose to resign before the end of her term, which prompted a party membership ballot to choose a replacement in early 2009. Winderlich was selected. He resigned from the party in late 2009 to sit in parliament as an independent.See also*of the South Australian state election, 2010*of the South Australian House of Assembly, 20102014*of the South Australian Legislative Council, 20102014*results of the South Australian state election, 2010*Previous election: Australian state election, 2006*Next election: Australian state election, 2014External links*2010 South Australian election: Electoral Commission SA*2010 South Australian election: Antony Green - ABC*2010 South Australian election guide: The Poll Bludger*2010 South Australian election: Adelaide Now*Liberals confident as South Australia heads to the polls, 7:30 Report, 16 March 2010, Transcript - Video*The South Australian Election 2010: A Summary - by JaenschReferences
14896912
Clyde_Engineering
File:Aircraft repair workshop from The Powerhouse Museum.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Men at work in the aircraft workshop at Clyde Engineering, from The Museum collectionClyde Engineering was the name of part of the business now known as Downer EDI Rail. Clyde Engineering were involved in the construction of railway locomotives and rolling stock, as well as larger scale engineering projects on behalf of the governments of Australia. Clyde Engineering also maintained and constructed aircraft, and made contributions to the first and second World Wars.HistoryThe company began in Sydney in the mid 19th Century.Products* Railways X class (diesel) locomotive in the 1970s* G8 locomotive - licensed version from GM-EMD in the 1950s and 1960s* EMD G16C locomotive - licensed version from GM-EMD in the 1960s* G12 locomotive - licensed version from GM-EMD in the 1950s* G26 locomotive - licensed version from GM-EMD in the 1970s* Railways B class (diesel)* Railways C class (diesel) - 1977* South Wales 422 class locomotive * L-Class electric locomotive* South Wales 81 class locomotive high adhesion locomotive* South Wales 82 class locomotive* Bogies for Q Class and S Class locomotives* G class locomotive* class interstate locomotive* class locomotive * class locomotive*  Lakewood Firewood Co Pty Ltd Diesel Hydraulic* South Wales 49 class locomotive* South Wales 90 class locomotive* South Wales C32 class locomotive locomotive* South Wales C36 class locomotive locomotive* South Wales D50 class locomotive locomotive or T-524* South Wales D53 class locomotive locomotive* South Wales D55 class locomotive locomotive* South Wales D57 class locomotive locomotive* N class locomotive* P class locomotive* Railways H class (diesel) - locomotive* Railways T class (diesel) - locomotive* Railways Y class (diesel) - locomotive* WAGR J class locomotive* 3801 locomotive* DA class diesel electric mainline locomotive Featured longer-than-standard chassis to accommodate larger fuel tank. * DBR class diesel electric mainline locomotive rebuilt from Canadian-built DB class* DC class diesel electric mainline locomotive rebuilt from Canadian-built DA class* South Wales 42 class locomotive - locomotive* South Wales 421 class locomotive - locomotiveOther non rail related products:* Lawnmowers and lead batteries - 1930s* Servicing planes, naval vessels* Mining equipment* Automobile parts and accessories* Bulldozers* Cranes* Structural steel* Air cargo* LorriesManufacturing Facilities* Granville locomotive plant - New South Wales* Rosewater locomotive plant - Adelaide* Braemar wagon plant * NSW* Somerton (Melbourne) * Eagle Farm (Brisbane)Clients and OperatorsList of operators whom have purchased or have Clyde locomotives in their fleet:* Railroad Group  * Railways  * Railway * Australia  * ONCF * Republic of Iran Railways * Railways * Railways * Korail * Rail  * Australian Government Railways  * Billiton  * Zealand Railways Department * Rail Authority of New South Wales  * Railways * National ** Rail Corporation * V/Line * National * Railroad Group/and Wyoming Australia* Container Transport * Freight Car Leasing Australia * Firewood Co. Pty. Ltd  See also* A History of Clyde Engineering* Harbour Bridge
14917305
Cape_Nome_Mining_District_Discovery_Sites
 refnum78000535Cape Nome Mining District Discovery Sites is a Historic Landmark located in Nome, Alaska. It was named a National Historic Landmark in 1978.((postscript and )  It is significant for its role in the history of mining in Alaska.References
14935029
Hazar,_Turkmenistan
footnotes Hazar is a city in Turkmenistan on the Sea, part of the Province, formerly eleken, also written Cheleken.PetroleumThis city and area is within a rich oil reserves. As far back as 1st century, the Greek philosopher Strabo said, They say, diggers opened oily springs near the Okh River. Indeed, if a country has alkaline, asphalt, sticky, sulfurous waters, it is most likely to have oily springs. Only, their scarceness makes this fact miraculous. In 1743, a Captain Woodruff of a British merchant company remarked that there were 36 Ogurdjali families resided on the island. They had 26 large boats and some wells. Prior to 1917, the Moscow Society, Cheleken-Dagestan Society, Kuzmin and Co, Bostondjoglo, South Caucasian Mining Society, and Second Moscow Group were among established Russian oil companies. By 1925, after the establishment of Soviet Turkmenistan, wells had been nationalized and oil production decreased. By the late 1950s, oil production index went up again.(Black Gold of Ancient Hazar)ReferencesHazar nfo External links * Picture of Hazar / Cheleken on PanoramioTurcmenistanet:Hazarpl:Hazar()tk:Hazaruk:
14949005
Dry_lubricant
Dry lubricants or solid lubricants are materials which despite being in the solid phase, are able to reduce friction between two surfaces sliding against each other without the need for a liquid media.Such lubricants, including materials such as graphite, hexagonal nitride, disulfide and disulfide are also able to offer lubrication at temperatures higher than liquid and oil-based lubricants are able to operate. These lubricants are often to be found in applications such as locks or lubricated bearings. Such materials can operate up to 350C in oxidizing environments and even higher in reducing / non-oxidizing environments (molybdenum disulfide up to 1100C). The low-friction characteristics of most dry lubricants are attributed to a layered structure on the molecular level with weak bonding between layers. Such layers are able to slide relative to each other with minimal applied force, thus giving them their low friction properties.  However, a layered crystal structure alone is not necessarily sufficient for lubrication.   In fact, there are also some solids with non-lamellar structures that function well as dry lubricants in some applications.  These include certain soft metals (In, Pb, Ag, Sn), polytetrafluroethylene, some solid oxides, rare-earth fluorides, and even diamond.  Limited interest has been shown in low friction properties of oxide glaze layers formed at several hundred degrees Celsius in metallic sliding systems, however, practical use is still many years away due to their physically unstable nature.The three most commonly used solid lubricants are# Graphite - Used in compressors, foodstuff industry, railway track joints, open gear, bearings, machine-shop works etc. It is also very common for lubricating locks, since a liquid lubricant allows particles to get stuck in the lock worsening the problem.# Molybdenum disulfide - Used in joints and space vehicles. Does also lubricate in vacuum.# Hexagonal boron nitride - Used in space vehicles. Also called white graphite.# Tungsten disulfide - Similar usage as Molybdenum disulfide, but due to the high cost only found in some lubricated bearings.Graphite and molybdenum disulfide (MoS2) are the predominant materials used as solid lubricant. In the form of dry powder these materials are effective lubricant additives due to their lamellar structure. The lamellas orient parallel to the surface in the direction of motion. Even between highly loaded stationary surfaces the lamellar structure is able to prevent contact. In the direction of motion the lamellas easily shear over each other resulting in a low friction. Large particles best perform on relative rough surfaces at low speed, finer particle on relative smooth surface and higher speeds.Other components that are useful solid lubricants include boron nitride, polytetrafluorethylene (PTFE), talc, calcium fluoride, cerium fluoride and tungsten disulfide.ApplicationsSolid lubricants are useful for conditions when conventional lubricants are inadequate, such as:* reciprocating motion. A typical application is a sliding or reciprocating motion that requires lubrication to minimize wear as for example in gear and chain lubrication. Liquid lubricants will squeezed out while solid lubricants dont escape and prevent for fretting corrosion and galling. ceramics. Another application is for cases where chemically active lubricant additives have not been found for a particular surface, such as polymers and ceramics. * high temperature. Graphite and MoS2 exhibit high temperature and oxidizing atmosphere environments, whereas liquid lubricants typically will not survive. A typical application include fasteners which are easily tightened and unscrewed after a long stay at high temperatures. * extreme contact pressures. The lamellar structure orient parallel to the sliding surface resulting in high bearing-load combined with a low shear stress. Most applications in metal forming that involve plastic deformation will utilize solid lubricants.   Graphite  Graphite is structurally composed of planes of polycyclic carbon atoms that are hexagonal in orientation. The distance of carbon atoms between planes is longer and therefore the bonding is weaker.Graphite is best suited for lubrication in a regular atmosphere. Water vapor is a necessary component for graphite lubrication. The adsorption of water reduces the bonding energy between the hexagonal planes of the graphite to a lower level than the adhesion energy between a substrate and the graphite. Because water vapor is a requirement for lubrication, graphite is not effective in vacuum. In an oxidative atmosphere graphite is effective at high temperatures up to 450C continuously and can withstand much higher temperature peaks. The thermal conductivity of graphite is generally low ~1.3 W/mK at 40C.Graphite is characterized by two main groups: natural and synthetic. Synthetic graphite is a high temperature sintered product and is characterized by its high purity of carbon (99.5-99.9%). The primary grade synthetic graphite can approach the good lubricity of quality natural graphite.Natural graphite is derived from mining. The quality of natural graphite varies as a result of the ore quality and post mining processing of the ore. The end product is graphite with a content of carbon (high grade graphite 96-98% carbon), sulfur, SiO2 and Ash. The higher the carbon content and the degree of graphitization (high crystalline) the better the lubricity and resistance to oxidation. For applications where only a minor lubricity is needed and a more thermally insulating coating is required, then amorphous graphite would be chosen (80% carbon).  Molybdenum Disulfide  MoS2 is a mined material found in the thin veins within granite and highly refined in order to achieve a purity suitable for lubricants. Just like graphite has MoS2 a hexagonal crystal structure with the intrinsic property of easy shear. MoS2 lubrication performance often exceeds that of graphite and is effective in vacuum as well whereas graphite does not. The temperature limitation of MoS2 at 400C is restricted by oxidation. The particle size and film thickness are important parameters that should be matched to the surface roughness of the substrate. Large particles may result in excessive wear by abrasion caused by impurities in the MoS2, small particles may result in accelerated oxidation.  Boron Nitride  Boron Nitride is a ceramic powder lubricant. The most interesting lubricant feature is its high temperature resistance of 1200C service temperature in an oxidizing atmosphere. Further Boron has a high thermal conductivity.  Boron is available in two chemical structures, i.e. cubic and hexagonal where the last is the lubricating version. The cubic structure is very hard and used as an abrasive and cutting tool component.  PTFE  PTFE is widely used as an additive in lubricating oils and greases. Due to the low surface energy of PTFE, stable unflocculated dispersions of PTFE in oil or water can be produced. Contrary to the other solid lubricants discussed, PTFE does not have a layered structure. The macro molecules of PTFE slip easily along each other, similar to lamellar structures. PTFE shows one of the smallest coefficients of static and dynamic friction, down to 0.04. Operating temperatures are limited to about 260C.  Application methods  Spraying/dipping/brushing: Dispersion of solid lubricant as an additive in oil, water or grease is most common used. For parts that are inaccessible for lubrication after assembly a dry film lubricant can be sprayed. After the solvent evaporates, the coating cures at room temperature to form a solid lubricant. Pastes are grease like lubricants containing a high percentage of solid lubricants used for assembly and lubrication of highly loaded, slow moving parts. Black pastes generally contain MoS2. For high temperatures above 500C pastes are composed on the basis of metal powders to protect metal parts from oxidation necessary to facilitate disassembly of threaded connections and other assemblies.Free powders: Dry-powder tumbling is an effective application method. The bonding can be improved by priory phosphating the substrate. Use of free powders has its limitations, since adhesion of the solid particles to the substrate is usually insufficient to provide any service life in continuous applications. However, to improve running-in conditions or in metal forming processes a short duration of the improved slide conditions may suffice.AF-coatings: Anti-friction coatings are lubricating paints consisting of fine particles of lubricating pigments, such as molydisulfide, PTFE or graphite, blended with a binder. After application and proper curing, these lubricants bond to the metal surface and form a dark gray solid film. Many dry film lubricants also contain special rust inhibitors which offer exceptional corrosion protection. Most long wearing films are of the bonded type but are still restricted to applications where sliding distances are not too long. AF-coatings are applied where fretting and galling is a problem (such as splines, universal joints and keyed bearings), where operating pressures exceed the load-bearing capacities of ordinary oils and greases, where smooth running in is desired (piston, camshaft), where clean operation is desired (AF-coatings will not collect dirt and debris like greases and oils), where parts may be stored for long periods of time.  Composites  Self lubricating composites: Solid lubricants as PTFE, graphite, MoS2 and some other anti friction and anti wear additives are often compounded in polymers and all kind of sintered materials. MoS2 for example is compounded in materials for sleeve bearings, elastomere O-rings, carbon brushes etc. Solid lubricants are compounded in plastics to form a Self lubricating or Internally lubricated thermoplastic composite. PTFE particles for example compounded in the plastic form a PTFE film over the mating surface resulting in a reduction of friction and wear. MoS2 compounded in Nylon reduces wear, friction and stick-slip. Furthermore it acts as a nucleating agent effecting in a very fine crystalline structure. The primary use of graphite lubricated thermoplastics is in applications operating in aqueous environments. References :www.tribology-abc.com/abc/solidlub.htm secsecosolidede:Festschmierstoff
14979654
Rudite
Rudite is a general name used for a sedimentary rocks that are composed of rounded or angular detrital grains, i.e. granules, pebbles, cobbles, and boulders, which are coarser than sand in size. Rudites include sedimentary rocks composed of both siliciclastic, i.e. conglomerate and breccia, and carbonate grains, i.e. calcirudite and rudstone. This term is equivalent to the Greek-derived term, psephite. Rudite was initially proposed by Grabau(Grabau, A.W. (1904) On the classification of sedimentary rocks. American Geologist. vol. 33, pp. 228-247.) as rudyte. It is derived from the Latin word, rudus, for crushed stone, rubbish, debris, and rubble.(U.S. Bureau of Mines Staff (1996) Dictionary of Mining, Mineral, & Related Terms. Report SP-96-1, U.S. Department of Interior, U.S. Bureau of Mines, Washington, D.C.)(Neuendorf, K.K.E., J.P. Mehl, Jr., and J.A. Jackson, J.A., eds. (2005) Glossary of Geology (5th ed.). Alexandria, Virginia, American Geological Institute. 779 pp. ISBN 0-922152-76-4)Rudites can be deposited in a variety of nonmarine and marine environments. In nonmarine settings, gravels, which later were lithified to become rudites, accumulated within fluvial channels, within alluvial fans, and as glacial deposits. In marine environments, rudites were deposited along shorelines as part of beaches, as basal conglomerates during transgressions, and in the deep sea by slumps and turbidites. Rudites composed largely of rounded siliciclastic gravel are conglomerates and others composed of angular siliciclastic gravel are breccias.Pettijohn (Pettijohn F. J. (1975), Sedimentary Rocks, Harper & Row, ISBN 0-96-045191-2) gives the following descriptive terms based on grain size, avoiding the use of terms such as clay or argillaceous which carry an implication of chemical composition. The Greek terms are more commonly used for metamorphosed rocks, and the Latin for unmetamorphosed: Referencesde:Ruditfr:Ruditevi:Rudit
14999741
Ecology_of_the_San_Francisco_Estuary
The San Francisco Estuary and delta represents a highly altered ecosystem. The region has been heavily re-engineered to accommodate the needs of water delivery, shipping, agriculture, and most recently, suburban development. These needs have wrought direct changes in the movement of water and the nature of the landscape, and indirect changes have arisen from the introduction of species. New species have altered the architecture of the food web as surely as levees have altered the landscape of islands and channels that form the complex system known as the Delta.(Kimmerer 2004)This article deals particularly with the ecology of the low salinity zone (LSZ) of the estuary. Reconstructing a historic foodweb for the LSZ is difficult for a number of reasons. First, there is no clear record of the species that historically have occupied the Estuary. Second, the San Francisco Estuary and Delta have been in geologic and hydrologic transition for most of their 10,000 year history, and so describing the natural condition of the Estuary is much like hitting a moving target.( change, hydrologic engineering, shifting water needs, and newly species will continue to alter the food web configuration of the Estuary. This model provides a snapshot of the current state, with notes about recent changes or species introductions that have altered the configuration of the foodweb. Understanding the dynamics of the current web may prove useful for restoration efforts to improve the functioning and species diversity of the estuary. Physical geography thumb|300px|right|San Francisco Estuary ca. 1770-1820The Francisco Bay is both a bay and an estuary. The former term refers to any inlet or cove providing a physical refuge from the open ocean. An estuary is any physiographic feature where freshwater meets an ocean or sea. The northern portion of the Bay is a brackish estuary, consisting of a number of physical embayments which are dominated by both marine and fresh water fluxes. These geographic entities are, moving from saline to fresh (or west to east): Pablo Bay, immediately north of the Central Bay; the Strait, a narrow, deep channel leading to Bay; and the Delta of the Sacramento and Joaquin Rivers.Until the 20th Century, the LSZ of the Estuary was fringed by tule-dominated freshwater wetlands. Between 80-95% of these historic wetlands have been filled to facilitate land use and development around the Bay Area.(Conomos 1979) Habitat loss at the edges of the zone is thought to create a loss of native fish species, by increasing vulnerability to predation.The intertidal and benthic Estuary is presently dominated by mudflats that are largely the result of sedimentation derived from mining in the Sierras in the late 19th Century. The trend toward high sediment loads was reversed in the 1950s with the advent of the Valley Project, locking up most sediment behind dams, and resulting in an annual net loss of sediments from the Estuary.(Vayssieres 2006) Thus the mudflats appear to be slowly receding, although turbidity remains extremely high. The high turbidity of the water is responsible for the unique condition that exists in the San Francisco Estuary wherein high nutrient availability does not lead to high phytoplankton production. Instead, most algae photosynthetic organisms are light-limited.(Jassby 2000)The Delta has likewise experienced heavy alteration. Beginning in the 19th Century, naturally occurring levees were reinforced for permanency, to protect farmlands from regular flooding. Many of these farms were established on peat islands occurring in the middle of the Delta waterways. Intensive farming oxidized the high carbon content of the soil, causing considerable loss of soil mass. As a consequence, these islands have subsided, or sunk, to nearly 6 meters below sea level.(Deverel 1998) The Delta today consists of highly riprapped waterways, punctuated by islands that appear like floating bowls with their basins far below the surface of the water.(Philip 2007) These islands are at high risk for flooding due to levy collapse. The subsequent eastward shift in salinity is expected to dramatically alter the ecology of the entire LSZ of the San Francisco Estuary.(Lund 2007) Hydrodynamics The LSZ centers around 2 psu (salinity units, a measurement of salinity) and ranges from about 6 psu down to 0.5 psu. The primary fresh water inputs to the Estuary derive from regional precipitation, the Sacramento River, and the San Joaquin River.(Kimmerer 2002)River inflow is largely controlled by upstream reservoir releases. A significant fraction of this inflow is exported out of the Delta by the federal Valley Project and the Water Project to southern California for agricultural and urban use. These alterations have removed much of the variation in through-estuary outflow (i. e., freshwater that makes it out the Gate), creating lower outflow in the winter and higher outflow in the summer than historically found in the Estuary. Phytoplankton, zooplankton, and larval and adult fish can become entrained in the export pumps, causing a potentially significant but unknown impact on the abundance of these organisms. This may be particularly true of the endangered smelt, a small endemic fish; unexceptional except that is has been described as being tremendously abundant in historical accounts.(Moyle 1992) The delta smelt is believed to migrate and spawn upstream in the Delta during the early summer, placing its eggs and larvae at high risk for entrainment.(Bennett 2006) Management for the smelt is currently the source of controversy as its ecology brings into collision course the disparate water needs of conservation, development and agriculture in California.The movement of water out of the estuary is complex and dependent upon a number of factors. Tidal cycles cause water to move toward and away from the Golden Gate four times in a 24 hour period. Using 2 psu as a marker for the Low Salinity Zone, the direction and magnitude of fluctuations can be tracked as the distance in kilometers from the Golden Gate, or X2.Because the position of X2 relies upon a number of physical parameters including inflow, export, and tides, its position shifts over many kilometers on a daily and seasonal cycle; over the course of a year, it can range from San Pablo Bay during high flow periods, up into the Delta during the summer drought. The position of X2 is carefully monitored and maintained by releasing water from upstream reservoirs in anticipation of export demand. This is mandated by in the Vernalis Salinity Standard, which was legally established to maintain habitat quality in the Estuary for wildlife and to prevent salinity from encroaching upstream to the export pumps.(Trott 2006)Gravitational circulation causes stratified high salinity water at depth to flow landward while low salinity water on top flows seaward.(Monismith 1996) The effect of gravitational circulation may be most pronounced during periods of high fresh water flow, providing a negative feedback for maintaining the salt field and the distribution of pelagic organisms in the Estuary.Mixing is important at the landward edge of gravitational circulation, often around X2, where the water column becomes less stratified.(Burau 1998) A fixed mixing zone occurs at the Benicia Bump at the east end of the Carquinez Strait, where the deep channel becomes dramatically shallower as it enters Suisun Bay.(Schoellhamer 2001) Mixing is critical in maintaining salinity such that extremely large inputs of fresh water are required to move X2 a short distance to the west. Mixing also assists pelagic organisms in maintaining position in the Estuary( slowing the advection of primary and secondary production out of the system.Pelagic zonePelagic organisms spend all or part of their lives in the open water, where habitat is defined not by edges but by physiological tolerance to salinity and temperature. The Low Salinity Zone (LSZ) of the San Francisco Estuary constitutes a habitat for a suite of organisms that are specialized to survive in this unique confluence of terrestrial, freshwater, and marine influences. While there are many habitats with distinct ecologies that are part of the Estuary (including marine, freshwater, marsh and benthic mudflat systems) each is linked to the LSZ by export and import of freshwater, nutrients, carbon, and organisms.(The distribution and abundance of organisms in the LSZ is dependent upon both abiotic and biotic factors. Abiotic factors include the geography and hydrology of the Estuary, including nutrient inputs, sediment load, turbidity, environmental stochasticity, climate and anthropogenic influences.( Abiotic factors tend to drive production in the estuarine environment, and are mediated by biotic factors.Biotic factors include nutrient uptake and production, production of zooplankton, foodweb and dynamics, energetic transfer, advection and dispersal in and out of the system, survivorship and mortality, predation, and competition from species. Food web image:Ecological pyramid.svg|thumb|300px|right|A trophic or pyramidIt is difficult to characterize the historic web of the San Francisco Estuary because of the dramatic changes in geography, hydrology, and species composition that have occurred in the past century. However, monitoring begun in the 1970s gives some information about the historic dynamics of the foodweb. Prior to the 1980s the LSZ was dominated by a phytoplankton-driven foodweb, a stable mesoplankton population dominated by E. affinis, and large macrozooplankton typified by San Francisco bay shrimp and mysids(Orsi 1986) These provided nutrition and energy to native filter feeders such as the northern anchovy (Engraulis mordax), and planktivores such as smelt and juvenile salmon.Food web change has been driven historically by increased turbidity, and more recently by introduced species, as described in the sections on primary and secondary production.Notably, the high clearance rate of the introduced Amur River clam population has produced a ten-fold decline in plankton density, resulting in a carbon trap in the benthos and an assumed increase in waste detrital production.(Kimmerer 1996) This waste is hypothesized to fuel the microbial loop, resulting in an increase in microzooplankton such as L. tetraspina, which utilize rotifers and ciliates.These changes are one cause for declining fish stocks. For example, the northern anchovy, Engraulis mordax, was until the 1980s quite abundant in the Low Salinity Zone, until its range in the Estuary became restricted to the Central and South Bays.(Kimmerer 2006) This is probably due to a behavioral response following the introduction of the River clam and the subsequent decline in plankton availability.More recently, a general Pelagic Organism Decline (POD) was described, and this has been the source of much concern within the scientific, managerial, and political communities.Several key species, including smelt, smelt, bass, and shad have been declared species of interest because of a stepwise decline in abundance beginning in 2001.(Taugher 2005) This was attended by a similar decline in secondary productivity and is currently the source of much research. A number of hypotheses have been proposed to explain the POD, including food web decline, water exports from the Delta, and toxics from urban, industrial, or agricultural sources. Producers  Primary production and nutrient uptake production by phytoplankton fixes energy and key nutrients into a biologically available form (ie, food), via photosynthesis. Phytoplankton production is largely structured by physical parameters: nutrient availability, sunlight, turbidity, and temperature.The San Francisco Estuary has a non-limiting source of nutrients that can be used for primary production, derived largely from waste water treatment facilities, agricultural and urban drainage, and the ocean.(Smith 2002)(Dugdale 2003) In spite of this, the Estuary is unique in that it tends to have a relatively depressed rate of primary production(Jassby 2002) This is probably due to two factors: large inputs of nitrogen in the form of ammonium, which suppresses nitrate uptake by phytoplankton, and high turbidity, which limits light for photosynthesis to the top few centimeters of the water column.( This turbidity is a legacy of hydraulic gold mining in the Nevada Mountains in the 1850s.(Nichols 1986)High residence time of water in the Estuary tends to allow phytoplankton biomass to accumulate, increasing density, while low residence time removes phytoplankton from the Estuary.( The latter is typical of the main channels of the Estuary during periods of high flow, when surface waters tend to advect particles and plankton downstream.Herbivory also removes phytoplankton from the water column. While the pelagic food web is based upon phytoplankton production, most of this production is diverted to the benthos via predation by the introduced River clam (Corbula amurensis). Levels of phytoplankton biomass declined by an order of magnitude after the widespread introduction of C. amurensis in the mid-1980s, and have not rebounded.(Kimmerer 1994) Photosynthetic production The main source of photosynthetically derived energy is phytoplankton. Generally speaking, diatoms and microflagellates produce most of the bioavailable carbon in the Estuary.(Jassby and Cloern 2000) Other types, notably the dinoflagellates, may produce algal blooms, or tides, that are less readily available for assimilation into the foodweb.(Anderson et al. 2002)production from phytoplankton is a function of two different factors: growth rates and accumulation (Fig. 1). Although the LSZ is a sink for high concentrations of nutrients from urban and agricultural sources, phytoplankton production rates are quite low.(Jassby et al. 2002) Nitrate is optimally used by phytoplankton for growth, but ammonium (largely derived from sewage outfalls) has a suppressive effect on growth rate. Thus, while not nutrient limited, phytoplankton tend to grow more slowly due to the kinds of nitrogen present.(Dugdale et al. 2003) Another suppressive factor on growth rate is the high turbidity of the Estuary, which limits the ability of active radiation (PAR) to penetrate beyond the top few centimeters of the water column. This limits phytoplankton photosynthesis to a relatively shallow zone. Thus, when the column is stratified, turbidity is high, and ammonium is present, the growth rate of phytoplankton is typically suppressed.(Cloern 1987)(Cole and Cloern 1987)Phytoplankton accumulation is primarily the result of time.( The north Delta and Bay have relatively low residence times due to the high volume of water moving through the region for downstream flow and for export to southern California. Since water moves more rapidly through this part of the system, the rate of accumulation decreases as productivity is advected out of the system. In contrast, parts of the southern Delta have a higher residence time due to the low volume of water moving through the system; in fact the water on occasion runs backwards, due to the lack of inflow from the San Joaquin River, and export pumping. During summer, phytoplankton density may be an order of magnitude higher here than in other parts of the Estuary.(Ball and Arthur 1979)Harmful algal blooms (HABs) of dinoflagellates or cyanobacteria produce toxic metabolic byproducts that render them noxious to many organisms. Fostered by a combination of high nutrient concentrations and temperatures, HABs have a doubly negative affect on the food web by competitively excluding diatoms and microflagellates, further reducing bioavailable primary production. While certain invertebrates such as bivalves may not be directly affected, they may propagate toxins up the food chain, sickening or killing predators. It is not well understood how copepods are affected. The invasive algae Microcystis aeruginosa is now common in the Delta during summer months and may reduce copepod productivity (in addition to being potentially carcinogenic for humans).(Lehman and Waller 2003) Detrital production Enormous quantities of sediment and detritus flux through the LSZ. Much of this is organic debris in the form of dissolved and particulate matter (DOM and POM, respectively). In addition to upstream sources, organic matter may accumulate from local organism mortality and waste production.(Murrell et al. 1999)(Murrell and Hollibaugh 2000)Detritivores capitalize upon this energy source, creating an alternate and parallel food web of potentially large importance. This is because fixation into the detrital food web is not limited by stratification, turbidity or day length, all of which limit photosynthesis. Detrital production occurs continuously, limited only by inputs and advection out of the Delta system.((Jassby et al. 1993)Bacteria are the chief agents of transformation of DOM and POM into bioavailable carbon through the loop. This mechanism is particularly important in nutrient limited marine systems, where bacteria release nutrients from sinking detritus, allowing it to be recycled back to the photic zone. Little work has been applied to the function of the microbial loop in the San Francisco Estuary, but it may be that the role of bacteria is not critical for recycling nutrients in a eutrophic system. Rather, they may provide an alternative food chain through direct grazing by flagellates, rotifers and ciliates.(Hollibaugh and Wong 1996)The high abundance of the cyclopoid copepod Limnoithona tetraspina may be due to its reliance on ciliates rather than phytoplankton as a primary food source.(Bouley 2006) The major species of calanoid copepods may also use ciliates as a supplementary or even primary food source, but to what degree is unknown.(Rollwagen-Bollens and Penry 2003)(Rollwagen-Bollens et al. 2006) Secondary production Secondary production refers to organisms that feed on primary production and transfer energy to higher levels of the estuarine foodweb. Historically, secondary production in the San Francisco Estuary was dominated by shrimp production.(Modlin 1997)(Kimmerer 1998) However, the native mysid Neomysis mercedis has been largely replaced by the introduced Acanthomysis bowmani, which persists at lower densities. The introduced amphipod Gammurus daiberi may have taken over some of this niche, but it is largely restricted to fresh water.Today, the main source of secondary production derives from copepods. The naturalized native calanoid copepod Eurytemora affinis is believed to have been introduced near the end of 19th Century.(Lee 1999) It dominated the zooplankton of the low salinity zone until the 1980s when it was largely replaced by another introduced calanoid copepod, Pseudodiaptomus forbesi.((Orsi 1991) P. forbesi persists by maintaining a source population in freshwater, high-residence regions of the Estuary, particularly in the Delta, outside the range of salinity tolerance of the Amur River clam.(Durand2006) Because the once-dominant E. affinis lacks an upstream range, it is more vulnerable to predation by the clam, and suffers from apparent competition with P. forbesi.Other calanoid copepods that may be of significance are the recently introduced Sinocalanus doerri and Acartiella sinensis. Little is known about the life histories of these organisms, although based upon their morphology, they may prey on other copepods. They appear in irregular cycles of abundance, during which they may dominate the zooplankton(Orsi 1999)Yet another invasive copepod, the very small cyclopoid Limnoithona tetraspina, appeared in the Low Salinity Zone in the 1990s. Since then, L. tetraspina has become the numerically dominant copepod, reaching densities on the order of 10,000/m3. It relies on the loop as its food source, feeding upon bacteria, ciliates and rotifers( In addition, it seems invulnerable to predation by the Amur River clam, for reasons that are unknown. Because of its small size, L. tetraspina is generally not available for consumption by larger predators, particularly fish, making it an energetic dead end. Consumers  Primary consumers consumers rely upon production as a main food source. The most important consumers of the pelagic web of the LSZ are copepods, along with the rotifers, flagellates and ciliates mentioned above. All species of calanoid copepods have declined under high predation pressure from the recently introduced Amur River clam (Corbula amurensis).( Because of this, and because copepods rely upon both photosynthetic and detrital food sources, copepods in the LSZ have limited feedback on primary production, unlike marine and lentic systems where copepods can graze down blooms in a matter of days.Pseudodiaptomus forbesi is the dominant calanoid copepod of the LSZ in terms of biomass. It has a sufficiently wide salinity tolerance that it can persist both at low salinity and in fresh water. This wide distribution helps the population maintain an upstream refuge from predation, unlike other species with narrower salinity tolerances.(Limnoithona tetraspina has become the numerically dominant cyclopoid copepod since its introduction in 1993. It feeds primarily upon ciliates and microflagellates, but unlike P. forbesi, it is relatively impervious to predation by clams or fish, hence its abundance. Energetically, L. tetraspina may be a dead end for the food web; these copepods are either advected out of the system by tides and currents, or die and fall down to the benthos, where they may be available to the microbial loop, or to detritivores.(Bouley and Kimmerer 2006) Predatory copepods A number of predatory copepods exist throughout the Delta, about which relatively little is known. Sinocalanus doerri, Acartiella sinensis, and Tortanus dextrilobatus all appear to be morphologically capable of predation upon other copepods. Each was introduced to the Estuary, probably through water exchange since the 1980s. Generally, they are not in sufficient abundance to negatively impact copepod consumers; however, periodic blooms of S. doerri and A. sinensis occur which have not been well studied.(Orsi and Ohtsuka 1999) Macroinvertebrates File:Gnathophausia zoea.jpg|thumb|right|A decline in mysids has been linked to a decline in some fish species that feed on them.While capable of filter-feeding, mysids (tiny shrimp-like creatures) are largely carnivorous, feeding on copepod adults. They provided an energetic conduit between plankton and planktivorous fishes, including juvenile fishes, sturgeon, salmon, and shad. Mysids were once abundant until the native Neomysis mercedis was replaced in the mid-1980s by the invasive Acanthomysis bowmani, which is smaller and less abundant. Mysid decline has been linked to the subsequent decline in a number of fish species in the Estuary in the 1980s and 90s.(Orsi and Knutson 1979)(Modlin and Orsi 1997)Shrimp are generalist carnivores who prey largely on mysids and amphipods. Crangon franciscorum represents one of two remaining commercial fisheries in the estuary. While no longer used for San Francisco Bay Shrimp Cocktails, they are harvested for bait. Other predators include bass and salmon adults and smolts.(Sitts and Knight 1979) Fish File:Dentonshad1904.jpg|thumb|right|Pregnant shads compete for food with the Amur River clam.Because fish are a taxonomically and morphologically diverse group, species vary in their trophic ecologies. In general, fish can be divided into four broad feeding categories: feeders, planktivores, piscivores and benthic feeders.Filter feeders strain the water column indiscriminately for small prey, typically phyto- and zooplankton. This category of fishes includes shad (Dorosoma petenense), shad (Alosa sapidissima), silversides (Menidia beryllina), and anchovies (Engraulis mordax). Some evidence suggests that some of these species are food-limited due to the depressed levels of plankton after the introduction of the Amur River clam. Anchovies have left the LSZ in favor of more productive regions of the Estuary in the San Pablo and Central Bays.(Planktivores selectively prey upon individual zooplankton, such as copepods, mysids and gammarids. This group includes most fish larvae, smelt (transpacificus) and smelt (thaleichthys), perch (Hysterocarpus traski), and salmon smolts. The delta smelt is of particular interest due to its endangered status. It may be food-limited, but the evidence is somewhat contradictory. Other factors, such as entrainment of eggs and larvae in the export pumping of fresh water from the Delta may also explain the decline.(File:Striped Bass.jpg|thumb|left|The bass is the main piscivore of the LSZThe main piscivore of the LSZ is the bass (saxatilis), which was introduced in the 1890s and preys heavily upon native fishes. Striped bass are an important sport fishery in the San Francisco Estuary, and as such, represent a minor withdrawal of biomass from the Estuary.(Radovich 1963)Benthic, or bottom-dwelling, fishes include sturgeon (Acipenser transmontanus), white catfish (Ameiurus catus), and flounder (Platichthys stellatus). Because of their habitat orientation, they feed primarily on epibenthic organisms such as amphipods, bay shrimp, and bivalves. These fish are known to feed at least occasionally on the Amur River clam, which would represent one of the few channels for energy flow from that species, except for detrital production.(Peterson 1997)The sole fishery in the LSZ is for bait shrimp. There are a variety of sports fisheries that represent a minor flow of carbon, but significant flows of capital to local economies around the Estuary. Most of the recreational fisheries surround striped bass, sturgeon, and introduced fresh water basses in the freshwater Delta. This paucity of fisheries makes the San Francisco Estuary unique. Nearly all estuaries worldwide support at least remnants of significant fisheries.(Nichols et al. 1986) The San Francisco Estuary at one time supported major fisheries for salmon, anchovies, and crabs until the 1950s. The demise of these fisheries was probably due more to loss than overharvesting.( Birds File:Raildumbartrazorback.jpg|thumb|right|The clapper rail is endangeredThe San Francisco Estuary is a major stop on the flyway for migrating waterfowl. Yet little is known about the flow of carbon in or out of the Estuary via birds. Millions of waterfowl annually use the bay shallows as a refuge. Most of the birds are ducks that feed on submerged aquatic vegetation. Diving ducks (such as scaups) feed on epibenthic organisms like C. amurensis, representing a possible flow of carbon from that otherwise dead end.(Poulton et al. 2002)(Richman and Lovvorn 2004)  Two species of birds are found here: the least tern and the clapper rail. Exposed muds provide important feeding areas for shorebirds, but underlying layers of bay mud pose geological hazards for structures near many parts of the bay perimeter. Piscivorous birds such as cormorants and pelicans also inhabit the Estuary, but their trophic impact remains poorly studied.MammalsImage:Beaver Yearling Grooming Alhambra Creek 2008.jpg|thumb |260px |American Beaver (Castor canadensis) |Yearling beaver in Alhambra Creek, downtown Martinez|leftotter Richmond Marina Scott Campbell July 29, 2010.jpg |thumb |260px |right |River Otter sunning on rocks in the Richmond MarinaBefore 1825, Spanish, French, English, Russians and Americans were drawn to the Bay Area to harvest prodigious quantities of beaver (Castor canadensis), river otter, marten, fisher, mink, fox, weasel, harbor and seals (Callorhinus ursinus) and otter ((Enhydra lutris)). This early fur trade, known as the Fur Rush, was more than any other single factor, responsible for opening up the West and the Francisco Bay Area, in particular, to world trade.() By 1817 sea otter in the area were practically eliminated.() The Russians maintained a sealing station in the nearby Islands from 1812 to 1840, taking 1,200 to 1,500 fur seals annually, though American ships had already exploited the islands.() By 1818 the seals diminished rapidly until only about 500 could be taken annually and within the next few years, the fur seal was extirpated from the islands until they began to recolonize the islands in 1996.() Although twentieth century naturalists were skeptical that beaver were historically extant in coastal streams or the Bay itself,() earlier records show that the California Golden beaver (Castor canadensis ssp. subauratus) was one of the most valued of the animals taken, and apparently was found in great abundance.( Thomas McKay reported that in one year the Hudsons Bay Company took 4,000 beaver skins on the shores of San Francisco Bay. Recently, beaver have recolonized the brackish Sonoma Marsh in north Pablo Bay and its Creek and River tributaries. Also recently re-colonizing the Bay and its tributaries, the American River Otter (Lontra canadensis) was first reported in Redwood Creek at Muir Beach in 1996( ), and recently in Corte Madera Creek, and in the south Bay on Coyote Creek( ), as well as in 2010 in San Francisco Bay itself at the Richmond Marina.Humans are the main mammalian predator in the area. Jellyfish Jellyfish have not been prevalent in the Estuary until recently. In east coast estuaries such as the Chesapeake, they are often top-level predators, feeding indiscriminately on both fish and zooplankton. Several small invasive taxa have been identified in the LSZ and freshwater regions. These species strobilate in summer, but maintain polyps in the benthos year round.Their impact on the plankton is unknown, but research is underway to quantify it. In sufficient density, jellies may have a complementary role to C. amurensis in suppressing zooplankton, by inhabiting areas of low salinity outside the range of the clams, where planktonic species have had a predation-free refuge. Benthic consumers The benthic community has taken on a disproportionately large role in the food web ecology of the Estuary due to key invasions by bivalves.( The use of these clams, the Amur River clam (Corbula amurensis) has a wide salinity tolerance that extends into the low salinity zone, but not into freshwater. It filter feeds on phytoplankton and small zooplankton, such as calanoid copepod nauplii. The clam has few predators in the San Francisco Estuary and this allows it to grow to high densities (on the order of tens of thousands/m2). Because of its high clearance rates, it is capable of clearing the entire water column of portions of the Estuary in a few days, leading to drastically depleted plankton populations.(Werner and Hollibaugh 1993) This is thought to be the main cause of a decline in ecosystem productivity after the invasion of the clams in the mid-1980s.((Carlton et al. 1990)(Nichols et al. 1990)This decline in productivity is essentially due to the redirection of the pelagic network to a benthic chain by this one species.( BecaRiver clam feeds on primary producers, consumers and predators, it impacts multiple levels. Consequently, nearly all plankton exhibit signs of competition, in that production at one trophic level impacts all others by increasing clam abundance. This results in a negative loop: C. amurensis limits plankton biomass, which in turn limits C. amurensis. However, inputs from outside the system due to tidal advection or upstream sources may increase C. amurensis biomass, further driving plankton limitation. This feedback loop is further amplified because the clam may persist for more than one or two years, which puts added pressure on plankton populations during cycles of low productivity.The redirection of carbon by C. amurensis to the benthos has created a limited chain, leaving the pelagic web depauperate. Detrital production from clam excretion and death may fuel bacterial production, which may be circulated into the detrital food web, or microbial loop.While the recycled nutrients may support some phytoplankton growth, it ultimately feeds back to increased C. amurensis populations. The recent invasion success of Limnoithona tetraspina may be understood in terms of this phenomenon. It feeds on ciliates and microflagellates which are too small to be grazed by the clam, thereby avoiding competition. Additionally, L. tetraspina appears impervious to predation by the clam or (almost) anything else. The rise of the microbial food web and the invasion of L. tetraspina capitalize are the result of an untapped alternative path for energy flow in the food web, facilitated by C. amurensis. Subsequent patterns of invasion may reflect a similar pattern. Introduced species Species introductions have been increasing since at least the 19th Century as a function of increasing trade and traffic. Introductions include numerous taxa, including copepods, shrimp, amphipods, bivalves, fish and both rooted and floating plants. Many pelagic species have been introduced most recently through water releases from large ships directly into the Estuary.(Carlton 1996) As a result, many of these introduced species originate from estuaries around the Pacific Rim, particularly copepods such as P. forbesi and L. tetraspina. The Amur River clam originates from Asia, and has created significant and drastic changes to the ecology of the LSZ, primarily by diverting pelagic food to the benthos and into an accelerated microbial loop.(Cole 1992)Species have also been introduced via attachment to sporting boats which are trailered between regions.( This is the probable source of a number of low salinity plants like densa and hyacinth (crassipes). These plants have created profound changes in the Delta by disrupting water flow, shading phytoplankton, and providing habitat for piscivorous fish like the bass, saxatilis, itself intentionally introduced in the late 1800s from the Bay.(( The freshwater mussel, originally from Europe, is expected to be introduced by boaters within the next two to ten years, in spite of precautionary measures.(Dey 2007) Future invasions The modern food web is derived from a series of invasions and trophic substitutions.This process is expected to continue, as new organisms arrive through accidental or intentional introductions. What is less clear is the extent to which previous introductions pave the way for future invasions. This may occur in one of three ways.* An early invader may provide a resource that is unutilized in the new system until a new predator is introduced (L. tetraspina and the microbial loop, as described above).* Early invaders may facilitate new ones by altering habitat and making it suitable for subsequent invasions (jelly polyps using Amur River clam shells for substrate).* Apparent competition between old and new residents may increase the possibilities for invasion and settlement of new organisms that can capitalize on unexploited resources (the subsidization of the Amur River clam by upstream populations of the introduced copepod P. forbesi, creating pressure on native copepods). Summary The LSZ food web of the San Francisco Estuary operates in two parallel and asymmetrical directions. The bulk of carbon is assimilated into the benthic and microbial loops, which represent energetic dead ends. A smaller fraction is delivered to higher pelagic trophic levels which may support copepods, fish, birds and fisheries. This redirection of the food web into these two narrow loops may be responsible for the decline in macroinvertebrates and fishes in the Estuary, which operate outside of these chains. Restoration of the estuary to a higher degree of function relies upon the probability of delivering increased benefits to the pelagic web without subsidizing the benthic. Future ecology The ecology of the Low Salinity Zone of the San Francisco Estuary is difficult to characterize because it is the result of a complex synergy of both abiotic and biotic factors. In addition, it continues to undergo rapid change resulting from newly introduced species, direct anthropogenic influences and change. Future ecological changes will be driven on an ecosystem wide scale, particularly as level rise, tectonic instability and infrastructure decline cause levy failure in the Delta.(Epstein 2006) The resulting back-surge in water flow is expected to force X2 into the Delta, jeopardizing spatially oriented habitat (like freshwater marshes), channelizing the low salinity zone, and threatening southern Californias water supply, with unknown and unforeseeable consequences for the natural and human ecology of the West coasts largest estuary.See also* of watercourses in the San Francisco Bay Area* of the San Francisco Bay Area* Watershed Project Notes  References * Anderson, D. M., P. M. Glibert, and J. M. Burkholder. 2002. Harmful Algal Blooms and Eutrophication: Nutrient Sources, Composition, and Consequences. Estuaries 25:704-726.* Ball, M. D., and J. F. Arthur. 1979. Planktonic chlorophyll dynamics in the northern San Francisco Bay and Delta. Pages 265-286 in T. J. Conomos, editor. San Francisco Bay: The urbanized estuary. American Association for the Advancement of Science, Pacific Division, San Francisco, CA.* Bennett, W. A. (2006). Delta Smelt Growth and Survival During the Recent Pelagic Organism Decline: What Causes Them Summer Time Blues? CALFED Science Conference. Sacramento, CA.* Bouley P., W. J. K. (2006). Ecology of a highly abundant, introduced cyclopoid copepod in a temperate estuary.  Marine Ecology Progress Series 324: 219-228.* Burau, J. R. (1998). Results from the hydrodynamic element of the 1994 entrapment zone study in Suisun Bay, Sacramento, CA.  Interagency Ecological Program for the San Francisco Bay-Delta Estuary Technical Report 56: 13-62.* Carlton, J. T., J. K. Thompson, L. E. Schemel, and F. H. Nichols. 1990. Remarkable invasion of San Francisco Bay (California, USA) by the Asian clam Potamocorbula amurensis. 1. Introduction and dispersal. Marine Ecology Progress Series. 66:81-94.* Carlton, J. (1996). Biological Invasions and Cryptogenic Species.  Ecology 77(6).* Cole, B. E., and J. E. Cloern. 1987. An empirical model for estimating phytoplankton productivity in estuaries. Marine Ecology Progress Series. 36:299-305.* Cole, B. E., J. K. Thompson, and J. E. Cloern (1992). Measurement of filtration rates by infaunal bivalves in a recirculating flume.  Marine Biology 113: 219-225.* Cloern, J. E. 1987. Turbidity as a control on phytoplankton biomass and productivity in estuaries. Continental Shelf Research 7:1367-1381.* Conomos, T. J., Ed. (1979). San Francisco Bay: The urbanized estuary. San Francisco, CA, Pacific Division, American Association for the Advancement of Science.* Deverel, S. (1998). Subsidence mitigation in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta., CALFED Bay-Delta Program.* Dey, R. (2007, January 16, 2007). Invasive Mussel Update from Lake Mead National Recreation Area.  100th Meridian Initiative, from http://100thmeridian. org/mead. asp.* Dugdale, R. C., V. Hogue, A. Marchi, A. Lassiter, and F. Wilkerson. 2003. Effects of anthropogenic ammonium input and flow on primary production in the San Francisco Bay. CALFED Science Program, Sacramento, CA.* Durand, J. (2006). Determinants of calanoid copepod recruitment failure in the San Francisco Estuary Calfed Science Program. Sacramento, CA.* Epstein, E. (2006). Creaky levees ripe for disaster. San Francisco Chronicle. San Francisco.* Hollibaugh, J. T., and P. S. Wong. 1996. Distribution and activity of bacterioplankton in San Francisco Bay. Pages 263-288 in J. T. Hollibaugh, editor. San Francisco Bay: The ecosystem. American Association for the Advancement of Science, San Francisco, CA.* Jassby, A. D., J. E. Cloern, and B. E. Cole. 2002. Annual primary production: Patterns and mechanisms of change in a nutrient-rich tidal ecosystem. Limnology and Oceanography 47:698-712.* Jassby, A. D., J. E. Cloern, and T. M. Powell. 1993. Organic carbon sources and sinks in San Francisco Bay - variability induced by river flow. Marine Ecology Progress Series. 95.* Jassby, A. D., and J. E. Cloern. 2000. Organic matter sources and rehabilitation of the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta (California, USA). Aquatic Conservation: Marine and Freshwater Ecosystems 10:323-352.* Jassby, A. D., J. E. Cloern and B. E. Cole. (2002). Annual primary production: Patterns and mechanisms of change in a nutrient-rich tidal ecosystem.  Limnology and Oceanography 47(3): 698-712.* Kimmerer, W. J., E. Gartside, and J. J. Orsi. (1994). Predation by an introduced clam as the likely cause of substantial declines in zooplankton of San Francisco Bay.  Mar. Ecol. Prog. Ser. 113: 81-93.* Kimmerer, W. J., J. J. Orsi. 1996. Changes in the zooplankton of the San Francisco Bay estuary since the introduction of the clam Potamocorbula amurensis. Pages 403-425 in J. T. Hollibaugh, editor. San Francisco Bay: The Ecosystem. American Association for the Advancement of Science, San Francisco, CA.* Kimmerer, W. J., J. R. Burau, and W. A. Bennett. (1998). Tidally oriented vertical migration and position maintenance of zooplankton in a temperate estuary.  Limnol. Oceanogr. 43(7): 1697-1709.* Kimmerer, W. J. (2002). Physical, biological, and management responses to variable freshwater flow into the San Francisco Estuary.  Estuaries 25: 1275-1290.* Kimmerer, W. (2004). Open water process of the San Francisco Estuary: from physical forcing to biological responses.  San Francisco Estuary and Watershed Science 2(1).* Kimmerer, W. (2006). Response of anchovies dampens effects invasive bivalve Corbula amurensis on San Francisco Estuary foodweb.  Marine Ecology Progress Series 324: 207-218.* Lee, C. E. (1999). Rapid and repeated invasions of fresh water by the copepod Eurytermora affinis.  Evolution 53(5): 1423-1434.* Lehman, P. W., and S. Waller. 2003. Microcystis blooms in the delta. IEP Newsletter 16:18-19.* Lund, J., E. Hanak, W. Fleenor, R. Howitt, J. Mount, P. Moyle (2007). Envisioning Futures for the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta. San Francisco, Public Policy Institute.* Modlin, R. F., and J. J. Orsi (1997). Acanthomysis bowmani, a new species, and A. asperali, Mysidacea newly reported from the Sacramento-San Joaquin Estuary, California (Crustacea: Mysidae).  Proceedings of the Biological Society of Washington 110(3): 439-446.* Monismith, S. G., J. R. Burau, and M. Stacey (1996). Stratification dynamics and gravitational circulation on northern San Francisco Bay. San Francisco Bay: The ecosystem. J. T. Hollibaugh. San Francisco, CA, American Association for the Advancement of Science: 123-153.* Moyle, P. B., B. Herbold, D. E. Stevens, and L. W. Miller. (1992). Life history and status of delta smelt in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Estuary, California.  Trans. Am. Fish. Soc. 121: 67-77.* Murrell, M. C., J. T. Hollibaugh, M. W. Silver, and P. S. Wong. 1999. Bacterioplankton dynamics in northern San Francisco Bay: Role of particle association and seasonal freshwater flow. Limnology and Oceanography. 44:295-308.* Murrell, M. C., and J. T. Hollibaugh. 2000. Distribution and composition of dissolved and particulate organic carbon in northern San Francisco Bay during low flow conditions. Estuarine Coastal and Shelf Science 51:75-90.* Nichols, F. H., J. E. Cloern, S. Luoma, and D. H. Peterson. 1986. The modification of an estuary. Science 231:567-573.* Nichols, F. H., J. K. Thompson, and L. E. Schemel. 1990. Remarkable invasion of San Francisco Bay (California, USA) by the Asian clam Potamocorbula amurensis. 2. Displacement of a former community. Marine Ecology Progress Series. 66:95-101.* Orsi, J. J., and A. C. Knutson. 1979. The role of mysid shrimp in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Estuary and factors affecting their abundance and distribution. Pages 401-408 in T. J. Conomos, editor. San Francisco Bay: the urbanized estuary. American Association for the Advancement of Science, Pacific Division, San Francisco.* Orsi, J. J., and W. L. Mecum. (1986). Zooplankton distribution and abundance in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta in relation to certain environmental factors.  Estuaries 9(4 B): 326-339.* Orsi, J. J., and T. C. Walter. (1991). Pseudodiaptomus forbesi and P. marinus (Copepoda: Calanoida), the latest copepod immigrants to Californias Sacramento-San Joaquin Estuary.  Bull. Plankton Soc. Japan Spec. Vol. (Proceedings of the Fourth International Conference on Copepoda): 553-562.* Orsi, J. J., and S. Ohtsuka. (1999). Introduction of the Asian copepods Acartiella sinensis, Tortanus dextrilobatus (Copepoda: Calanoida), and Limnoithona tetraspina (Copepoda: Cyclopoida) to the San Francisco Estuary, California, USA.  Plank. Bio. Ecol. 46: 128-131.* Peterson, H. 1997. Clam-stuffed sturgeon. IEP Newsletter 9:19-19.* Philip, T. (2007). A time to deliver water solutions. Sacramento Bee. Sacramento, CA.* Poulton, V. K., J. R. Lovvorn, and J. Y. Takekawa. 2002. Clam density and scaup feeding behavior in San Pablo Bay, California. The Condor. 104:518-527.* Radovich, J. (1963). Effects of ocean temperature on the seaward movement of striped bass, Roccus saxatilis, on the Pacific coast.  California Department of Fish and Game 49: 191-205.* Richman, S. E., and J. R. Lovvorn. 2004. Relative foraging value to lesser scaup ducks of native and exotic clams from San Francisco Bay. Ecological Applications 14:1217-1231.* Rollwagen-Bollens, G. C., and D. L. Penry. 2003. Feeding dynamics of Acartia sp. in a large, temperate estuary (San Francisco Bay, CA). Marine Ecology Progress Series 257:139-158.* Rollwagen-Bollens, G., S. Gifford, A. Slaughter, and S. M. Bollens. 2006. Protists in a Temperate Estuary: Diversity, Grazing and Consumption by Metazoans. Eos, Transactions of the American Geophysical Union, Ocean Sciences Meeting Supplement. 87:36 OS11D-05.* Schoellhamer, D. H. (2001). Influence of salinity, bottom topography, and tides on locations of estuarine turbidity maxima in northern San Francisco Bay. Coastal and Estuarine Fine SedimentProcesses. W. H. McAnally and A. J. Mehta. Amsterdam, Netherlands, Elsevier: 343-356.* Sitts R. M., A. W. Knight. 1979. Predation by the estuarine shrimps Crangon franciscorum Stimpson and Palaemon macrodactylus Rathbun. Biological Bulletin 156:356-368.* Smith, S. V., and J. T. Hollibaugh (2002). Water, salt, and nutrient exchanges in the San Francisco Bay.  Interagency Ecological Program for the San Francisco Bay-Delta Estuary TechnicalReport 66.* Taugher, Mike (2005). Environmental sirens in Delta are screaming. Contra Costa Times.* Trott, J. S. S., Warren J. Ferguson, and Andrew J. Kleinfeld, (2006). Central Delta Water Agency v. Bureau of Reclamation. United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit. San Francisco, CA.* Vayssieres, M. P. (2006). Trends in the benthos of the upper San Francisco Esutary. CALFED Science Conference. Sacramento, CA.* Werner, I., and J. T. Hollibaugh. 1993. Potamocorbula amurensis (Mollusca, Pelecyopoda): Comparison of clearance rates and assimilation efficiencies for phytoplankton and bacterioplankton. Limnology and Oceanography 38:949-964.
15026887
Huanuni_tin_mine
The Huanuni tin mine is a Bolivian mine 60 km south of Oruro on the way to Potos, the Villa Imperial de Potos. The mine is situated in Bolivias mining heartland. It was originally owned from the turn of the 20th century by Don J. Orlandini, who belonged to one of Bolivias famous tin mining families, and also owner of El Porvenir-Cataricahua; the mine was later sold to Iturri Patio, the leading tin baron. After the Catavi Mine, which was the largest underground tin mine in the world from 1930 to the late 1940s, Huanuni took its place until the end of the 20th century. Thousands of Bolivian mine workers still go underground every day. It was discovered by chance, and was mined for a while simply by axes as tools and burros (donkeys) as transport.See also*of Boliviaja:
15040739
History_of_South_Dakota
The history of South Dakota describes the history of the state of Dakota over the course of several millennia, from its first inhabitants to the recent issues facing the state.Early inhabitantsFile:Black Hills petroglyphs 1.jpg|thumb|left|Craven Canyon petroglyphs in the Hills.Human beings have lived in what is today South Dakota for at least several thousand years. Early hunters first entered North America at least 17,000 years ago via the Bering land bridge, which existed during the last ice age and connected Siberia with Alaska.(Schell, p. 15.) Early settlers in what would become South Dakota were nomadic hunter-gatherers, using primitive Age technology to hunt large prehistoric mammals in the area such as mammoths, sloths, and camels. The Paleolithic culture of these people disappeared around 5000 BC, after the extinction of most of their prey species.(Between AD 500 and 800, much of eastern South Dakota was inhabited by a people known as the Mound Builders.(Schell, p. 16.) The Mound Builders were hunters who lived in temporary villages and were named for the low earthen burial mounds they constructed, many of which still exist. Their settlement seems to have been concentrated around the watershed of the Sioux River and Stone Lake, although other sites have been excavated throughout eastern South Dakota.( Either assimilation or warfare led to the demise of the Mound Builders by the year 800.( Between 1250 and 1400 an agricultural people, likely the ancestors of the modern Mandan of Dakota, arrived from the east and settled in the central part of the state.( In 1325, what has become known as the Creek Massacre occurred near Chamberlain.(Deloria and Neal (eds.), p. 161.) An archeological excavation of the site has discovered 486 bodies buried in a mass grave within a type of fortification; many of the skeletal remains show evidence of scalping and decapitation.(ArikaraFile:An Arrikara warrior 0027v.jpg|thumb|right|Bodmers portrait of an Arikara warrior, early 1840s.The Arikara, also known as the Ree, began arriving from the south in the 16th century.((Ronda, p. 44.) They spoke a Caddoan language similar to that of the Pawnee, and probably originated in what is now Kansas and Nebraska.(((Hasselstrom, p. 124.) Although they would at times travel to hunt or trade, the Arikara were far less nomadic than many of their neighbors, and lived for the most part in permanent villages.((Schell, p. 17.) These villages usually consisted of a stockade enclosing a number of circular earthen lodges built on bluffs overlooking rivers.(( Each village had a semi-autonomous political structure, with the Arikaras various subtribes being connected in a loose alliance.( In addition to hunting and growing crops such as corn, pumpkins, beans and squash,(Ronda, p. 46.) the Arikara were also skilled traders, and would often serve as intermediaries between tribes to the north and south.( It was probably through their trading connections that Spanish horses first reached the region around 1760.(Schell, pp. 1718.)(Hasselstrom, p. 125.)  The Arikara reached the height of their power in the 17th century, and may have included as many as 32 villages.( Due both to disease as well as pressure from other tribes,(Ronda, p. 45.) the number of Arikara villages would decline to only two by the late 18th century,( and the Arikara eventually merged entirely with the Mandan to the north.(Schell, p. 18.)SiouxBy the 17th century, the Sioux, who would later come to dominate much of the state, had settled in what is today central and northern Minnesota.(Schell, p. 19.) The Sioux spoke a language of the Siouan language family,( and were divided into four general branches  the Santee, the Yankton, the Yanktonnais, and the Lakota (also known as the Teton).( During this time, the lifestyle of the Sioux resembled that of the other peoples of the eastern woodlands more so than those of the plains. Much of their travel was done by boat, while they still were dependent on hunting, their diet was supplemented by gathering wild rice and berries, and lodges built of earth and wood were the most common type of habitation, as opposed to the tipis of the plains.(Schell, p. 22.) However, by the late 17th century and early 18th century the Sioux would begin to move south and then west into the plains.( This migration was due to several factors, including greater food availability to the west, as well as the fact that the rival Cree had obtained rifles from the French at a time when the Sioux were still using the bow and arrow.(Schell, pp. 1920.)(Hasselstrom, p. 126.)(Lass, p. 43.) In moving west into the prairies, the lifestyle of the Sioux would be greatly altered, coming to resemble that of a nomadic northern plains tribe much more so than a largely settled eastern woodlands one.((Lass, p. 45.) Characteristics of this transformation include a greater dependence on the bison for food, a heavier reliance on the horse for transportation, and the adoption of the tipi for habitation, a dwelling more suited to the frequent movements of a nomadic people than their earlier semi-permanent lodges.(The four branches of the Sioux would eventually settle in different areas across the northern plains. The Lakota, who crossed the Missouri around 1760 and reached the Hills by 1776, would come to settle largely in western South Dakota, northwestern Nebraska, and southwestern North Dakota.(Schell, pp. 2021.)(Lass, p. 40.) The Yankton primarily settled in southeastern South Dakota, the Yanktonnais settled in northeastern South Dakota and southeastern North Dakota, and the Santee settled primarily in central and southern Minnesota.(( Due in large part to the Sioux migrations, a number of tribes would be driven from the area. The tribes in and around the Black Hills, most notably the Cheyenne, would be pushed to the west, the Arikara would move further north along the Missouri, and the Omaha would be driven out of southeastern South Dakota and into northeastern Nebraska.((Hasselstrom, p. 127.)European explorationFranceFrance was the first European nation to hold any real claim over what would become South Dakota. During the 17th and 18th centuries, French colonial possessions in North America were known as France, and included most of the River, Lakes, Lawrence River and Bay watersheds; these claims covered most of South Dakota.(Schell, p. 24.)(Schell, p. 26.) However, simply claiming the upper Missouri watershed was as far as early French activity progressed due to several factors. Among these were an ample supply of furs from Hudson Bay and the Great Lakes, the precarious position of eastern French possessions, most of them lightly settled and near colonies of the rival British, and the opposition of the Sioux, who were blocking further French expansion to the west due to their perception that France was aligned with the rival Cree and Ojibwa peoples.(Schell, pp. 2526.) While several French scouting parties may have entered eastern South Dakota in the late 17th century, these expeditions left no firm evidence of their presence, and the possibility of any Europeans entering the region during this period is purely speculative.(Schell, p. 25.)After the conclusion of Annes War in 1713, France became more interested in its western possessions, largely in an attempt to sustain its colonial fur trade. Britain had won control over most of the fur trading region around Hudson Bay, while at the same time the fur trade was beginning to decline in the Great Lakes area due to overhunting.( In 1714 Etiene Veniard, Sieur de Bourgmont ascended the Missouri as far as the mouth of the Cheyenne River. The first Europeans to enter South Dakota from the north, the Verendrye brothers, began their expedition in 1743.(Schell, pp. 2729.) The expedition started at La Reine on Manitoba, and was attempting to locate an all-water route to the Pacific Ocean.( The explorers entered South Dakota from the north, along the Missouri River, and turned west at some point in the central part of the state. (It is uncertain how far west the Verendryes traveled before returning to the north; their journals speak vaguely of being ...in the sight of the mountains,(Schell, p. 29.) leading to speculation that it was either the Hills or the Horn Mountains,() further to the west, that were being spoken of.) Before turning west, the Verendryes buried a lead plate inscribed with their names, the name of the Governor of New France,( and the year near the present-day location of Ft. Pierre; the plate was rediscovered by schoolchildren in 1913 and is now on display at a museum in Pierre.(SpainIn 1762, France granted Spain all French territory west of the Mississippi River in the Treaty of Fontainebleau.(Francis and Kaufman, p. 498.) The agreement, which was signed in secret, was motivated by a French desire to convince Spain to come to terms with Britain and accept defeat in the Years War.( In an attempt to defend against British expansion to the south and west, Spain adopted a policy for the upper Missouri which emphasized the development of closer trade relations with local tribes as well as greater exploration of the region, a primary focus of which would be a search for a water route to the Pacific Ocean.(Schell, pp. 3032.) Although traders such as Jacques DEglise and Juan Munier had been active in the region for several years,(Holder, p. 17.) these men had been operating independently,(Schell, pp. 3132.) and a determined effort to reach the Pacific and solidify Spanish control of the region had never been undertaken. In 1793, a group commonly known as the Missouri Company was formed in St. Louis, with the twin goals of trading and exploring on the upper Missouri.(Schell, p. 32.) The company sponsored several attempts to reach the Pacific Ocean, none of which made it further than the mouth of the Yellowstone. In 1794, Jean Truteau (also spelled Trudeau) built a cabin near the present-day location of Fort Randall,(Schell, p. 3334) and in 1795 the Expedition traveled up the Missouri as far as present-day North Dakota,( where they expelled several British traders who had been active in the area.(Schell, p. 35.) By 1802, a post known as aux Cedres was constructed on the Missouri about  southeast of the present location of Pierre.(Holder, p. 18.)(Schell, p. 36.) In 1800, Spain gave Louisiana back to France in the Treaty of San Ildefonso.(()19th centuryImage:Lewis and Clark Middle Missouri BigSioux James.jpg|thumb|Detail from a map drawn by the and Clark Expedition, showing much of what would become eastern and central South Dakota.In 1803, the United States purchased the Territory from Napoleon for $15,000,000.(Thompson (ed.), p. 57.) The territory included most of the western half of the Mississippi watershed and covered nearly all of present-day South Dakota, except for a small portion in the northeast corner of the state.() The region was still largely unexplored and unsettled, and President Jefferson organized a group commonly referred to as the and Clark Expedition to explore the newly acquired region.(() The expedition, also known as the Corps of Discovery, was tasked with following the route of the Missouri to its source, continuing on to the Pacific Ocean, establishing diplomatic relations with the various tribes in the area, and taking cartographic, geologic, and botanical surveys of the area.(Thompson (ed.), pp. 5657.)(Schell, p. 39.) The expedition left St. Louis on May 14, 1804 with 45 men and 15 tons of supplies in three boats (one keelboat and two pirogues).( The party progressed slowly against the Missouris current, reaching what is today South Dakota on August 22.(Thompson (ed.), p. 58.)  Near present-day Vermillion, the party hiked to Mound after hearing local legends of the place being inhabited by little spirits.( Shortly after this, a  peaceful meeting took place with the Sioux,(Thompson (ed.), p. 59.) while an encounter with the Sioux further north was not as uneventful. The Lakota mistook the party as traders, at one point stealing a horse.( Weapons were brandished on both sides after it appeared as though the Lakota were going to further delay or even halt the expedition, but they eventually stood down and allowed the party to continue up the river and out of their territory.((Schell, pp. 4142.) In north central South Dakota, the expedition acted as mediators between the warring Arikara and Mandan.(Schell, p. 42.) After leaving the state on October 14, the party wintered with the Mandan in North Dakota before successfully reaching the Pacific Ocean and returning by the same route, safely reaching St. Louis in 1806.(Thompson (ed.), pp. 6061.) On the return trip, the expedition spent only 15 days in South Dakota, traveling more swiftly with the Missouris current.(Schell, p. 43.) In 1817, an American fur trading post was set up at present-day Pierre, beginning continuous American settlement of the area.() During the 1830s, fur trading was the dominant economic activity for the few Whites that lived in the area. Most of these trappers and traders left the area after European demand for furs dwindled around 1840.(Hasselstrom, p. 129.) In 1855, the U.S. Army bought Fort Pierre but abandoned it the following year in favor of Randall to the south.( Settlement by Americans and Europeans was by this time increasing rapidly, and in 1858 the Sioux signed the 1858 Treaty, ceding most of present-day eastern South Dakota to the United States.()Image:Deadwood13.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Deadwood, like many other Hills towns, was founded after the discovery of gold.Land speculators founded two of eastern South Dakotas largest present-day cities: Falls in 1856 and Yankton in 1859. In 1861, Territory was established by the United States government (this initially included Dakota, South Dakota, and parts of Montana and Wyoming).()  Settlers from Scandinavia, Germany, Ireland, and Russia, as well as elsewhere in Europe and from the eastern U.S. states increased from a trickle to a flood, especially after the completion of an eastern railway link to the territorial capital of Yankton in 1872, and the discovery of gold in the Hills in 1874 during a military expedition led by A. Custer. This expedition took place despite the fact that the western half of present day South Dakota had been granted to the Sioux by the Treaty of Fort Laramie as part of the Sioux Reservation. The Sioux declined to grant mining rights or land in the Black Hills, and war broke out after the U.S. failed to stop white miners and settlers from entering the region. The Sioux were eventually defeated and settled on reservations within South Dakota and North Dakota.(An increasing population caused Dakota Territory to be divided in half and a bill for statehood for North Dakota and South Dakota (as well as Montana and Washington) titled the Act of 1889 was passed on February 22, 1889 during the Administration of Cleveland. It was left to his successor, Harrison, to sign proclamations formally admitting North and South Dakota to the Union on November 2, 1889. Harrison directed his Secretary of State G. Blaine to shuffle the papers and obscure from him which he was signing first and the actual order went unrecorded.(U.S. Mint Coin of the Month)()On December 29, 1890, the Knee Massacre occurred on the Ridge Indian Reservation. Commonly cited as the last major armed conflict between the United States and the Sioux Nation, the massacre resulted in the deaths of an estimated 300 Sioux, many of them women and children. 25 U.S. soldiers were also killed in the conflict.()20th centuryImage:Dust Bowl - Dallas, South Dakota 1936.jpg|thumb|A South Dakota farm during the Bowl, 1936Retail storesIn the rural areas farmers and ranchers depended on general stores that had a limited stock and slow turnover; they made enough profit to stay in operation by selling at high prices. Prices were not marked on each item; instead the customer negotiated a price. Men did most of the shopping, since the main criteria was credit rather than quality of goods. Indeed, most customers shopped on credit, paying off the bill when crops or cattle were later sold; the owners ability to judge credit worthiness was vital to his success.(Lewis E. Atherton, The Frontier Merchant in Mid-America (University of Missouri Press, 1971))  In the cities consumers had much more choice, and bought their dry goods and supplies at locally owned department stores. They had a much wider selection of goods than in the country general stores; price tags that gave the actual selling price. The department stores provided a very limited credit, and set up attractive displays and, after 1900, window displays as well.  Their clerksusually men before the 1940swere experienced salesmen whose knowledge of the products appealed to the better educated middle-class housewives who did most of the shopping.  The keys to success were a large variety of high-quality brand-name merchandise, high turnover, reasonable prices, and frequent special sales. The larger stores sent their buyers to Denver, Minneapolis, and Chicago once or twice a year to evaluate the newest trends in merchandising and stock up on the latest fashions. By the 1920s and 1930s, large mail-order houses such as Sears, Roebuck & Co. and Montgomery Ward provided serious competition, so the department stores rely even more on salesmanship, and close integration with the community.(Henry C. Klassen, T.C. Power & Bro.: The Rise of a Small Western Department Store, 18701902, Business History Review, Volume: 66. Issue: 4. 1992. pp 671+ in JSTOR)(William R. Leach, Transformations in a Culture of Consumption: Women and Department Stores, 18901925, Journal of American History 71 (Sept. 1984): 319-42 in JSTOR)Many entrepreneurs built stores, shops, and offices along Main Street. The most handsome ones used pre-formed, sheet iron facades, especially those manufactured by the Mesker Brothers of St. Louis. These neoclassical, stylized facades added sophistication to brick or woodframe buildings throughout the state.(Arthur A. Hart, Sheet Iron Elegance: Mail Order Architecture in Montana, Montana Dec 1990, Vol. 40 Issue 4, pp 2631)Dust bowlDuring the 1930s, several economic and climatic conditions combined with disastrous results for South Dakota. A lack of rainfall, extremely high temperatures and over-cultivation of farmland produced what was known as the Bowl in South Dakota and several other plains states. Fertile topsoil was blown away in massive dust storms, and several harvests were completely ruined.() The experiences of the Dust Bowl, coupled with local bank foreclosures and the general economic effects of the Depression resulted in many South Dakotans leaving the state. The population of South Dakota declined by more than seven percent between 1930 and 1940.()World War IIProsperity returned with the U.S. entry into War II in 1941, when demand for the states agricultural and industrial products grew as the nation mobilized for war.(Schell, pp. 317320.) Over 68,000 South Dakotans served in the armed forces during the war, of which over 2,200 were killed.()DamsIn 1944, the Plan was passed as part of the Control Act of 1944 by the U.S. Congress, resulting in the construction of six large dams on the Missouri River, four of which are at least partially located in South Dakota.(Schell, pp. 323325.) Flood control, hydroelectricity and recreational opportunities such as boating and fishing are provided by the dams and their reservoirs.(On the night of June 910, 1972, heavy rainfall in the eastern Black Hills caused the Canyon Lake Dam on Rapid Creek to fail.() The failure of the dam, combined with heavy runoff from the storm, turned the usually small creek into a massive torrent that washed through central Rapid City.( The flood resulted in 238 deaths and destroyed 1,335 homes and around 5,000 automobiles.( Damage from the flood totaled $160 million (the equivalent of $664 million today).(On April 19, 1993, Governor Mickelson was killed in a plane crash in Iowa while returning from a business meeting in Cincinnati.(Saturday marks anniversary of deadly crash. http://www.siouxcityjournal.com/articles/2008/04/18/news/latest_news/bd6e5e069e84ada58625742f004769d4.txt City Journal. 18 April 2008. (accessed November 11, 2008)) Several other state officials were also killed in the crash. Mickelson, who was in the middle of his second term as governor, was succeeded by Dale Miller.Recent historyIn recent decades, South Dakota has transformed from a state dominated by agriculture to one with a more diversified economy. The tourism industry has grown considerably since the completion of the interstate system in the 1960s, with the Black Hills being especially impacted. The financial service industry began to grow in the state as well, with Citibank moving its credit card operations from New York to Sioux Falls in 1981, a move that has since been followed by several other financial companies.(Hetland, Cara. Sioux Falls 25 years after Citibanks arrival. http://minnesota.publicradio.org/display/web/2006/02/23/siouxfalls Minnesota Public Radio. 24 February 2006. (accessed 23 March 2007)) In 2007, the site of the recently-closed Homestake gold mine near Lead was chosen as the location of a new underground research facility.() Despite a growing state population and recent economic development, many rural areas have been struggling over the past 50 years with locally declining populations and the emigration of educated young adults to larger South Dakota cities, such as Rapid City or Sioux Falls, or to other states.()See also* of the Midwestern United States*evolution of South DakotaReferencesNotesBibliography********Further readingPolitics* Blackorby Edward. Prairie Rebel: The Public Life of William Lemke (University of Nebraska Press, 1955)* Carlson Paul, and Steve Porter. South Dakota Congressmen and the Hun-dred Days of the New Deal. South Dakota History vol, 8, no. 4 (Fall 1978):327-39. * Easton Patricia OKeefe. Womens Suffrage in South Dakota: The Final Decade, 19111920. South Dakota History vol 13 (1983): 20626.*  Lamar Howard. Dakota Territory, 18611899: A Study in Frontier Politics (Yale University Press, 1956)*  Lamar Howard. Public Values and Private Dreams: South Dakotans Search for Identity, 18501900. South Dakota History vol 8, no. 2 (Spring 1978):11742.* Lauck, Jon K. Prairie Republic: The Political Culture of Dakota Territory, 18791889 (University of Oklahoma Press; 2010); 281 pages. Argues that there has been an overemphasis on class conflict and determinism in studies of the West; finds that South Dakotas founders were agents of civic republicanism and Protestant Christianity.Economic history* Fite, Gilbert. The Transformation of South Dakota Agriculture: The Effects of Mechanization, 19391964. South Dakota History vol 19, no. 3 (Fall 1989):278305.Local studies* Atherton, Lewis. Main Street on the Middle Border (1957)* Stock; Catherine McNicol. Main Street in Crisis: The Great Depression and the Old Middle Class on the Northern Plains (University of North Carolina Press, 1992)  online editiondu Dakota du Sudja:
15070963
Svappavaara
website                 Svappavaara is a locality situated in Municipality, County, Sweden with 394 inhabitants in 2005.( It is a mining village and the mine (iron ore) was closed in 1983, but enrichment of iron ore from the mine at Kiruna is still going on. The mine is owned by LKAB.The designers of Quebec in northern Canada were inspired by Svappavaara and similar Swedish towns with regard to the windbreak building.1965a.jpg|thumb|300px|left|One of the original buildings at Svappavaara, designed by Ralph Erskine, which forms a long wind break. References  de:Svappavaaranl:Svappavaarano:Svappavaarapl:Svappavaarafi:Svappavaarasv:Svappavaara
15094369
University_of_the_Philippines_College_of_Engineering
 logo                   The College of Engineering of the of the Philippines Diliman is the largest degree-granting unit in the System campus in terms of student population. The college is also known formally as UP COE, COE, and informally as Engg (pronounced eng).The College of Engineering is composed of eight departments, six of which are housed in the historic Melchor Hall along Osmea Avenue in the UP Diliman campus. The Electrical and Electronics Engineering Institute has its own building along Velzquez Street in the Diliman Science Complex and Technology Incubation Park, while the Department of Computer Science (along with the College Library) moved into their own building near the EEEI building in early 2007.Since its establishment, the College has produced twenty graduates with UP Cum Laude honors. The first COE Summa Cum Laude graduated in 1953, and the most recent was in 2011.The College is the Philippine college of engineering with the most CHED Centers of Excellence with eleven (11). All of its degree-granting departments have been recognized as a Center of Excellence.Academic departmentsDepartment of Chemical EngineeringThe Department of Chemical Engineering (DChE) offers undergraduate and graduate programs leading to the degree of engineering. The department was established in 1956, and has an overall 90% passing rate in the licensure examinations held in the Philippines. Furthermore, the department contributes about tenths to sixths of the total numbers of new chemical engineers in the Philippines every year.()The department offers the following degrees:* of Science in Engineering (BS ChE) &mdash; five-year program leading to the understanding of transport processes, chemical engineering thermodynamics and their applications to unit operations design, thermodynamics and kinetics.()* of Science in Chemical Engineering (MS ChE) &mdash; twenty-four unit coursework that includes core and elective courses related to chemical engineering and six units of masters thesis.()* of Philosophy in Chemical Engineering (PhD ChE)Institute of Civil EngineeringThe Institute of Civil Engineering (ICE) offers undergraduate and graduate programs leading to the degree of engineering. The oldest of the colleges departments, the institute was established as a department in 1910. In 1915, first graduates of civil engineering was produced in 1910. In 2008, the department was elevated into institute, when its student population gradually expanded.() Civil engineering graduates from the college represents only 1-2% of civil engineering output of the Philippines each year.()The institute offers the following degrees:* of Science in Engineering (BS CE) &mdash; five-year program leading to the understanding of several areas of civil engineering including engineering and management, environmental and engineering, engineering, engineering, engineering and resources engineering.(* of Science in Civil Engineering (MS CE) &mdash; the department offers several masters degree in the following fields:():*MS CE in Engineering:*MS CE in Engineering:*MS CE in Engineering:*MS CE in Water Resources Engineering*of Philosophy in Civil Engineering (PhD CE) &mdash; the department offers several doctors degree in the following fields:(:*PhD CE in Engineering:*PhD CE in Engineering:*PhD CE in Engineering:*PhD CE in Water Resources EngineeringDepartment of Computer ScienceThe Department of Computer Science (DCS) offers undergraduate and graduate programs leading to the degree of science. The department started way back in the 1970s when the now defunct Department of Engineering Sciences, Department of Electrical Engineering (both in College of Engineering) and Department of Mathematics of the College of Science instituted the Master of Engineering in Computer Science (MEngg CS) program. The suspension of MEngg CS in 1980s led to creation of Bachelor of Science in Computer Science degree. In 1988, the Board of Regents approved the creation of Department of Engineering and Computer Sciences (DECS). In 1991, however, DECS was split into Department of Engineering Sciences and Department of Computer Science.()The department offers the following programs:* of Science in Science (BS CS) &mdash; four-year program that leads to the understanding of algorithms and structures, languages, architecture, numerical and computations, systems, development methodology and engineering, database and retrieval and intelligence.()()* of Science in Computer Science &mdash; several coursework that leads to the full understanding of operating, intelligent, database, information and application systems, and networks and systems.(()Electrical and Electronics Engineering InstituteThe Electrical and Electronics Engineering Institute (EEEI) offers three undergraduate programs leading to the degree of engineering, and communications engineering and engineering exclusively. The institute started as the Department of Electrical Engineering and was renamed Department of Electrical and Electronics Engineering in 1994. In 2001, the department transferred to its current location along Velasquez St. from its former building at German Yia Hall, beside Melchor Hall. In 2008, the department was elevated into an institute.()()The institute offers the following degrees:* of Science in Engineering (BS CoE) &mdash; five-year program leading to the understanding of engineering, including digital designs, systems, sequential logic synthesis, design, networks and systems engineering.(()* Bachelor of Science in Engineering (BS EE) &mdash; five-year program leading to the understanding of engineering, including electrical equipment and devices, machines, electronics, electric power distribution systems and system design.()()* Bachelor of Science in and Communications Engineering (BS ECE) &mdash; five-year program leading to the understanding of and communications engineering, including communications, instrumentation electronics, communication electronics and communications.(()* of Engineering in Electrical Engineering (ME EE)()* of Science in Electrical Engineering (MS EE)()* Doctorate in Engineering in Electrical Engineering (DE EE)()* of Philosophy in Electrical Engineering (PhD EE)()Department of Geodetic EngineeringThe Department of Geodetic Engineering (DGE) offers undergraduate and graduate programs leading to the degree of geodetic engineering. The department was established in 1937 while its research and extension arm, Training Center for Applied Geodesy and Photogrammetry (TCAGP)was created in 1964.()The department offers the following programs:* of Science in Engineering (BS GE) &mdash; five-year program leading to the understanding of geodetic engineering, including surveying, mapping, sensing, photogrammetry and positioning systems, law of contracts, Torrens registration system, Philippine laws on mining and natural resources and land registration law.()()* of Science in Engineering (BS GmE) &mdash; the department offers several masters degree in the following fields:():* MS GmE in Applied Geodesy:* MS GmE in Geoinformatics:* MS GmE in SensingDepartment of Industrial Engineering and Operations ResearchThe Department of Industrial Engineering and Operations Research (DIE/OR) offers undergraduate and graduate programs leading to the degree of engineering and research. The degree program of industrial engineering started in 1965 when the Department of Mechanical Engineering offered students to pursue the career. In 1971, the Department of Industrial Engineering and Operations Research became a separate unit of the College.()The department offers the following degrees:* of Science in Engineering (BS IE) &mdash; five-year year program that leads to the understanding of industrial engineering,  design, improvement and installation of integrated systems of people, materials, equipment and enery, systems, research, factors and ergonomics and information systems.(* Diploma in Industrial Engineering &mdash; provides intensive industrial engineering graduates of other fields of science.()* of Science in Industrial Engineering (MS IE)()Department of Mechanical EngineeringDepartment of Mining, Metallurgical and Materials EngineeringSummaryNational Centers of Excellence/DevelopmentAs of 2001, the Commission on Higher Education of the Philippines has identified 32 centers of excellence/development (COEs/CODs) in of the Philippines Diliman, eleven of which can be found in the College of Engineering. (See all UP Diliman Centers of Excellence/Development).Ten of the eleven COEs/CODs are undergraduate programs in the College, while the eleventh (Information Technology Education) can be considered to be shared between the Colleges Department of Computer Science and the UP Information Technology Training Center.( UP ITTC) of the Philippines Diliman has no program named Technology, unlike other Philippine universities. The COEs/CODs in the College are as follows:*Engineering*Engineering*Engineering*Engineering*Electronics and Engineering*Engineering*Engineering*Technology Education*Engineering*Engineering*EngineeringNational Engineering Centerthumb|220px|right|Melchor Hall at night, during the UP Lantern Parade in Decemberthumb|220px|right|The entrance to Melchor Hallthumb|220px|right|The Marcelo G. Casillan Room in Melchor Hallcollege of engineering by phillip kimpo.JPG|thumb|250px|right|UP COEs Melchor HallThe National Engineering Center (NEC) is a related yet independent unit of the College of Engineering. The NEC is under the jurisdiction of the of the Philippines System and provides research, consultancy, and continuing education services in the engineering and related fields. Whilst the UP COE is a unit purely dedicated to academic pursuit, the NEC serves industry and government institutions in need of engineering solutions. The NEC is housed within the Juinio Hall (formerly the National Engineering Center Building), located beside UP COEs Melchor Hall along Osmea Avenue. As of 2006, the College of Engineering Dean, Dr. Rowena Cristina Guevara, also serves as the centers Executive Director.CentersFive centers formerly within the College of Engineering are now in the jurisdiction of the NEC. However, some of these units still classify themselves as falling under the COE-NEC umbrella. This should not come as a surprise, as many NEC employees are also UP COE professors and instructors.* Building Research Service* National Center for Transportation Studies (NCTS), formerly the Transport Training Center* National Hydraulic Research Center (NHRC)* Training Center for Applied Geodesy and Photogrammetry (TCAGP)* UP Industrial Research Service CenterCourse offerings* Professional Engineering Training Division* Engineering Enhancement ProgramCollege of Engineering LibrariesThe Libraries of the College of Engineering is the repository of books, dissertations, databases, multimedia resources, journals, magazines, and student and faculty researches related to the engineering disciplines being offered by the College. The COE Library envisions itself as the Philippines National Engineering Library and Information Center in the future.As of 2006, the Library is located in Melchor Hall along Osmea Avenue, and is divided into two floors. The relatively cramped space of the Library will be alleviated once part of it transfers to the new Engineering Library and Computer Science (ELCS) Building, where it is slated to occupy the entire lower two floor levels.The COE Library is an integral part of the University Librarys Online Public Access Catalogue (OPAC). The Library is also part of the Philippine eLib (Electronic Library) Project.See also: Cielo, the Central Interactive Engineering Library Online of UP Diliman or http://www.engglib2.upd.edu.ph, The College of Engineering Library II WebsiteCollege publicationsThe Engineering Logscriptthumb|150px|right|The August 2004 issue of The Engineering Logscript.The official student publication of the college, The Engineering Logscript (or simply Logscript) is the oldest college-based student publication in Diliman, having been established in the 1969-1970 academic year. This makes the Logscript older than the UP College of Mass Communications Plaridel.Funding for the publication comes from the shared Logscript/Engineering Student Council (ESC) fee paid by students every semester. Unlike other college-based student publications in the university, the Logscript does not have an assigned formal office.Though the publications logo and/or masthead varies with every change of the editorial board, the College of Engineering Sundial (or a semblance of it) is always incorporated into the design. The Sundial is a university landmark erected by the UP Alumni Engineers.The SundialThe Sundial is the official newsletter of the UP Alumni Engineers. Carrying the motto The time of day it reckons, UP Engineers it beckons, the Sundials first issue came out on October 25, 2004. Like the Logscript, the Sundial has the university landmark of the same name as its emblem.See also: Sundial electronic issuesThe UP ParserThe UP Parser is the official student publication of the Department of Computer Science. Founded in 1999, Parser (as it is commonly known) is the oldest department-based publication in the College of Engineering. After a few years of inactivity, Parser was revived in 2004, appearing in four different versions: the print circulation, a website, an email newsletter, and a bulletin board version. In the academic year 2005-2006, Parser reached a milestone by releasing two full-color, tabloid-sized editions, a feat rare for department-based publications.The newspaper takes its name from the parser of computer science. Its motto is Analyzing life the CS way.The ReactorThe Reactor is the official newsletter of the Department of Chemical Engineering.CurrentsCurrents is the official student publication of the Department of Electrical and Electronics Engineering. After a few years of inactivity, the publication was revived in the academic year 2005-2006.Whats HappenenggWhats Happenengg is the official newsletter of the Engineering Student Council (ESC), and comes in booklet format. The publications name is the combination of the phrase Whats happening and the colleges nickname, Engg.College deans*J. Colbert (19101911, acting dean)*E. Griffin (19111912, acting dean)*G. Wrentmore (19121919)*W. Reynolds (19191926)*R. Hyde (19261940)*A. Tan (19401949) 1*L. Tiongson (19491953)*A. Ortigas (19531960)*Baguio (19601970)*Alfredo L. Juinio (19701979) 2*M. Mena (19791985)*A. Garcia (19851991)*L. Viray (19911993)*B. Vea (19931997) 3*G. Atanacio (19972004)*Cristina L. Guevara (20042010)*C. Matias (2010-present)1 Vidal A. Tan afterwards became the eighth President of the University of the Philippines System.2 The National Engineering Center Building was named after Alfredo Juinio.3 As of 2006, Dr. Reynaldo Vea is the president of the Institute of Technology.ReferencesExternal linksOfficial links* UP College of Engineering* UP Alumni Engineers* National Engineering Center* UP Diliman* University of the Philippines* College of Engineering Library II* Department of Geodetic Engineering
15101908
List_of_museums_in_Illinois
This list of museums in Illinois contains museums which are defined for this context as institutions (including organizations, government entities, and private businesses) that collect and care for objects of cultural, artistic, scientific, or historical interest and make their collections or related exhibits available for public viewing. Museums that exist only in cyberspace (i.e., museums) are not included.To use the sortable table, click on the icons at the top of each column to sort that column in alphabetical order; click again for reverse alphabetical order.{| classwikitable sortable ! Name! Image! Location! Region! Type!Summary|-| Farmhouse Museum ||   || Glenview || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Glenview Area Historical Society|-| Lincoln Long Nine Museum ||  || Athens || Central || Historic site || website|-| Philip Randolph Pullman Porter Museum||   || Chicago || Chicago area || African American || website, contributions made by African-Americans to Americas labor history|-| Museum of Law ||  || Chicago || Chicago area || Law  || Role of law and the legal profession in America and throughout the world|-| Lincoln Presidential Library and Museum||||Springfield|| Central || Biographical |||-| Historical Museum || || Addison || Chicago area || Local history || website|-| Planetarium ||   || Chicago || Chicago area ||Science  |||-| Heritage Museum and Black Veterans Archives || || Aurora || Chicago area || African American || information|-| American Museum of Southern Illinois ||   || Carbondale || Southern || African American || website, website|-| Classics Museum of Aviation || || Sugar Grove || Illinois || Aviation || website, aircraft, vehicles, uniforms and aviation memorabilia from the 1930s to the present|-| Combat Museum ||  || Springfield || Central || Aviation || website, historic aircraft|-| Station Prairie ||  ||Glenview || Chicago area ||  Natural history  || website,  tall-grass prairie and Evelyn Pease Tyner Interpretive Center with prairie environment exhibits and education programs|-| Museum || || Alexis || Cities || Local history || website|-| Wars Museum ||  || Quincy || Western || Military || website, located on the grounds of the Illinois Veterans Home, military artifacts from the Revolutionary War to the present|-| Living Museum ||   || Altamont || Central || Entertainment || website|-| Museum of History and Art||   || Alton || Metro-East || Local history || website, information, exhibits include worlds tallest man Pershing Wadlow, Bird, debate, Civil War, changing art exhibits|-| Depot Museum ||   || Amboy || Illinois  || Railroad || History of Amboy and the Central Railroad|-| Farm Heritage Museum || || Greenville || Southern  || Agriculture || website, includes tractors and farm machinery|-| Fluorite Museum ||  || Rosiclare || Southern || Mining || information, exhibits on fluorspar mining industry, fluorite ore specimens, mining paraphernalia and photographs|-| Movie Palace Museum ||  || Elmhurst || Chicago area || Entertainment  || website, operated by the Theatre Historical Society of America, objects from the era of the great movie palaces in the U.S.|-| Toby Jug Museum||   || Evanston || Chicago area || Decorative art || information, jug collection, open by appointment|-| Hollywood Museum ||  || Metropolis || Southern || Media|| website, information, store and museum of Hollywood collectibles|-| Mansion Museum ||   || Carlinville || Central || Open air  || website, operated by the Macoupin County Historical Society, includes Victorian house with period displays, schoolhouse and print shop|-| Historical Museum || || Andover || Western || Local history ||  Henry County Tourism Bureau website|-| House ||   || Polo || Illinois || Historic house || website, operated by the Polo Historical Society|-| Apple River Fort State Historic Site||    || Elizabeth || Illinois || Living || Recreated 1830s fort|-| Heights Historical Museum||   || Arlington Heights || Chicago area || Open air || website, includes 1882 Victorian home, coach house, 1906 soda pop factory, 1908 Banta house and a replica 1830s log cabin|-| Institute of Chicago||   || Chicago  || Chicago area || Art |||-| Club of Chicago || || Chicago || Chicago area || Art  || Changing exhibits of cutting edge and avant-garde art|-| Childrens Museum ||   || Ingleside || Chicago area || Childrens  || website|-| Museum ||   || Atlanta || Central || Local history || website|-| Museum ||   || Atkinson || Western || Local history || information|-| House ||   || Moline || Cities || Historic house || website, operated by the Rock Island County Historical Society|-| Augustana College Art Museum ||   || Rock Island || Cities || Art || Part of Augustana College|-| Regional Fire Museum ||  || Aurora || Chicago area || Firefighting || |-| Museum of Lithuanian Culture||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Cultural || Lithuanian history, culture and art|-| City Motorcycle Museum ||   || DeKalb || Illinois || Transportation || website, over 90 motorcycles|-| Area Historical Society ||  || Barrington || Chicago area || Local history  || website, located in Old Barrington Center|-| History Museum ||  || Bartlett || Chicago area || Local history || website|-| Depot Museum ||  || Batavia || Illinois|| Railroad || website, operated by the Batavia Historical Society|-| Mansion||   || Alton || Metro-East || Historic house || website Turn of the 20th century mansion designed by world famous architect, Lucas Pfeifenberger. The former residence of Senator Edmond Beall, politician and industrialist. Located on Millionaires Row in the Middletown Historic District. Tours by appointment, overnight lodging, and wedding and reception facilities are available. |-| Historical Museum||   || Beardstown || Western || Local history || website, located in the courthouse with the Lincoln Courtroom, also known as Black Museum, collection of guns, Civil War memorabilia, Native American artifacts and more|-| River Museum||   || Beardstown || Western || Maritime || website, impact of the Illinois River on the area; houses the Chamber of Commerce office|-| Beith House Museum||  ||St. Charles|| Illinois || Historic house || |-| Museum of the Quad Cities ||   || Moline || Cities || Ethnic || website, also known as the Center for Belgian Culture|-| Museum ||   || Romeoville || Chicago area || Automotive || website, open by appointment, cars, trucks and memorabilia|-| Stephenson House ||   || Edwardsville || Metro-East || Historic house || |-| Winter Museum ||   || Altamont || Central || Technology || website. antique steam engines|-| Historical Museum || || Bethalto || Metro-East || Local history || website|-| School ||   || Friends Creek Township || Central || School || website, operated by the Macon County Conservation District|-| Rock Historical Society Crib Museum || || Big Rock || Chicago area || Local history || website|-| Barnhart Museum||   || Oregon || Illinois || Commodity || information, information, includes vintage toys, collectibles, sleighs, farm equipment, and relics of the past|-| Billy Graham Center Museum||   || Wheaton || Chicago area || Religious || History of U.S. Christian evangelism, Billy Graham, missions and Christian themes|-| Museum ||   || Decatur || Central || Decorative arts  || website, part of University|-| Hill State Historic Site||   || Bishop Hill || Western || Open air || Site of a former Utopian community|-| Farm Museum || || Aurora || Chicago area || Living || website, five museums including the Carriage House, the Farm Museum, the Early Streets Museum and the Huntoon House, Victorian era|-| History of Education Museum ||   || DeKalb || Illinois || History || website, part of Illinois University, history of American education, includes one-room schoolhouse|-| Hawk State Historic Site||   || Rock Island || Cities || Native American || Includes John Hauberg Museum of Native American Life and Singing Bird Nature Center|-| Park District Museum || || Bloomingdale || Chicago area || Art || website, changing local art exhibits|-| Island Historical Museum || || Island, Illinois || Southern County, Illinois || Local History || website Operated by the Blue Island Historical Society in the lower level of the Blue Island Public Library, this award-winning museum contains research material and illustrates the history of the Blue Island area from before the time of the citys founding in 1836. The society also operates the historic Albee house museum at 13018 S. Maple Ave.|-| County Historical Museum ||  || Belvidere || Illinois || Local history  || website, operated by the Boone County Historical Society, includes 160-year-old log cabin, general store, bank, barbershop, one room school displays|-| the Prairie Museum || || Mendota || Illinois || Agriculture || website, website, operated by the Mendota Museum & Historical Society, focus on farm family life, equipment, livestock and faith|-| and Black Museum ||   || Hampton || Cities || Local history || website, operated by the Hampton Historical Society|-| Childrens Museum ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Childrens  || website, focuses on the African American experience|-| Morgan Horse Museum ||   || Rochester || Central || Historic house || website, exhibits about George Brunk, breeder of the horse|-| Cottage State Historic Site||   || Bement || Central || Historic house || Middle-class mid-19th century house|-| County Museum ||   || Princeton || Illinois || Historic house || website, operated by the Bureau County Historical Society, two adjacent homes, Clark-Norris Home and Newell-Bryant House|-| Museum of Natural History ||    || Rockford || Illinois || Natural history || |-| House ||   ||South Beloit|| Illinois || Historic house || information, photos, |-| Center ||   || Moline || Cities || Historic house || website|-| Museum of History || || Byron || Illinois || Local history || website|-| Courthouse State Historic Site||   || Cahokia || Metro-East || Historic site || Reconstructed frontier courthouse|-| Cahokia Mounds State Historic Site||   || Collinsville || Metro-East || Native American || Site of an ancient Native American city |-| Custom House ||  || Cairo || Southern || Local history || information, includes exhibits about local African American heritage, Cairo (1861), prehistoric Native American artifacts|-| City Historical Society Museum ||   || Calumet City || Chicago area || Local history || website |-| Grant Museum ||   || Rockford || Illinois || Military || website, history of Camp Grant|-| Cantigny||   ||Wheaton|| Chicago area || Historic site ||  estate with two museums: R. McCormick Museum, a 1930s historic mansion with biographical exhibits, and the Division Museum at Cantigny|-| Sandburg State Historic Site||   || Galesburg || Western || Biographical || Boyhood home and museum about poet Sandburg|-| V. Yost House Museum || || Pontiac || Central  || Historic house || website|-| Heritage Museum||   || Catlin || Central || Local history || website, operated by the Catlin Historical Society|-| Center for the Arts||   || Mt. Vernon || Southern || Art || website, includes Mitchell Museum, Cedarhurst Sculpture Park, Main Gallery with changing exhibits|-| Area Historical Society Museum || || Cedarville || Illinois || Local history || website|-| for American Archeology ||  ||Kampsville|| Central || Archeology || Prehistory of the lower River Valley|-| for History||   || Wheaton || Chicago area || Local history || website, formerly Wheaton History Center |-| Area Historical Museum||   || Centralia || Southern || Local history || website|-| Earth and Space Center|| || River Grove || Chicago area || Aerospace |||-| County Historical Museum||   || Champaign || Metropolitan Area || Local history || website|-| School||  || Oregon || Illinois || School || |-| Creek Village ||  || Franklin Grove || Illinois || Open air || website, operated by the Franklin Grove Area Historical Society, historical restoration depicting a mid-19th century prairie settlement|-| Gates Dawes House Museum||   || Evanston || Chicago area ||Historic house || website Also known as the Evanston History Center.  The Evanston History Center is located in the historic Charles Gates Dawes house, built in 1894 on a two-acre Lakeshore site.  The house is in the French Chateaux style and was designed by Henry Edwards-Ficken.  The three-and-a-half story mansion has twenty-five rooms, six bedrooms, seven bathrooms and eleven fireplaces.|-| M. Wright House ||   || Altamont || Central || Historic house || website|-| Railroad Museum ||   || Chatham || Central || Railroad || website|-| Valley Historical Society Museum || || Cherry Valley || Illinois || Local history || website|-| Gould-Dick Tracy Museum ||   || Woodstock || Illinois || Entertainment || website, comic strip artist Gould and his character Tracy |-| Athenaeum: Museum of Architecture and Design || || Chicago || Chicago area || Art || http://www.chi-athenaeum.org/, art of design in all areas of the discipline: architecture, industrial and product design, graphics and urban planning |-| Athenaeums International Sculpture Park ||  || Schaumburg || Chicago area || Art || website, outdoor sculpture park on |-| Childrens Museum ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Childrens  |||-| Cultural Center||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art |||-| History Museum ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Local history  |||-| Discovery Museum, Illinois ||   || Normal || Central || Childrens  || website|-| Museum in Edwardsville ||   || Edwardsville || Metro-East || Childrens  || website|-| Museum in Oak Lawn ||   || Oak Lawn || Chicago area || Childrens  || website|-| Museum of Illinois ||   || Decatur || Central || Childrens  || website|-| Neighborhood Museum ||   || Round Lake || Chicago area  || Childrens || website|-| Museum of Chicago||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Ethnic ||website, Chinese-American cultural heritage of the Midwest|-| County Museum ||  || Marshall || Central || Local history  || website, 1838 Manly - McCann House, operated by the Clark County Historical Society|-| Clarke House Museum ||  || Chicago || Chicago area || Historic house  || 1836 pre-Civil War Greek Revival house|-| Historical Museum ||   || Collinsville || Metro-East || Local history || website|-| Davenport House ||   || Rock Island || Cities || Historic house || website|-| Palmer House ||   || Crystal Lake || Illinois || Historic house || website, operated by the Crystal Lake Historical Society|-| County Historical Society Museum ||   || Robinson || Southern || Local history || website|-| Museum ||  || Vernon Hills || Chicago area ||Historic house  || 1914 Mediterranean-style mansion with decorative arts & furnishings|-| House ||  || Springfield || Central || Historic house || Prairie-style house designed by Lloyd Wright|-| of Union Veterans of the Civil War Museum ||  || Springfield || Central || Civil War || website|-| Davis Mansion ||  || Bloomington || Central || Historic house || 36 room Italianate villa mansion|-| David L. Pierce Art and History Center ||  || Aurora || Chicago area || Multiple  || Local history and art, operated by the City of Aurora, exhibits by the Aurora Historical Society and the Aurora Public Art Commission|-| House ||   || Moline || Cities || Historic house || website, 1872 home of Deere|-| Historic Village ||  || Deerfield || Chicago area || Open air || website, operated by the Deerfield Area Historical Society|-| University Museum ||  || Chicago || Chicago area || Art  || website, part of University|-| Dewitt County Museum ||   || Clinton || Central  || Open air  || Includes the C. H. Moore Homestead, telephone exhibit and farm museum|-| Mounds Museum ||   || Lewistown || Western || Native American || Satellite museum of the State Museum|-| Friedrichs House Museum ||  || Mount Prospect || Chicago area || Local history  || website, operated by the Mount Prospect Historical Society|-| Dillon Home Museum ||  || Sterling || Illinois || Historic house || |-| Center Museum ||   || Rockford || Illinois || Childrens || website|-| Depot Childrens Museum||   || Galesburg || Western || Childrens || website|-| Historic Center ||  || Dixon || Illinois || Local history || website, includes exhibits on Reagan|-| E. Stephens Museum of Hummels||   || Rosemont || Chicago area || Decorative arts || website, M.I. Hummel, ANRI and Goebel figurines|-| Wild West Town ||  || Union || Illinois || History || website, Western theme park and museum|-| Grove Park District Museum ||  || Downers Grove || Chicago area || Local history  || website|-| County Museum ||   || Tuscola || Central || Local history || website|-| Township Historical Society Museum || || West Dundee || Chicago area || Local history || website|-| Childrens Museum || || Naperville || Chicago area || Childrens || website|-| County Historical Museum||   || Wheaton || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the DuPage County Historical Society, county history, period displays, model railroad|-| Heritage Gallery||   || Wheaton || Chicago area || Local history || website, exhibits of important local figures|-| House Museum||  ||St. Charles|| Illinois || Historic house || website, restored 1840s prairie farmstead|-| DuSable Museum of African American History||   || Chicago || Chicago area || African American || History, art and culture|-| American Museum ||   || Mahomet || Metropolitan Area || Local history  || website, operated by the Champaign County Forest Preserve District, includes Native American, pioneer, railroad and African American exhibits|-| Lee Masters Home ||   || Petersburg || Central  || Biographical || information, home of poet Lee Masters|-| Historical Society & Museum ||  || Chicago || Chicago area || Local history  || website|-| Place ||  || Springfield || Central || Historic house || website|-| History Center ||  || Glencoe || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Glencoe Historical Society|-| Community College Visual and Performing Arts Center ||  || Elgin || Chicago area || Art || website, changing exhibits in three fine arts galleries, part of Community College|-| Historical Society and Museum ||  || Elgin || Chicago area || Local history || website, includes exhibits about the National Watch Company and Native American artifacts |-| Public Museum ||  || Elgin || Chicago area || Natural history || |-| Benjamin Washburne House || || Galena || Central || Historic house || |-| Iles House ||  || Springfield || Central || Historic house || website, includes Farrell and Ann Gay Museum of Springfield History|-| P. Curtis Home ||  || Metropolis || Southern ||  Historic house || information|-| History Museum || || Elizabeth || Illinois || Local history || website, operated by the Elizabeth Historical Society|-| Grove Farmhouse Museum ||  || Elk Grove Village || Chicago area || Open air || website, includes schoolhouse, farmhouse, barn, privy and chicken coop|-| House and Museum ||   || DeKalb || Illinois || Historic house || website, 1879 Victorian mansion|-| Art Museum||   ||Elmhurst|| Chicago area || Art ||website|-| Historical Museum ||  || Elmhurst || Chicago area || Local history  || website, operated by the Elmhurst Historical Society|-| Museum ||   || Elsah || Central || Local history  || information|-| Hemingway Birthplace Home ||  || Oak Park || Chicago area || Biographical || website, includes Hemingway Museum|-| Hemingway Museum ||  || Oak Park || Chicago area || Biographical || website, includes Hemingway Birthplace Homea|-| Museum ||   || Aledo || Cities || Local history || website, operated by the Mercer County Historical Society|-| Heritage Museum ||   || Rockford || Illinois || Culture || website, heritage and culture of six local immigrant groups: Irish, Italians, African-Americans, Polish, Lithuanians and Hispanics|-| Station||   || Bourbonnais || Chicago area || Childrens || website|-| Villa Museum||  ||Geneva|| Illinois || Historic house || website, house redesigned by Lloyd Wright, also Japanese garden|-| Farnsworth House || || Plano || Illinois || Historic house || 1940s home designed and constructed by Mies van der Rohe|-| County Museum||   || Vandalia || Southern || Local history || website, period displays|-| Museum of Natural History ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Natural history || |-| Museum of Greater Chicago||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Firefighting || website|-| Division Museum at Cantigny||   || Wheaton || Chicago area || Military || website, history of the 1st Infantry Division from the Revolutionary War to the present, located at Cantigny|-| Creek Museum ||  || Burr Ridge || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Flagg Creek Historical Society|-| Township Museum ||  || Rochelle || Illinois || Local history || website, operated by the Flagg Township Historical Society|-| de Chartres || || Prairie du Rocher ||Southern || Military || Reconstructed mid-18th century fort|-| Hill Heritage Museum||   || Mundelein || Chicago area || Local history || information, operated by the Historical Society of Fort Hill Country|-| St. Museum ||   || Chillicothe || Cities || Local history  || website, operated by the Chillicothe Historical Society|-| River Trolley Museum ||  || South Elgin || Chicago area || Transportation || Electric trolley cars|-| Massac ||  || Metropolis || Southern || Military || Reconstructed fort|-| Frances Willard House ||   || Evanston || Chicago area  || Historic house |||-| Creek Grist Mill||   || Franklin Grove || Illinois || Mill  || website, includes working mill and area watershed displays |-| Lloyd Wright Home and Studio ||  || Oak Park || Chicago area || Historic house || |-| Arts Center ||  || Freeport || Illinois || Art|| website, also known as Freeport Art Museum|-| Geology Museum||   || Rock Island || Cities || Natural history || Part of Augustana College, rock, mineral and fossil specimens|-| Mansion & Farm Museum||   || Jerseyville || Metro-East || Historic house || information, Civil War period mansion and agriculture tools and equipment|-| History Museum ||   || Galena || Central || Local history || website, operated by the Galena - Jo Daviess County Historical Society|-| Civic Art Center||   || Galesburg || Western || Art || website|-| Railroad Museum||   || Galesburg || Western || Railway|||-| Museum of Architecture & Design ||  || Quincy || Western || Design || website|-| Farm and Inn Museum||  ||St. Charles|| Illinois || Farm || 1840s period farmhouse, barn and outbuildings|-| Building ||  || Lockport || Chicago area || Local history || website, impact of the & Michigan Canal|-| Historical Museum ||  || Geneseo || Western || Local history || website, operated by the Geneseo Historical Association|-| History Center ||   || Geneva || Illinois || Local history || website, operated by the Geneva Historical Society|-| George Clayson House Museum ||  || Palatine || Chicago area || Local history || Operated by the Palatine Historical Society|-| R. Letourneau Home Museum ||  || Bourbonnais || Chicago area || Historic house || website, operated by the Bourbonnais Grove Historical Society|-| Valley Historical Museum ||  || German Valley || Illinois || Local history  || information|-| Carbon Heritage Museum ||   || Glen Carbon || Metro-East || Local history || website|-| Glessner House Museum ||  || Chicago || Chicago area || Historic house  || English Arts and Crafts style home, furnishings and decorative arts|-| Duncan Mansion ||   || Jacksonville || Central || Historic house || website|-| Oglesby Mansion ||   || Decatur || Central || Historic house || website, operated by the Macon County Conservation District|-| Ginestra House ||   || Rockford || Illinois || Historic house || information|-| Army of the Republic Memorial Museum ||  || Springfield || Central || Civil War || information|-| Hall Museum ||   || Ingleside || Chicago area || Local history  || website, operated by the Fox Lake-Grant Township Area Historical Society|-| Graue Mill and Museum ||  || Oak Brook || Chicago area || Mill || website, operating waterwheel grist mill and homestead|-| Municipal Historical Museum ||   || Grayslake || Chicago area || Local history  || website, operated by the Grayslake Historical Society|-| Lakes Naval Museum ||   || Great Lakes || Chicago area || Military || website, life of a U.S. Navy sailor, States Marine Corps Recruit Training and the Station Great Lakes|-| Western Railroad Museum || || Elizabeth ||Illinois  || Railroad || website, operated by the Elizabeth Historical Society|-| House Museum || || White Hall || Central || Historic house || information|-| Telephone Museum || || Gridley || Central || Technology || website, evolution of communication services in rural Illinois|-| Point Lighthouse||   || Evanston || Chicago area || Lighthouse || |-| National Historic Landmark ||  ||Glenview || Chicago area ||  Multiple || website, includes 1856 Gothic Revival house, log cabin, Native American longhouse, one-Room schoolhouse, Grove Interpretive Center with natural history exhibits, Wetland Greenhouse|-| County Historical Society Museum || || Morris || Illinois || Local history || website|-| House Museum ||   || Waukegan || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Waukegan Historical Society|-| House Museum || || Fairfield || Southern || Historic house || information|-| Days Nite Bed & Breakfast & Beatles Mini-Museum || || Benton || Southern || Biographical || website, room where Harrison slept when in town, includes Beatles memorabilia|-| Museum || || DeKalb || Illinois || Transportation || information|-| Agricultural Museum ||   || Atwood || Central || Agriculture || website|-| Hawthorne Works Museum || || Cicero || Chicago area || Technology || Part of College|-| Station||   ||Winfield|| Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Winfield Historical Society|-| Carus Mansion ||   || LaSalle || Illinois || Historic house|| |-| Museum and Cultural Center||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Cultural ||website, Greek history, art and culture and the Greek immigrant experience|-| County Museum ||  || Raritan || Western || Local history || information, information|-| County Historical Society Museum||   || Bishop Hill || Western || Local history || website|-| School ||   || Polo || Illinois || School || website, operated by the Polo Historical Society|-| Canyon ||   ||Fulton|| Illinois || Open air || website|-| Farm Museum ||  || Byron || Illinois || Historic house|| website, information, open by appointment, mid-19th century farmhouse and outbuildings|-| Park Historical Society Museum ||  || Highland Park || Chicago area || Historic house || website, Victorian period house and exhibits of local history|-| Historical Society Museum || || Hinsdale || Chicago area || Historic house || website, 1880s period house|-| Auto Attractions ||  || Roscoe|| Illinois || Automotive || Historic Auto Attractions is not only home to famous cars, but also a wide array of movie memorabilia. Some of those pieces include Marilyn Monroes nightgown, a sweater worn by Hollywood legend James Dean, and an outfit worn by Elvis Presley. In addition a large section of the museum is dedicated to John F. Kennedy, along with the Day in Dallas display.|-| Society of Oak Park and River Forest ||  || Oak Park || Chicago area || Local history || website |-| Museum || || Greenville ||Southern  || Historic house || website, operated by the Bond County Historical Society|-| Holt House ||   || Monmouth || Central || Historic house || website, house where Beta Phi Fraternity was founded|-| Prairie Farm ||   || Decatur || Central || Historic house || website, operated by the Macon County Conservation District, rural life on the Grand Prairie of Illinois in 1860|-| and Buggy Museum ||  || Biggsville || Western || Transportation || website, horse-drawn vehicles and farm equipment|-| Grove Museum ||  || Streamwood || Chicago area || School || website, operated by the Streamwood Historical Society|-| House||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Historic house || Part of of Illinois, former house and museum about Addams and activities at Hull House|-| Carnegie Museum || || Mendota || Illinois || Local history || website, operated by the Mendota Museum & Historical Society, includes Bill Hickok collection|-| Historical Society and Memorial Village || || Hutsonville || Southern || Open air  || information|-| & M Canal Museum ||  || Lockport || Chicago area || Open air || website, information, operated by the Will County Historical Society, includes local history and canal museum, one-room schoolhouse, depot, 1873 farmhouse, village jail, 1830s log cabin, blacksmiths shop, and tinsmiths shop|-| Amish Interpretive Center ||  || Bolingbrook || Chicago area || Cultural || website|-| Aviation Museum ||  || Arcola || Chicago area || Aviation || website|-| Executive Mansion||   || Springfield || Central || Historic house || Governors official residence|-| Fire Museum ||  || Springfield || Central || Firefighting || website, open by appointment|-| Holocaust Museum and Education Center||   || Skokie || Chicago area || History || website|-| Mennonite Heritage Center ||  || Metamora || Western || Open air || website|-| Oil Field Museum ||   || Oblong || Southern || Industry || website|-| Railway Museum ||  || Union || Illinois || Railway || website|-| State Capitol||   || Springfield || Central || Historic site || |-| State Military Museum||   || Springfield || Central || Military || website|-| State Museum||   || Springfield || Central || Natural history || Also state history, culture and art|-| State Police Heritage Foundation and Museum||   || Springfield || Central || Law enforcement || website, uniforms, badges, photographs, vintage squad cars|-| Pioneer Log Cabin Village ||   || Kinmundy || Southern || Open air || website|-| The Center for Intuitive and Outsider Art ||  || Chicago || Chicago area || Art  || website, intuitive and outsider art gallery|-| Museum of Surgical Science||   || Chicago  || Chicago area || Medical  || Operated by the International College of Surgeons|-| Heritage Center ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Cultural ||web|-| ISM Chicago Gallery ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art || Satellite gallery of the State Museum|-| of Puerto Rican Arts and Culture ||  || Chicago || Chicago area || Ethnic || website, museum to open in 2008|-| A La Cache Museum ||  || Romeoville || Chicago area || History|| website, French fur trade and Native American life|-| Historical Depot Museum || || Itasca || Chicago area || Local history  || website|-| Millikin Homestead ||   || Decatur ||Central  || Historic house || website|-| Prairie Center ||  || Byron || Illinois || Natural history || website, includes natural history museum and observatory|-| Mansion||    || Cahokia || Metro-East || Historic house || Opened periodically for special events|-| County Historical Village||   || Mt. Vernon || Southern || Open air || website, photos, operated by the Jefferson County Historical Society, includes Schweinfurth Museum with historical collections, and village with operating printing shop, log homes, log church, 1820 calaboose (jail), windmill & grist mill, working blacksmith shop|-| County Historical Museum||   || Jerseyville || Metro-East || Historic house || website, located in the Victorian Cheney Mansion, also local history exhibits|-| H. Hawes Grain Elevator Museum ||   || Atlanta || Central || Agriculture || website|-| John A. Logan College Museum ||  || Carterville || Southern || Local history || website, part of A. Logan College, southern Illinois visual arts, cultural heritage and natural history|-| A. Logan Museum ||  || Murphysboro || Southern || Biographical || website, also known as General A. Logan Museum, Civil War general|-| John Deere Historic Site||   || Grand Detour || Illinois || Historic house || Recreated blacksmith shop and 1836 pioneer house|-| Deere Pavilion ||   || Moline || Cities || Agriculture || website, Deere tractors and farm equipment|-| C. Flanagan House Museum||   || Peoria || Central || Historic house || website, operated by the Peoria Historical Society|-| Wood Mansion ||  || Quincy || Western || Historic house || Operated by the Historical Society of Quincy and Adams County|-| Area Historical Museum || || Joliet || Chicago area  || Local history || website, includes life-size replica depicting the building of the Illinois Michigan Canal, period store displays, Route 66|-| F. Glidden Homestead & Historical Center||   || DeKalb || Illinois || Historic house || |-| Smith Historic Site ||   || Nauvoo || Central || Open air || website, operated by the of Christ, tour of several sites including House, Smith Homestead, Mansion House, Brick Store|-| Jubilee College State Historic Site||   || Peoria || Central || Historic site || Former pioneer college|-| Park ||   || Highland || Metro-East || Historic house || website, operated by the Highland Historical Society, includes log cabin building museum, local history exhibits|-| County Museum || || Kankakee || Illinois || Open air || website, complex includes main museum with local history exhibits, Dr. A.L. Small House, a Victorian historic house, and Taylor School House|-| Railroad Museum || || Kankakee || Illinois || Railroad || website|-| Historical Society Museum ||  || Kenilworth || Chicago area || Local history  || website|-| Historical Society Museum||   || Kewanee || Cities || Local history || website|-| Hancock Heritage Museum||   || Carthage || Central || Local history || website|-| of Health and Science||   || Springfield || Central || Childrens || website, planned museum|-| Creek Farm||   ||Winfield|| Chicago area || Farm || website, 1890s living history farm and farmhouse|-| Museum of Art||   || Des Plaines || Chicago area || Art || website, part of Community College|-| Childrens Museum ||  ||Glenview || Chicago area ||  Childrens |||-| War National Museum||   || Springfield || Central || Military ||website, planned museum|-| Art Museum||   || Champaign || Metropolitan Area || Art || Part of of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, all periods of art from ancient Egyptian to contemporary photography|-| House Museum||   || West Chicago || Chicago area || Historic house || website, operated by the West Chicago Historical Society, 1917 period home|-| & Industry Museum||   || Belleville || Metro-East || Industry || website, tools, photos and exhibits of local industries, businesses, workers and products|-| Grange Area Historical Society Museum||   || La Grange || Chicago area || Local history || website|-| Historical & Genealogical Society Museum || || La Harpe || Central || Local history  || website|-| County Discovery Museum ||   || Wauconda || Chicago area || Local history || website, local art, history and popular culture|-| Forest-Lake Bluff Historical Society ||   || Lake Forest || Chicago area || Local history || website, museum of local history|-| Museum of Arts & Sciences ||   || Peoria || Central || Multiple || website, Southwest art, folk art, decoys, science, planetarium|-| House||   || Danville || Central || Historic house || website, operated by the Vermilion County Museum Society|-| County Museum ||   ||Utica|| Illinois || Open air || website, includes local history museum with Native American and period displays, barn with agriculture equipment, school and blacksmith shop|-| Folk Art Museum ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Ethnic || information|-| Homestead ||   || Highland || Metro-East || Historic house || website, operated by the Highland Historical Society|-| A. Sprague Gallery || || Joliet || Chicago area  || Art || website, part of Junior College|-| River Historical Museum||   || Leaf River || Illinois || Local history || website, information|-| Archives and Museum ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Sex || Leather, fetishism, sadomasochism, and alternative sexual practices|-| Science Center ||  || Batavia || Illinois || Science || website, operated by Fermilab|-| Area Historical Society || || Lemont || Chicago area || Local history || website, includes general store, school room, stable, medical dffice, war relics, and other local history displays|-| Area Historical Museum ||  || Lena || Illinois || Local history  || website|-| and Clark State Historic Site||   || Hartford || Southern || History || First site on the Lewis and Clark Heritage Trail|-| Haas Store Museum||   || Carmi || Southern || Local history || website, operated by the White County Historical Society|-| College Museum ||  || Lincoln || Central || Biographical || website, part of Lincoln College|-| Log Cabin State Historic Site |||| Lerna || Central || Living || 1840s home of Thomas and Sarah Bush Lincoln, father and stepmother of Lincoln, living history farm|-| Home National Historic Site ||   || Springfield || Central|| Biographical || Home that Lincoln lived in from 1844 to 1861|-| Law Offices State Historic Site||   || Springfield || Central || Historic site || Restored to 1840s period|-| Lincolns New Salem State Historic Site ||   || New Salem || Central || Open air || Reconstruction of the village where Abraham Lincoln lived in the 1830s|-| Station Museum || || Lisle || Chicago area || Open air || website, includes 19th century period displays at the Lisle Depot Museum, Netzley/Yender Farmhouse, Beaubien Tavern and blacksmith shop|-| Museum of Art || || Lemont || Chicago area || Art || website, fine and folk art by native and emigrant Lithuanian artists|-| Brick House||   || Vandalia || Southern || Historic house || website, open by appointment, operated by the Vandalia Historical Society|-| White School Museum ||   || Oswego || Illinois  || School  || website|-| County War Museum ||   || Pontiac || Illinois  || Military || website, military museum dedicated to honor Central Illinois veterans from World War I to now|-| Museum of Lapidary Art ||  || Elmhurst || Chicago area || Decorative arts  || website, more than 200 pieces of jade and other hard stone decorative carvings, dioramas featuring animals carved from various gem materials, rocks and mineral collections|-| Lockport Gallery ||   || Lockport || Chicago area || Art || Satellite gallery of the State Museum|-| Historical Museum || || Lombard || Chicago area || Historic house || website, Victorian period rooms, operated by the Lombard Historical Society|-| Community House and Museum ||  || Dixon || Illinois || Local history || information, history of the newspaper and its role in the history of Dixon|-| University Museum of Art ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art || Explores the spiritual in art from all cultures, faiths, and periods; formerly the Martin DArcy Museum of Art|-| Farm ||  || Yorkville || Illinois || Open air|| website, operated by the Kendall County Historical Society for special events|-| Living History Education Center ||   || Rockton || Illinois || Living || website|-| County Historical Museum and Prairie Village ||   || Decatur || Central || Open air  || website, operated by the Macon County Historical Society|-| Historical Society Museum || || Manteno || Illinois || Local history || website, early 20th century period displays|-| Louise Olmstead Memorial Museum ||   || Somonauk || Illinois || Local history || website, also natural history artifacts|-| House Museum ||   || Fulton || Illinois || Local history || website, operated by the Fulton Historical Society|-| and Leigh Block Museum of Art ||   || Evanston || Chicago area || Art || Part of University|-| Area Historical Society Museum ||  || McConnell || Illinois || Local history || website|-| Tribune Bridgehouse & Chicago River Museum||   || Chicago || Chicago area || History || website, natural, social and cultural history of the Chicago River|-| Tribune Freedom Museum ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || History || Dedicated to the First Amendment|-| Museum ||  || Des Plaines || Chicago area || Food || Recreation of the first McDonalds Restaurant |-| County Historical Society Museum ||  || Union || Illinois || Local history || website, period displays|-| County Museum of History||   || Bloomington || Central || Local history || website, Central Illinois history|-| Mansion||   || Alton || Metro-East || Historic house || website|-| County Historical Society Museum ||   || Petersburg || Central  || Biographical || information, home of poet Lee Masters|-| Courthouse State Historic Site||    || Metamora || Western || Historic site || Restored to 1850s period, also local history exhibits|-| Village Museum ||   || Rockford|| Illinois || Open air || website, 1890-1910 Victorian village with 24 historical buildings, costumed interpreters, local history exhibits|-| Museum of Natural History ||   || Sycamore|| Illinois || Natural history || website|-| Museum of the American Indian ||   || Evanston || Chicago area || Native American |||-| Money Museum||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Numismatic || History of the Federal Reserve and currencies|-| Railway Museum ||    || Monticello || Metropolitan Area || Railroad || website|-| Heritage Museum ||  || Morrison || Illinois || Local history || information|-| Grove Historical Museum ||  || Morton Grove || Chicago area || Local history  || website|-| Rudd Home Museum ||   || Gurnee || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Warren Township Historical Society|-| Museum of Electronics ||  || Schaumburg || Chicago area || Science || information, information, history of Motorola, electronics technology|-| Pulaski Courthouse State Historic Site||   || Mount Pulaski || Central || Historic site || Restored to 1850s period|-| Pulaski Historical Museum ||  || Mount Pulaski || Central || Local history  || website|-| Coal Mine Museum ||   || Moweaqua || Central || Mining  || website|-| of Broadcast Communications||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Media   || Historic and contemporary radio and television content, includes Radio Hall of Fame|-| Museum of Contemporary Art ||   || Chicago || Chicago area  || Art |||-| of Contemporary Photography||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art || |-| of Funeral Customs ||  || Springfield|| Central || History || Exhibits dealing with American funerary and mourning customs|-| of Holography||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art || |-| of Land Surveying ||   || Petersburg || Central  ||  || information, information|-| Museum of Science and Industry||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Science  || |-| Garage Museum ||   || Effingham || Southern  || Automotive || website, automotive collectibles and memorabilia|-| Settlement ||  || Naperville || Chicago area || Open air || 19th century historic museum village|-| Manilow Sculpture Park ||  || University Park || Chicago area || Art || website, outdoor sculpture park, part of State University|-| Fitness Hall of Fame & Museum ||  || Sycamore || Illinois || Sports || website, health and fitness|-| Great Rivers Museum||   || East Alton || Metro-East || Maritime || website, information, photos, operated by the S. Army Corps of Engineers, adjacent to Price Locks and Dam|-| Italian American Sports Hall of Fame||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Hall of fame  || |-| Museum of Mexican Art ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art  || Mexican, Latino, and Chicano art and culture|-| Museum of Surveying||   || Springfield || Central ||   ||website,  Museum that houses on a Sphere and exhibits on surveying, North of the Old State Capitol|-| Vietnam Veterans Art Museum||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art || Art produced by veterans from the Vietnam War|-| Air Station Glenview Museum ||  || Glenview || Chicago area || Aviation || website, aviation and the history of Air Station Glenview|-| Gallery ||   || DeKalb || Illinois || Culture || website, exhibits gallery of the Nehring Center for Culture and Tourism |-| Library||    || Chicago  || Chicago area || Library || Free changing exhibits of art, culture and history drawn from its collections|-| Historical Museum ||  || Niles || Chicago area || Local history  || website|-| History Museum||   || Northbrook || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Northbrook Historical Society, changing exhibits of local history and re-created 1890s Shermerville home|-| Norwood Park Historical Society Museum||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Local history || Period displays about Norwood Park community, operated by the Norwood Park Historical Society|-| Scandinavian Museum ||  || Norway || Illinois|| Historic house  || information|-| Illinois Fire Museum||   || Marengo || Chicago area || Firefighting || website, planned museum|-| Anthropology Museum ||   || DeKalb || Illinois || Anthropology || website, part of Illinois University, permanent exhibits include Ice Age, Neanderthals, Skywatchers and Primates|-| Art Museum ||   || DeKalb || Illinois || Art || website, part of Illinois University|-| Chanute Aerospace Museum ||  || Rantoul || Metropolitan Area || Aviation |||-| Historical Society Museum ||   || OFallon || Metro-East || Local history || website|-| County Historical Society Museum ||  || Oregon || Illinois || Historic house || website, also known as the Nash Home and Museum, 1880s period house|-| Barn Museum ||  || Newark || Chicago area || Native American  || website |-| Lincoln Courtroom & Museum||   || Beardstown || Western || Historic site || website, located in the courthouse with the Historical Museum|-| Old Market House || || Galena || Illinois || Local history || |-| Settlers Log Cabin ||   || Dixon || Illinois  || Historic house || website, operated by the Lee County Historical Society|-| Old State Capitol State Historic Site ||  || Springfield || Central || History || Restored to 1860s period|-| Parks Telephone Museum ||  || Springfield || Central || Technology || information, telephones and telecommunications history|-| Museum ||  || Oquawka || Western || Local history || information, information, open by appointment|-| Oriental Institute ||    || Chicago || Chicago area || Archaeology || Part of the of Chicago, history, art, and archaeology of the ancient Near East|-| Childrens Science Museum||   || Champaign || Metropolitan Area || Science || |-| Taylor House ||  || Freeport || Illinois || Historic house|| Operated by the Stephenson County Historical Society, Victorian period home and local history displays|-| Scouting Museum ||  || Ottawa || Illinois || Scouting || website, history and memorabilia of the Boy Scouts, Girl Scouts and Camp Fire Guides|-| Lovejoy Homestead ||  || Princeton || Illinois || Historic house|| Former station on the Railroad|-| P. Miles Museum ||  || Mount Carroll || Illinois || Historic house  || information, operated by the Carroll County Historical Society|-| Art Gallery||   || Champaign || Metropolitan Area || Art || website, part of College|-| Ridge Historical Society Museum ||  || Park Ridge || Chicago area || Historic house || website, late 19th century period home|-| Parsonage Museum ||  || Quincy || Western || Local history || website, operated by the Historical Society of Quincy and Adams County|-| Peace Museum||   || Chicago  || Chicago area || Art || Dedicated to peace through the arts|-| Museum ||  || Springfield || Central || Medical || website, part of Illinois University School of Medicine, history of medicine, health care, nursing, dentistry, and pharmacy from all cultures and eras|-| Heritage Museum||  ||Pecatonica|| Illinois || Local history || website|-| Notebaert Nature Museum ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Natural history |||-| House||   || Peoria || Central || Historic house || Operated by the Peoria Historical Society|-| County Museum ||   || Monticello || Metropolitan Area || Local history || website, includes agricultural equipment and household items, civil war artifacts, clothing, quilts, dolls and toy trains|-| Menard Home State Historic Site || || Ellis Grove || Southern || Historic house || 1810 French Creole-style home of Menard, the first lieutenant governor of Illinois|-| Sholes School||  ||St. Charles|| Illinois || School  || website|-| Home ||  || Oak Park || Chicago area || Historic house || Prairie style mansion|-| Museum of America ||  || Chicago || Chicago area || Ethnic || Polish history, culture and art|-| County Historical Society Museum ||   || Golconda || Southern || Local history || information|-| Museum||  || Chester || Southern  || Local history || Located in the home town of Popeye|-| Grove Vintage Wings & Wheels Museum ||  || Poplar Grove || Illinois || Transportation || website, vintage aircraft, automobiles and other modes of transportation and memorabilia|-| Courthouse State Historic Site || || Ellis Grove || Southern || Historic site || Reconstructed frontier courthouse|-| Aviation Museum ||   || Bloomington || Central  || Aviation || website, military aircraft|-| Grass Nature Museum ||   || Round Lake || Chicago area  || Natural history  || website|-| Mills Windmill ||  || Golden || Western || Mill || website, restored Dutch smock windmill, includes Golden Museum of local history; operated by the Golden Historical Society|-| Heritage Center ||   || Princeville || Central || Local history || website|-| Military Library||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art   || Free exhibits of military art drawn from its collections|-| Historical Society Museum||   || Prophetstown || Illinois || Local history || information|-| Historic District||    || Chicago || Chicago area || Historic site || |-| Art Center ||  || Quincy || Western || Art || website|-| Museum ||   || Quincy || Western || Local history  || website, includes period rooms, local history exhibits, store display, dinosaur room|-| Ann & Andy Museum ||  || Arcola || Central  || Commodity  || website, Ann & Andy memorabilia, Gruelle exhibits|-|County Archives and Museum||  ||Chester||   ||Local History|| |-| Inn||   || Carmi || Southern || Local history || website, operated by the White County Historical Society|-| Memorial Museum||   || Buffalo Grove || Chicago area || Local history || website|-| Mansion ||  || Ottawa || Illinois || Historic house || website, pre-Civil War Italianate mansion|-| Renaissance Society||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art   || Part of the of Chicago, contemporary art|-| Museum ||   || Nauvoo || Central || Historic house || website, operated by the Nauvoo Historical Society in State Park|-| W. Bock Sculpture Museum || || Greenville || Southern || Art || website, part of College, houses collection of bronze and plaster sculptures of Bock|-| Heritage Museum || || Olney || Southern || Local history || website|-| Historical Society||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Local history  || website, exhibits related to neighborhoods of Beverly Hills, Morgan Park and Washington Heights|-| Riverside Museum || || Riverside || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Riverside Historical Commission |-| R. McCormick Museum||   ||Wheaton|| Chicago area || Historic house || website, 1930s historic mansion with biographical exhibits about R. McCormick, located at Cantigny|-| House ||  || Chicago || Chicago area || Historic house || Designed by Lloyd Wright|-| House||   || Carmi || Southern || Historic house || website, operated by the White County Historical Society|-| Fire Department Museum ||  || Rochelle || Illinois || Firefighting|| information|-| Art Museum ||   || Rockford || Illinois || Art || website, American art from the 19th century to contemporary|-| Falls Fire Department Museum ||  || Rock Falls || Illinois || Firefighting|| information|-| Rock Island Arsenal Museum ||  || Rock Island || Cities || Military || History of Rock Island Arsenal, Arsenal Island and small arms development|-| Island Railroad Museum ||   || Chillicothe || Cities || Railroad  || website, operated by the Chillicothe Historical Society|-| N Roll McDonalds ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Food || Restaurant with McDonalds memorabilia and rock and roll artifacts|-| Township Historical Society Museum ||   || Rockton || Illinois || Local history || website, American art from the 19th century to contemporary|-| Meadows Historical Museum ||  || Rolling Meadows || Chicago area || Local history  || website, 1950s period displays|-| Ronald Reagan Birthplace ||  || Tampico || Illinois || Historic site || |-| Reagan Boyhood Home ||  || Dixon || Illinois || Biographical || |-| Reagan Museum at Eureka College ||  || Eureka || Central || Biographical || website|-| History Museum ||  || Roselle || Chicago area || Local history || website, includes local history museum and 1920s period home|-| Depot Railroad Museum ||   || Rossville || Central || Railroad || website, operated by the Danville Junction Chapter of the National Railway Historical Society|-| 66 Association Hall of Fame & Museum || || Pontiac || Central  || Transportation || website, information, Route 66 memorabilia|-| Military Museum ||   || Russell || Chicago area || Military || website, tanks, military vehicles, weapons, memorabilia|-| Round Barn||   || Kewanee || Cities || Agriculture || Located in Trail State Park|-| Army Depot Museum ||  ||Savanna || Illinois || Military || information|-| Historical Museum ||  ||Savanna || Illinois || Local history || information, news report|-| Train Car Museum ||  ||Savanna || Illinois || Railroad || website|-| Center for Native American Cultures || || Aurora || Chicago area || Native American || website, part of University, historic and contemporary Native American culture|-| Log House ||  || Winnetka || Chicago area || School || website, operated by the Winnetka Historical Society |-| County Historical Jail Museum & Genealogical Center||   || Rushville || Western || Local history || website, information|-| Center of Southern Illinois ||   || Carbondale || Southern || Science || website|-| Hands On Museum || || Aurora || Chicago area || Science || website|-| Historical Museum || || Shabbona || Illinois || Local history || website|-| Gas Station Museum||   || Springfield || Central || Commodity  ||information, information, gas station memorabilia|-| Aquarium||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Aquarium |||-| Museum||   || Sheffield || Illinois || Local history || website, operated by the Sheffield Historical Society|-| Peck Homestead || || Lombard || Chicago area || Historic house || website, 1840s-1860s period home, operated by the Lombard Historical Society|-| Shiloh House ||   || Zion || Chicago area || Historic house || website, operated by the Zion Historical Society|-| Museum ||  || Freeport || Illinois || History  || website, early Americana including crockery, dolls, recreated schoolroom and kitchen, art exhibits, quilts, old-fashioned tools and agricultural equipment, engines, vehicles, trains|-| Creek Railroad Museum ||  || Freeport || Illinois || Railroad || website, railroad cars and memorabilia|-| Heritage Museum & Log Cabin||   || Skokie || Chicago area || Historic house || website, historic engine house with fire equipment and original 1847 log cabin|-| Heritage Museum || || Joliet || Chicago area  || Ethnic || website, operated by the Womens Union of America|-| Museum of Art ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art || Part of the of Chicago|-| Museum of Stained Glass Windows ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art || Located at Pier, permanent display of 150 stained glass windows|-| Archives and Center for American Music ||   || Champaign || Metropolitan Area || Music || Sousa Archives and Center for American Music website|-| Southern Illinois Art & Artisans Center ||   || Whittington || Southern || Art || Satellite gallery of the State Museum|-| Museum||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Religious || Jewish culture and history|-| Museum||    || Urbana || Metropolitan Area || Anthropology || Part of of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign, Ancient Mediterranean, Africa, Asia, Oceania, Europe, and the Americas|-| Tavern Museum || || Glen Ellyn || Chicago area || Historic site  || website, operated by the Glen Ellyn Historical Society|-| Charles History Museum||  ||St. Charles|| Illinois || Local history || website, operated by the St. Charles Heritage Center|-| Sterling-Rock Falls Historical Society Museum ||   || Sterling || Illinois || Local history || |-| House Museum ||   || Monmouth || Central || Historic house || website, birthplace of Kappa Gamma|-| Soldier Citizen Museum||   || Galesburg || Western || Military || information|-| Heritage Museum || || Stockton || Illinois || Local history || information|-| Mill Museum ||  ||Sandwich || Illinois || Local history || information|-| Historical Museum ||  || Streator || Illinois || Local history  || website|-| Military Museum ||  || Oregon || Illinois || Military || information|-| Museum ||  || Metropolis || Southern || Media || website, Superman memorabilia|-| Discovery Center ||  || Sublette || Illinois || Environmental  || website, sustainable energies, energy consumption, green products|-| American Museum||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Cultural ||website|-| Historical Society Museum ||  || Sycamore || Illinois || Local history || website|-| Area Historical Museum || || Tampico || Illinois || Local history || website|-| Arts Center ||  || Charleston || Central || Art || website, part of Illinois University|-| Museum ||  || Dixon || Illinois || Media || information, history of the newspaper and its role in the history of Dixon|-| Monastery Museum ||   || Teutopolis || Central || Religious || information, information|-| Depot Museum ||  ||Thomson || Illinois || Railroad || website|-| Historical Museum||   || Thornton || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Village of Thornton Historical Society|-| Sisters Park ||   || Chillicothe || Cities || Living  || website|-| Swiss Cottage Museum ||    || Rockford || Illinois || Historic house || Victorian Swiss-style home with decorative arts and furnishings|-| Museum ||  || River Forest || Chicago area || Natural history || website, also known as Harold Hal Tyrell Trailside Museum|-| Museum||   || Tremont || Central || Local history  ||website, operated by the Tremont Museum and Historical Society|-| Museum||   || Springfield || Central || Culture  ||website, part of Land Community College, art, world and cultural items|-| Institute of Modern Art ||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Art |||-| National Museum||   || Chicago || Chicago area || Cultural |||-| S. Grant Home ||  || Galena || Central || Historic house || Home and museum about President S. Grant|-| County Museum || || Cobden || Southern || Local history || website, operated by the Mendota Museum & Historical Society|-| Depot Railroad Museum || || Mendota || Illinois || Railroad || website, operated by the Mendota Museum & Historical Society|-| Temple ||  || Oak Park || Chicago area || Historic site || Church designed by Lloyd Wright|-| Museum, SIU ||   || Carbondale || Southern || Multiple || website, part of Illinois University Carbondale, local and world connections behind the arts, humanities, and sciences|-| Senator Paul Simon Museum ||   || Troy || Metro-East || Biographical  || website|-| Lindsay House||  ||Springfield|| Central || Historic house || Birthplace and home of poet Lindsay|-| Vandalia State House State Historic Site||   || Vandalia || Southern || Historic site || Restored to 1830s period|-| County Museum||   || Danville || Central || Local history || website, includes museum and Fithian Home|-| County War Museum||   || Danville || Central || Military || website, memorabilia and artifacts from the Revolutionary War to Operation Iraqi Freedom|-| Park Historical Society Museum||   || Villa Park || Chicago area || Local history || website, housed in a former depot|-| Hill Historic Lead Mine & Museum||   || Galena || Central || Mining  || information, information, information|-| Museum of Lake Bluff History||   || Lake Bluff || Chicago area || Local history || website|-| Heritage Farm ||  || Schaumburg || Chicago area || Farm || website, 1880s living farm museum|-| Auto Museum ||   || Volo || Chicago area  || Automotive || Cars from the 1950s, 1960s, and 1970s and from famous television shows and movies|-| County Museum||   || Mt. Carmel || Southern || Local history || website|-| Farm ||  ||Glenview || Chicago area || Agriculture || website, historic working dairy farm, Wagner Farm Heritage Center with farming exhibits, 1930s grocery store|-| Memorial Museum ||  ||Sandwich || Illinois || Commodity || information, more than 10,000 items of various collectibles|-| Payton Museum ||  || Aurora || Chicago area || Biographical || website, exhibits about football player Payton|-| County Museum||   || Roseville ||  || Local history || information, information|-| Historical Museum||   || Warrenville || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Warrenville Historical Society|-| Area Heritage Society Museum || || Waterman || Illinois || Local history  || website|-| House and Garden||   ||Streator|| Illinois || Historic house || website, 18th century style storybook house of Weber|-| House Museum ||   || Nauvoo || Central || Local history || website, operated by the Nauvoo Historical Society |-| Chicago City Museum||   || West Chicago || Chicago area || Local history || website, local history and art |-| Town Museum of Cultural History||   || Maywood || Chicago area || Local history || website, includes exhibits of African American culture, Maywood and the Proviso Township area|-| Illinois Museum ||  || Macomb || Western || Local history || website|-| Historical Society Museum||   || Wheeling || Chicago area || Local history || information|-| O Time Museum||   || Peoria || Central || Transportation || website, antique vehicles, farm equipment, tools, collectibles|-| House Museum||   || Galva || Illinois || Historic house || website, operated by the Galva Historical Society|-| and Florence Schmidt Art Center ||  || Belleville || Metro-East || Art  || Part of Illinois College|-| Jennings Bryan Boyhood Home||   || Salem || Southern || Biographical || |-| L. Gregg House Museum||   || Westmont || Chicago area || Historic house || website, operated by the Westmont Historical Society|-| County Historical Society Museum ||   || Marion || Southern || Local history || website|-| Tanner House Museum ||  || Aurora || Chicago area || Historic house  || website, Victorian Italianate-style house|-| Historical Museum ||  || Williamsville || Central || Local history  || information|-| Historical Museum ||  || Wilmette || Chicago area || Local history || website, operated by the Wilmette Historical Society|-| Historical Society Museum ||  || Winnetka || Chicago area || Local history || website|-| Historical Society Museum ||  || Winslow || Chicago area || Local history || information|-| Art Gallery ||  || Macomb || Western || Art || website, part of Illinois University|-| Geology Museum ||  || Macomb || Western || Natural history || website, part of Illinois University|-| Works ||   || Oak Park || Chicago area || Childrens |||-| Woodlawn Farm ||   || Jacksonville || Central || Historic house || website, 1840s house, part of the Railroad|-| Aerospace Museum ||  || Quincy || Western || Aviation || website, operated by the Historical Society of Quincy and Adams County|-| Historical Museum||   || Worth ||Chicago area  || Local history || website, operated by the Worth Park District|-| Earp Birthplace ||   || Monmouth || Central || Historic house || website|-|}Defunct museums* Museum, Chicago, closed on October 31, 2004 * Under the Prairie Frontier Archaeological Museum, Athens, operated by the Sangamo Archaeological Center, closed August 1, 2008, museum websiteSee also* Arboreta in Illinois (category) * Aquaria in Illinois (category) * Botanical gardens in Illinois (category) * Historic landmarks in Illinois* Houses in Illinois (category) * Forts in Illinois (category) * Museums list* Nature Centers in Illinois* Astronomical observatories in Illinois (category) * Registered Historic Places in IllinoisDefunct Museums* American Police Center & Museum, Chicago(http://www.roadsideamerica.com/story/2087 Roadside America report on the museum, closed in 2001)* Max Nordeens Wheels Museum, Woodhull,(http://www.roadsideamerica.com/story/2096 Roadside America Report)(http://www.roadsideamerica.com/story/17539 Video clips about the museum)References*Illinois Association of Museums*Historic Homes of Illinois
15104674
List_of_museums_in_South_Dakota
This list of museums in Dakota encompasses museums defined for this context as institutions (including organizations, government entities, and private businesses) that collect and care for objects of cultural, artistic, scientific, or historical interest and make their collections or related exhibits available for public viewing. Museums that exist only in cyberspace (i.e., museums) are not included.To use the sortable table, click on the icons at the top of each column to sort that column in alphabetical order; click again for reverse alphabetical order.Museums{| classwikitable sortable !| Name!| Town/City!| Region!| Type!| Summary|-| Courthouse Museum || Custer || Western  || Local history || website|-| Homestead and Nature Preserve || Lake || Southeast || Open air || website, park with historic Shay-Adams Home with period furnishings, barn, country school and church|-| House Museum || Deadwood || Western  || Local history || website, exhibits include folk art, Bill Hickok, Jane and Dick|-| Lakota Museum || Chamberlain || Central || Native American || website, profiles the lives of nomadic Indians|-| Forces Display and Gifts || Wasta || Western || Military || information, private museum displaying foreign and domestic militaria from WWI, WWII, Korea, Vietnam and current US conflicts|-| College Art Galleries || Sioux Falls || Southeast || Art || website, part of Augustana College|-| House Museum || Vermillion || Southeast || Local history  || information|-| National Park || Interior || Western  || Natural history || Visitor center exhibits include the geology, paleontology and natural history of the park|-| Petrified Garden || Kadoka || Western  || Natural history || website, rocks, minerals and fossils|-| Heritage Museum || Clark || Northeast || Open air || website, complex includes museum with period displays, Clark Railroad Depot, a settlers shanty, a pioneer church and school; also known as Clark County Museum|-| Thunder Gold Mine || Keystone || Western  || Mining || website, includes mine tour and museum|-| Hills Mining Museum || Lead || Western  || Mining || website, gold mine|-| Hills Museum of Natural History || Hill City || Western  || Natural history  || website, fossils, dinosaurs, gems, minerals, meteorites|-| Homme Heritage Museum || Tyndall || Southeast || Local history || information|-| Memorial Lakota Museum || St. Francis || Central || Native American || website, history of the Lakota of the Indian Reservation|-| Historical Museum || Buffalo || Western || Local history || information, includes museum and 1914 one room schoolhouse|-| Interpretive Center || Fort Pierre || Central || Natural history || website, story of the buffalo, its importance and significance in the North American Indian cultures of the Great Plains, and its relationship to the people of the Brule Sioux Tribe|-| Original Straw Bale Built Museum || Carthage || Southeast || Local history    || website, located in a building built out of straw bales|-| Tibbs South Dakota Rodeo Center || Fort Pierre || Central  || Sports    || website, opening 2009, South Dakota rodeo heritage and memorabilia|-| for Western Studies || Sioux Falls || Southeast || American West || website, part of Augustana College, exhibits include Native American artifacts, 19th century replica Norwegian living room, Savage art studio, changing exhibits from its collections|-| in the Hills || Rapid City || Western  || Historic site || Stave church replica of the Borgund stave church in Norway and 19th century Norwegian log cabin|-| Wheels Museum || Clark || Northeast  || Transportation || website, includes antique vehicles, toy cars, model trains|-| Train Depot Restoration || Redfield || Northeast || Railroad || website|-| County Heritage Museum || Watertown || Northeast || Local history    || website|-| Historical Museum || Corsica || Southeast || Local history    || website|-| Kenyon Heritage Home || Yankton || Southeast || Historic house || information|-| Horse Memorial || Crazy Horse || Western  || Multiple || Monumental sculpture of Horse, Indian Museum of North America, and the Native American Cultural Center|-| State Park || Custer || Western  || Multiple || Includes Peter Norbeck Center with natural history and cultural heritage displays, and Badger Hole, the historic house of poet Badger Clark|-| Prairie Museum || Aberdeen || Northeast || Multiple || website, natural, cultural and local history|-| Arts Center || Rapid City || Western  || Art  || website|-| Discovery Museum || Mitchell || Southeast || Multiple || website, art, history, culture, located on the campus of Wesleyan University|-| Sunset Museum || Gettysburg || Central || Local history || website, includes museum, country school, carriage barn, and blacksmith shop|-| Territorial Museum || Yankton || Southeast || Local history || website, includes museum, school, depot and caboose|-| Museum || Huron || Northeast || Local history || information|-| of 76 Museum || Deadwood || Western  || American West || website, includes horse-drawn vehicles, rodeo items, Old West pioneer and American Indian art and artifacts|-| Booth Historic National Fish Hatchery || Spearfish || Western || Industry || website, former hatchery, includes Von Bayer Museum of Fish Culture with exhibits about the history and science of fish culture and fisheries|-| Smet Depot Museum || De Smet || Southeast || Local history || information|-| County Museum || Armour || Southeast || Local history || website, includes the Country School and Railroad House, operated by the Douglas County Historical Society|-| Museum || Bison || Western || Natural history || website, Displays over 300 mounted bird species and an assortment of animals from around the world|-| Community Museum || Elkton || Northeast || Local history || information|-| County Historical Museum || Faulkton || Central || Local history || information, information, open by appointment|-| Meade Museum || Sturgis || Western  || Military || website|-| Mile Old West Town || Custer || Western  || Open air || website, buildings include a town hall, saloon, general store, church, bank, a outhouse, sheriffs office, jails|-| Historic Village || Geddes || Southeast || Open air || website|-| Rural Cultural Center || Groton || Southeast || Art || website|-| River Museum || Lemmon || Western  || Multiple || website, includes local bronze sculptures, ranching, Native American and homestead artifacts, fossils and Creation Science displays|-| Plains Zoo & Delbridge Museum of Natural History || Sioux Falls || Southeast || Natural history || website|-| Antique Safe Museum || Mitchell || Southeast || Commodity || information, antique safes, farm toys and toy racecars|-| Hall Museum || Freeman || Southeast || Multiple || website, displays natural history, history and local history, including pioneer tools, pioneer household items, antiques, toys, vehicles and native wildlife displays|-| Center of Red Cloud Indian School || Ridge Indian Reservation ||  Western || Native American || website|-| Plains Western Heritage Center || Spearfish || Western  || American West || website,  Western art, historic artifacts & memorabilia|-| Adams House || Deadwood || Western  || Historic house || website, 1892 Victorian house|-| Prairie Village || Madison || Southeast || Open air || website, includes over 40 antique-filled buildings, agricultural displays, steam tractors, a sawmill and a train|-| Homestead || De Smet || Southeast || Open air || website, includes Ingalls homestead, school, dugout house, prairie learning center, pioneer activities|-| Vinegar Museum || Roslyn || Northeast || Food || website, vinegars from all over the world|-| County Pioneer Museum || Wessington Springs || Southeast || Multiple || website, complex includes one room school, medical office, Western equipment, blacksmith shop, local history artifacts|-| Parmley Historical Home || Ipswich || Northeast || Local history || information|-| Journey Museum and Gardens || Rapid City || Western  || Multiple  || Contains prehistoric & historic collections related to the Western Plains with displays of local geology, archaeology, Native American culture, & European pioneer history in the Minnilusa Pioneer Museum|-| Historical Museum || Keystone || Western  || Local history || website|-| Museum || Mobridge ||  || Local history || information, features pioneer and Native American artifacts|-| Norden Historical Society || Lake Norden || Southeast  || Local history|| information, includes museum, one room school and barn with artifacts|-| Ingalls Wilder Memorial Society || De Smet || Southeast || Historic house || website, operates guided tours of two original homes of the family of author Ingalls Wilder|-| and Clark Center Visitor Center || Yankton || Southeast || Multiple || website, exhibits include natural & cultural history, geology, exploration, Native Americans, steamboats|-| Borglum Museum || Keystone || || || Located within the Rushmore National Memorial|-| Village Farm Museum || Dell Rapids || Southeast || Agriculture || information, several barns and buildings with agriculture tools and equipment|-| Heritage House || Oldham || Southeast || Historic house || information|-| Theatre Museum || Platte || Southeast || Local history || information|-| Mammoth Site of Hot Springs || Hot Springs || Western || Natural history || Active paleontological dig site and museum with fossils of mammoths, ancient flora and fauna|-| County Museum || Salem || Southeast  || Local history || website|-| House || Watertown || Northeast || Historic house || website, Victorian home of South Dakotas first governor, Calvin Mellette|-| Pioneer Museum || Midland || Central || Local history || website, pioneer and railroad history and artifacts|-| County Museum || Howard || Southeast  || Local history || information, rural life displays|-| Missile National Historic Site || Jackson County || Western || Military || information|-| Museum of Woodcarving || Custer || Western  || Art || website, art and sculptures carved in wood|-| Presidential Wax Museum || Keystone || Western  || Wax || website, wax figures of U.S. presidents in historic moments|-| Garage || Deadwood || Western  || Automotive || website, located in the Celebrity Hotel, cars and motorcycles|-| Courthouse Museum || Sioux Falls || Southeast || Local history || website|-| Old Governors Mansion || Rapid City || Western  || Historic house || website|-| Wood Park || Lemmon || Western  || Multiple || website, includes sculptures and structures built from petrified wood and fossils, and the Lemmon Pioneer Museum|-| Home & Museum || Sioux Falls || Southeast || Historic house || website, late 19th century house and personal collections of Senator F. Pettigrew|-| Mansion || Faulkton || Central  || Historic house || information, information|-| Auto Show || Murdo || Western  || Multiple || website, automobiles, trucks, motorcycles, National Rockhound Hall of Fame & Lapidary, tractors, antiques and collectibles, authentic prairie town that includes a railroad depot, bank, general store, gas station, church, school, camera shop, butcher shop and more|-| Historical Museum of South Dakota || Hot Springs || Western  || History || website, antiques, decorative arts, tools, photos|-| Visitors/Interpretive Center || Pollock || Central || Local history || information|-| Sculpture Park || Montrose || Southeast || Art || Outdoor sculpture park|-| Homestead || Philip || Central || Historic house || website, early 20th century sod dwelling|-| House Museum || Huron || Northeast || Historic house || information, 1894 home of Pyle, the first elected woman U.S. senator|-| Art Center || Watertown || Northeast || Art || Gallery that displays over 150 works by artist Redlin|-| Borglum Historical Center || Keystone || Western  || Biographical || website, Mount Rushmore sculptor Borglum|-| Attic Museum || Sioux Falls || Southeast || Scouting || website|-| Heritage Center || Mission || Central || Native American || website, part of Gleska University|-| Empire Medical Museum || Sioux Falls || Southeast || Medical || information|-| Zimmermann Heritage Museum || Madison || Southeast  || Local history  || website, part of State University|-| Dakota Air and Space Museum || Box Elder || Western  || Aerospace || US Air Force and South Dakota aviation history|-| Dakota Amateur Baseball Hall of Fame || Lake Norden  || Southeast  || of fame - Sports  || Amateur baseball in South Dakota as well as memorabilia from South Dakotans who played League Baseball  |-| Dakota Art Museum || Brookings  || Southeast || Art || website, collections include works by Dunn and Goble, Native American cultural artifacts, Marghab linens|-| Dakota Cultural Heritage Center || Pierre  || Central || History || website, museum of the South Dakota Historical Society|-| Dakota Discovery Center || Pierre  || Central || Science || website, includes an aquarium|-| Dakota Hall of Fame || Chamberlain  || Central || of fame - History   || Honors those who contributed to the progress, way of life, and values of the Dakota|-| Dakota National Guard Museum || Pierre  || Central || Military  || website|-| Dakotas Original 1880 Town || Murdo || Western  || Open air || website, includes over 30 building with historic artifacts and rodeo star Tibbs Museum|-| Dakota State Agricultural Heritage Museum || Brookings  || Southeast || Agriculture || website, part of Dakota State University|-| Dakota State Capitol || Pierre  || Central || History  || Tours include the capitol and First Lady Gown Collection|-| Dakota Tractor Museum || Kimball  || Central || Agriculture  || website, historic tractors and other farm machinery |-| County Museum || Redfield || Northeast || Local history || website|-| College Museum || Springfield || Southeast  || Local history || website|-| Historical Society Museum || Springfield || Southeast  || Local history || information|-| Motorcycle Museum & Hall of Fame || Sturgis || Western  || Transportation || website, features vintage and rare V-twin and metric motorcycles|-| Lake and Area Museum || Timber Lake || Central || Local history  || website, includes fossils, Native American artifacts, period displays|-| Trains & Pioneers Museum || Edgemont || Western || Local history  || website, open by appointment|-| Museum || Belle Fourche || Western  || American West || website, early pioneer, rodeo, and old west history of the Tri-State region of Western South Dakota, Eastern Wyoming and Southeast Montana|-| County Historical Society Museum || Elk Point || Southeast || Local history || website|-| of South Dakota Art Galleries || Vermillion || Southeast || Art  || website|-| Park || Tabor || Southeast || Open air || information, includes Czech Museum, chapel, jail, store, log school and log house |-| Museum || Fort Pierre || Central || Local history || website|-| Gold Mill || Hill City || Western  || Mining || website, modern gold mill and antique mining museum|-| Pavilion of Arts and Science || Sioux Falls || Southeast || Multiple || Includes the Kirby Science Discover Center and Visual Arts Center with galleries|-| H. Over Museum of Natural and Cultural History || Vermillion || Southeast || Multiple  || website, natural history displays, Native American and pioneer artifacts|-| Lake Community Museum || Willow Lake || Northeast || Local history || website|-| Cave National Park || Hot Springs || Western  || Natural history || Visitor center includes three rooms with exhibits about the geology of the caves, the parks natural and cultural history|-| Knee Museum || Wall || Central  || Native American  || website, history of the Knee Massacre|}Defunct museumsImage:National Music Museum.jpg|thumb|right|100px|Music Museum * Performance Auto Museum, Sioux Falls and Deadwood(http://www.roadsideamerica.com/tip/1182 Roadside America report)* Soukup and Thomas International Balloon and Airship Museum, Mitchell, closed in 2000(http://www.roadsideamerica.com/tip/7371)See alsoImage:AktaLakotaMuseum.jpg|thumb|right|150px|Lakota Museum*Arboreta in South Dakota (category)*Botanical gardens in South Dakota (category)*Historic landmarks in South Dakota*Forts in South Dakota (category)*Museums list*Nature Centers in South Dakota*Astronomical observatories in South Dakota (category)*Registered Historic Places in South DakotaReferencesResources*Association of South Dakota Museums
15127976
Australian_Aluminium_Council
The Australian Aluminium Council is an Australian association representing companies involved in bauxite mining and the refining, production and distribution of aluminium.Prosser has been the Executive Director of the Australian Aluminium Council since 2008. Membership Council members include some of Australias largest companies, including Alcoa, Alumina Limited, Tinto Aluminium, and Hydro Aluminium. Member companies of the Australian Aluminium Council produce 26 percent of global alumina sales and are collectively the fifth largest producer of aluminium. The Australian aluminium industry employs around 17,000 workers directly and generates export earnings worth over $8.3 billion.() Role of the Council The Council is the peak industry association representing the Australian Aluminium industry. The Council promotes the use of Australian aluminium products nationally and internationally. A technical standards group within the Council also develops and maintains material specifications and technical data for industry use, and the Council produces an annual statistical analysis of materials consumption, aluminium production and exports by Australias six aluminium smelters and one aluminum-rolled product plant.() As an industry advocate, the Council has strongly opposed gas trading schemes on the basis that anti-emission technology is insufficient to minimise the cost impact on producers, and that international action on greenhouse gases should precede Australian programs.() The Council also notes that while greenhouse gas emissions from Australian aluminium smelters rose 29 percent since 1990 to a peak of 13.9 million tonnes in 2006, this lags behind a 64 percent increase in aluminium production over the same period.()See also* in AustraliaReferences  External links *Australian Aluminium Council official website
15146639
Pokmon_Ranger:_Shadows_of_Almia
inputStylus, D-pad, buttons is an action/role-playing game developed by Inc. for the DS game console. It is the sequel to the Ranger video game, also for the DS.It was announced in the January 2008 issue of CoroCoro and was released in Japan on March 20, 2008. It was announced at 2008 that the game would be released in the United States under the title Shadows of Almia on November 10, 2008. It was announced on September 25 that the game would be released in Europe under the title Shadows of Almia on November 21, 2008.The game features 270 Pokmon, including new Pokmon which were not featured in the original Ranger, from Pokmon Diamond and Pearl. The game utilizes the WiFi Connection to download new missions.GameplayThe game takes place in the Almia region. The player begins as a Pokmon ranger-in-training at the Ranger School and quickly graduates to a rookie Ranger and must advance from there.  The player may choose their characters gender, but unlike in the original Ranger, this choice does not affect their partner Pokmon.  Much of gameplay is similar to the original game. Players must capture/befriend wild Pokmon to aid them by circling them with their DS stylus (known as a Capture Styler in the game).  There is a major change from the original capture method.  Instead of having to complete certain number of loops without lifting the stylus, the player must fill up a Pokmons Friendship Gauge by drawing loops around the Pokmon, but can lift the stylus to avoid attacks.  However, the power in Friendship Gauge will decrease over time if the player stops drawing loops for too long.  The amount of power in the gauge filled by each loop increases as the player levels up the styler.Shadows of Almia also introduces Quests, which are mini-missions not essential to the plot that involve the player completing requests from Almia citizens, earning new partner Pokmon and power-ups (such as resistance to attacks or longer capture lines) for their styler as rewards.Unlike the original, Shadows of Almia allows the player to choose their partner Pokmon.  In the previous game, the partner was decided based on the players chosen gender (Minun for male, Plusle for female). Players start with either Pachirisu, Munchlax, or Starly, and the other 14 partners (as well as the two partners that were not chosen at the beginning) are obtainable either through sub-quests or in-game events, and once captured, can be switched to be the players partner at any time. There are 17 possible partners, one for each Pokmon type.Shadows of Almia also includes 4 different types of stylers: the School, Capture, Fine and Vatonage stylers. The School styler is a simplified version of the capture styler, while the Fine Styler has a charge feature (which can be upgraded) which activates when the styler is held down, increasing the amount of feelings conveyed to the Pokmon and enabling quicker captures. The Vatonage styler is a unique Fine Styler that can capture Team Dim Suns Pokmon instead of merely releasing them. SynopsisSettingThis game takes place in a new region - , far from all other regions encountered in other games. The Fiore region is an exception, however. It is mentioned frequently in Almia. Almia has a widely varied landscape, everything from the hot Haruba Desert to the chilly Hia Valley.PlotThe game follows the protagonist, a young Pokmon Ranger as he or she graduates from Ranger School and takes on the duties of a fully fledged Ranger. The male is called Kellyn (Hajime, in the Japanese version) and the female is called Kate (Hitomi in the Japanese version). Only Kellyn appears in the Pokmon anime. Missions advance the story, which is centred around the antagonists Team Dim Sun (Team Yami Yami in the Japanese version) and their unknown intentions involving Pokmon mind-control machines called Gigaremos powered by dark crystals. Quests usually consist of the player travelling around the Almia region, performing varying tasks requested by citizens in exchange for rewards.The game starts at the Ranger School, with the player enrolling as a student after expertly capturing a Pikachu. The player quickly makes friends with two of classmates, Rhythmi who dreams of being an Operator, and Keith, a rival, who dreams of becoming a Top Ranger. After the player and Keith nearly discover what Mr. Kincaid, a teacher, is doing in the basement, Mr. Kincaid seals it off from all students. Both the player and Keith show strong potential as Rangers, and graduate with full honors after defeating two Tangrowth at their graduation ceremony. The player stays in Almia, while Keith and Rhythmi go to Fiore as part of their training. The players family moves into a nearby town known as Chicole Village, and the player goes to live with them.The next day, the player becomes an Area Ranger in the local village of Vientown. After recovering a Partner Pokmon at the beach, the player begins his/her first major mission by patrolling a nearby cave. The Pokmon inside the cave are unusually aggressive and resistant to capture by the rangers styler. At the back of the cave, the player finds a strange machine (later called a Gigaremo) that appears to be controlling the Pokmon. The rangers promptly destroy the device, freeing the Pokmon, and begin researching its abilities. Subsequently, the rangers discover that the Gigaremos are being set up by Team Dim Sun, suggesting wider criminal activities. The player travels to the Ranger Union, the headquarters of all ranger operations in Almia, to warn the rangers about the Gigaremo. On the way, the player sees Altru Inc., a powerful oil company that is building a massive tower in the center of the Almia region.Soon afterward, the player is informed of a fire in the Vien Forest, north of Vientown. After going into the forest, the player will have to capture a Blastoise and use its Rain Dance ability to douse the fire. Afterwards, the player is congratulated on how well the player has done, and can progress onto the city on the other end of the Vien Forest-Pueltown.A few days later, the player is sent on a mission to retrieve his missing team leader, Barlow. Barlow was last seen in Boyleland investigating a volcanic cave. The player will have to go to Pueltown and take a boat to Boyleland. Deep inside the cave, the player finds members of Team Dim Sun deploying new Miniremo devices to control all of the Pokmon on the island. The player dodges the guards and learns that Barlow has been captured and is being placed on a ship along with the Pokmon. The player sneaks on board, locates Barlow, and the two launch an assault on the ships bridge. Although Barlows styler is destroyed in the ensuing attack, the player forces Team Dim Sun, including its leader, Mr. Kincaid, to abandon the ship, saving all of Boylelands Pokmon. The ship crashes into the yard of the Ranger School, never to sail again.Recognizing the threat posed by Team Dim Sun, the Ranger Union promptly promotes the player to the rank of Top Ranger. At the Union, the player discovers that Keith has also been promoted to Top Ranger, and that Rhythmi has achieved her dream of becoming a Top Operator, where she serves as the players guide. During the players first mission as a Top Ranger, he helps another Top Ranger, named Sven, to investigate a Dim Sun mining operation in the Chroma Ruins, east of the Ranger Union. They discover that Dim Sun is searching for dark crystals for powering the Gigaremo devices. After defeating a Spiritomb, they also discover a massive hole, apparently left from removing the legendary Shadow Crystal whose current location is unknown. While studying the dark crystal retrieved from a captured Gigaremo, several Union workers accidentally discover that the crystals can be neutralized by a set of red, blue, and yellow shards.  The player and Keith go on to separately collect the sources of these shards; the blue gem from Almia Castle, the red gem from Boyle Volcano, and the yellow gem from Hippowdon Temple. Although the player takes both the blue and red gems, Keith is captured by Dim Sun, which uses him to blackmail the player into surrendering the yellow gem. Meanwhile, Sven raids Dim Suns undersea base, stealing plans for an Incredible Machine. The plans reveal that Altru Inc.s tower is actually a massive Gigaremo powered by the Shadow Crystal and that Altru has been behind Dim Suns activities. Realizing that the tower will become operational within hours (i.e. during the towers opening ceremony), the Ranger Union orders all of its rangers to attack the tower. Equipped with a specialized styler designed to overcome the Gigaremos influence, the player succeeds in deactivating the towers force fields and rescues the yellow gem, allowing the other rangers to launch an airborne assault on the Shadow Crystal at the towers top. However, the tower reaches operational capacity before the rangers can reach the Shadow Crystal. Altru Inc.s president, Blake Hall, takes the chance to destroy the rangers only hope of disabling the tower (the three colored gems) by charging the crystal to its maximum power level and summoning his strongest Pokmon, Darkrai. Darkrai instead goes insane from the intense power overload, attacks Blake, and darkens the area, preventing the rangers from approaching the Shadow Crystal. By empowering his/her styler with the gems, the player stops Darkrais rage, allowing the other rangers to disable the tower by converting the Shadow Crystal into a Luminous Crystal which undoes the mental torture inflicted on Almias Pokmon. In the end, peace returns to Almia and its inhabitants, and the characters enjoy a concert originally planned for Altru Inc. (ironically played by the Go-Rock Quads from the original Pokmon Ranger) while the player returns home to his family. The game ends showing Darkrai circling the Luminous Crystal, signifying the return of peace.Partner PokmonReceptionShadows of Almia has received mostly mixed reviews, with a score of 68 on Metacritic.  Gamespot gave the title a 7.5 out of 10 rating.  Stating that Pokemon Ranger: Shadows of Almia improves upon its predecessor just enough to make it a fun, solid addition to the spin-off series..  Eurogamer gave Shadows of Almia a 6 out of 10 rating.  Stating that With a long wait until the next proper Pokmon game, many fans may feel thats enough, but they shouldnt expect anything more than a mild distraction.  1UP gave the title a C+ rating.  Stating that While its nowhere near as addictive as the regular color-coded Pokmon games, Almias still a decent diversion -- I just wish the story offered something a little deeper. .  IGN gave the title a rating of 6.7 out of 10.  Stating that Unless youre addicted to scribbling circles like that creepy boy from The Ring, or youre some sort of hippie that only likes playing humane non-battling Pokemon games, you could probably pass on this and be just fine..  As of July 9, 2008, the game has sold 576,467 copies in Japan, according to Famitsu.(Weekly Famitsu, issue 1020)() It is also the 13th best-selling game of Japan in 2008.() It was the sixth best-selling game of December 2008 in the United States.()See also*Ranger*Ranger: Guardian Signs References External links* Official SiteRanger: Sombras de AlmiaRanger : Nuit sur AlmiaRanger: Ombre su AlmiaRanger: Shadows of AlmiaRanger: Shadows of AlmiaRanger: Shadows of Almia
15158612
Lulu_Town
Lulu Town is a now uninhabited, former settlement on Island, claimed by both the States and neighbouring Haiti, in the Caribbean. Navassa Island was claimed for the United States on September 19, 1857, by Duncan, an American sea captain, under the Guano Islands Act of August 18, 1856.  The modest settlement was created to house both mine workers and supervisors whose goal was the rich deposits of guano found on Navassa.  This resource, gathered mainly from the interior of the island, was stored in Lulu town for later shipment to the United States. Mining operations on Navassa Island were halted in approximately 1900, and the settlement is now uninhabited.Bay is nearby topographical feature of a sufficiently rugged nature to prevent the landing of boats; such small boats as regularly ply the area are mainly fishing boats from nearby Haiti.External links*CIA Factbook: https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/bq.htmlTownsr:
15177541
Shrinkage_Stope_mining
#REDIRECT (mining method) 
15189189
Moolort,_Victoria
Moolort is situated in central Victoria approximately half way between the major rural cities of Ballarat and Bendigo. It can be found at . The Universal Grid Reference for this area is 7623-1-1 Cairn Curran. Industry The main industry is currently agriculture with sheep and crop farming being the most prevalent although over the last 15 years some smaller farms have started growing grapes for wine and conifers for Christmas trees. In the past however, Moolort was a large mining area which at one point had rivalled other local mining towns in the area for population. There is one mine on the outskirts of Moolort that currently mines vivianite and siderite. Goldfields Due to a mistake with calculations the first shaft of the Moolort mines was sunk approximately 6,000ft (1,846m) to the west of the main lead, this meant that the miners had to dig across to the lead while underground after already having dug down to 284ft (87m), until a new shaft was sunk. This new shaft was at Keystone and allowed the mines to extract material closer to its source. Unfortunately the heads of the mining companies did not believe that colonial workmanship was up to the task of constructing the equipment that was needed, especially the water pumps. The pumps were needed to clear water from the mines as a water basin is under a large part of the Moolort plains, at the height of operations the mines were pumping out 20,000,000 gallons (91 megalitres) of water everyday. This led them to buy the equipment from London in England as well as from the States at a price of 500,000 at a time when gold was selling for about 2 per ounce. It was this excessive capitalisation that ultimately led to the downfall of the Moolort mines as even though the mines were quite rich they were never able to pay dividends. The mines around Moolort were significant because they were the first deep lead mines in the Mining Division and among the first to use electrical power. According to Bannear (1993), many of Moolorts mines hold cultural significance due to the difficulties experienced in running deep lead mines as well as the various means used to extract water from the mines to keep them dry and relatively safe.Most of the gold mines were closed by 1906 with the last of the equipment and property being sold off by 1916. The tailings were sold to the State Rivers Board for use as road base. Between 1905 and 1925 Moolorts population shrunk quite quickly. A town that once had twenty-eight pubs and three post offices became little more than a village that could no longer even field a football team. In the next fifty years even the state school, general store and the last post office were closed with locals having to travel twelve kilometers (7.5 miles) to Carisbrook or sixteen (10 miles) to Newstead for their needs. Topography Most of Moolort consists of basaltic soil laid down by the eruption of Bald Hill approximately 10,000 years ago. Most of Moolort consists of low rolling plains although there are at least three unnamed hills. At the southern end of Moolort Long Swamp is the only major wetlands. Towards the east, the Cairn Curran reservoir was formed between the basalt of Moolort and the granite formations of the Newstead area. References *Bannear, D.; Historic Mining Sites in the Maldon Mining Division: Part Two: Site Gazetteer, (1993), Retrieved 28 September 2007
15204670
Carl_Frstenberg
Carl Frstenberg (August 28, 1850 &ndash; February 9, 1933) was one of the most prominent German bankers of the late nineteenth and early twenteeth century, and was responsible for the revival of the German mining industry during his era.()Frstenberg was born to Jewish parents  in Danzig (Gdask). While working at a Prussian textile mill throughout his childhood, he apprenticed under local banker R. Damme. At the age of seventeen, he moved to Berlin.At first, Frstenberg worked for the textile company of Simon (Simon Bros.). Two years later, he became an employee at the Disconto-Gesellschaft, one of the leading German joint-stock banks. In 1871, he defected to aristocrat von Bleichrders well-known S. Bleichrder Bank, working in the firm as a dpartemental manager. In 1883, he became first director of the joint-stock bank Handels-Gesellschaft (B. G.-H.) and dominated it during the next decades in a way, that the bank was often regarded as Frstenbergs bank. In 1884 he was accepted into the der Freunde society. Under Frstenberg, the B. G.-H. became the house bank of Rathenaus AEG. 1902, Frstenberg made Emil Rathenaus son, Rathenau a co-director of the B. G.-H. which he remained until 1907. References * Frstenberg, Carl: Die Lebensgeschichte eines deutschen Bankiers 1870-1914, ed. by Frstenberg; Berlin: Ullstein 1931.*Frstenberg
15216334
Gravesend_Handicap
The Gravesend Handicap is an American horse race run at Racetrack in New York late in the year.  In its 50th running in December 2009, the Gravesend will be downgraded from a Grade III event to ungraded status.(Six New Grade I Races for 2009 - bloodhorse.com)  This race is for three-year-olds and up and set at a distance of six furlongs.  It offers a purse of $100,000 added.The Gravesend is named in honor of the early American racetrack once sited near Island, Brooklyn.  The Race Track was closed in 1910. Prior to 1961, the Gravesend was run at Racetrack, and once, in 1975, at Park.  In 1962, it was set at seven furlongs.Past winners* 2009 - Digger (Napravnik)* 2008 - Fabulous Strike (5) (Dominguez)* 2007 - City Attraction (Luzzi)* 2006 - Bishop Court Hill (John Velazquez)* 2005 - Banjo Picker (5)  (Tara Hemmings)* 2004 - Don Six (4) (Mike Luzzi)* 2003 - Shake You Down (5) (Mike Luzzi)* 2002 - Multiple Choice (4) (Victor Carrero)* 2001 - Heres Zealous (4) (Prado)* 2000 - Florida Sandy (6) (Joe Bravo)* 1999 - Cowboy Cop (5) (Gryder)* 1998 - Florida Sandy (4) (Bridgmohan)* 1997 - Royal Haven (5) (Migliore), in a dead heat with* 1997 - Stalwart Member (4) (Gryder)* 1996 - Victor Avenue (3) (F. Chavez)* 1995 - Cold Execution (4) (Julio Pezua)* 1994 - Mining Burrah (4) (John Velazquez)* 1993 - Astudillo (3) (Fabio Arguello, Jr.)* 1992 - Hidden Tomahawk (4) (Jorge F. Chavez)* 1991 - Shuttleman (5) (Cordero, Jr.)* 1990 - Mr. Nasty (3) (D. Bailey)* 1989 - Never Forgotten (5) (Madrid, Jr.)* 1988 - High Brite (4) (Angel Cordero, Jr.)* 1987 - Vinnie The Viper (4) (Krone)* 1986 - Comic Blush (3) (Antonio Graell)* 1985 - Love That Mac (3) (Velasquez)* 1984 - Elegant Life (4) (Jorge Velasquez)* 1983 - Main Stem (5) (Victor Lopez)* 1982 - Chan Balum (3) (Samyn)* 1981 - Lines Of Power (4) (MacBeth)* 1980 - Clever Trick (4) (Jorge Velasquez)* 1979 - Shelter Half (4) (Sam Boulmetis, Jr.)* 1978 - Half High (5) (Angel Santiago)* 1977 - Full Out (4) (Angel Cordero, Jr.)* 1976 - Christopher R. (5) (J. Passmore)* 1975 - Miss (5) (Vasquez)* 1974 - Prospector (4) (Jacinto Vasquez)* 1973 - Petrograd (4) (Angel Cordero, Jr.)* 1972 - Silver Mallet (4) (Baeza)* 1971 - Summer Air (4) (Angel Cordero Jr.)* 1970 - Distinctive (4) (Blum)* 1969 - Royal Exchange (4) (Angel Cordero, Jr.)* 1968 - Jim J. (4) (Angel Cordero, Jr.)* 1967 - Tumiga (3) (Ben Feliciano)* 1966 - Winnie (4) (Belmonte)* 1965 - Determined Man (4) (Venezia)* 1964 - Delta Judge (4) (R. Pierce)* 1963 - Ahoy (3) (Howard Grant)* 1962 - Ruler (4) (Sellers)* 1961 - Bolinas Boy (3) (L. Rotz)* 1960 - Brush Fire (3) (Ussery)* 1959 - Silver Ship (4) (Arcaro)ReferencesExternal links*Aqueduct Racetrack official
15239165
Missouri_S&T_Miners
pagename          sports.mst.eduThe Missouri S&T Miners athletics programs include the extramural and intramural sports teams of University of Science and Technology, located in Rolla. The name comes from the Universitys history as a mining school.  Missouri S&T is a part of the of Missouri System.  The womens teams are referred to as the Lady Miners. Missouri S&T is a member of the Lakes Valley Conference for most sports, the Lakes Football Conference for football, and the New South Intercollegiate Swimming Conference for swimming.*Mens sports**Baseball**Basketball**Cross country**Football**Soccer**Swimming**and field*Womens sports**Basketball**Cross country**Soccer**Softball**and field**VolleyballMens SwimmingSummary*Coach: Doug Grooms*National Finishes: 19982011:*19981999: 7th:*19992000: 6th:*20002001: 5th:*20012002: 5th:*20022003: 13th:*20032004: 9th:*20042005: 6th:*20052006: 7th:*20062007: 4th:*20072008: 2nd:*20082009: 3rd:*2009-2010: 8th:*2010-2011: 9th*Conference Championships: 19982011:*19981999: Mideast Regional Champions:*20002001: Central States Champions:*20062007: New South Champions:*20072008: New South Champions:*20082009: New South Champions:*2009-2010: New South Champions:*2010-2011: New South ChampionsFootballAffiliations::Lakes Valley Conference 2012:Lakes Football Conference 20062011:Intercollegiate Athletic Association 19352005Coach: BrownHome field: StadiumUniform colors: Black and Gold (Inception2007), Green and Gold (2008present)Logo design: A PickaxeConference Championships: 9:*MIAA: 1941 (Co-Champions); 1947; 1949; 1950; 1956 (Co-Champions); 1977 (Co-Champions); 1980; 1983 (Co-Champions):*GLFC: 2008 ()All-Time Record: ???????? (.???; thru 2007)All-Americans*Kromka: 1941*Winfield: 1969*Dillow: 1974*Grantham: 1980*Listerud: 1993*Drussa: 200304*Gronewold: 200506*Winters: 2006Year by Year Record Since 1893Total ???????? (.??? from 1893)Mens BasketballSummaryThe team made the GLVC tournament in 2010 for the first time since joining the conference. The coaches are in the process of making the team competitive in the toughest Division II conference in the nation. *Coach: Jim Glash*Assistant Coach: Joey Goodson*Conference Championships:*MIAA: 197576, 199596All-Americans*Gibson: 198485*Huddleston: 198788*Jolly: 199293*McClain: 199596BaseballSummaryThe baseball team won the GLVC West division title in 2011.Affiliations::Lakes Valley Conference: 2006present:Intercollegiate Athletic Association: Inception2005Head Coach: Todd DeGraffenreidHome Field: Missouri S&T Baseball FieldUniform Colors: Black and Gold (Inception2007), Green and Gold (2008present)MIAA Titles: 1968, 1972GLVC Titles: 2011 (West)Mens Cross CountrySummary*Coach: Sterling Martin*Conference Championships:*MIAA: 1958All-Americans*Mulvaney: 199697Mens Track & FieldSummary*Coach: Sterling Martin*Assistant Coach: Kyle Lady Killer Rutledge*Conference Championships - Indoor:*MIAA: 1948:*GLVC: 2008All-AmericansVolleyballAffiliations::Lakes Valley Conference: 2007presentCoach: Jason HoltHome Court: Gale Bullman Multi-Purpose CenterUniform colors: Black and Gold (2007), Green and Gold (2008 - Present)Womens BasketballSummaryThe team shared the GLVC West division regular season title in 2011. They made the Womens NCAA Division II Midwest Regional as a 6th Seed. This was the second time the team made the National Tournament in four years.*Coach: Alan Eads*Assistant Coach: Keri Hessel*Assistant Coach: Todd Rehemert*Conference ChampionshipsSoftballSummaryAffiliations::Lakes Valley Conference: 2006-present:Intercollegiate Athletic Association: Inception-2005Head Coach: Don KennedyAssistant Coach: Chad SchatzHome Field: Missouri S&T Softball FieldReferences
15270086
Affinity_analysis
Affinity analysis is a analysis and mining technique that discovers co-occurrence relationships among activities performed by (or recorded about) specific individuals or groups. In general, this can be applied to any process where agents can be uniquely identified and information about their activities can be recorded. In retail, affinity analysis is used to perform market basket analysis, in which retailers seek to understand the purchase behavior of customers. This information can then be used for purposes of cross-selling and up-selling, in addition to influencing promotions, loyalty programs, store design, and discount plans.()Examples* Market basket analysis might tell a retailer that customers often purchase shampoo and conditioner together, so putting both items on promotion at the same time would not create a significant increase in profit, while a promotion involving just one of the items would likely drive sales of the other.* Market basket analysis can be used to divide customers into groups. A company could look at what other items people purchase along with eggs, and classify them as baking a cake (if theyre buying eggs along with flour and sugar) or making omelets (if theyre buying eggs along with bacon and cheese). This identification could then be used to drive other  programs.Business UseBusiness use of market basket analysis has significantly increased since the introduction of electronic of sale(. Amazon uses affinity analysis for cross-selling when it recommends products to people based on their purchase history and the purchase history of other people who bought the same item. Dollar plans to use market basket analysis to help maintain sales growth while moving towards stocking more low-margin consumable goods(). A common legend highlighting the unexpected insights that can be found involves a chain (often incorrectly given as Wal-Mart) discovering that beer and diapers were often purchased together, and responding to that by moving the beer closer to the diapers to drive sales; however, while the relationship seems to have been noted, it is unclear whether any action was taken to promote selling them together().See Alsorule learningReferencesFurther reading* J. Han et al., 2006, Data Mining: Concepts and Techniques ISBN 978-1-55860-901-3* V. Kumar et al. 2005 Introduction to Data Mining ISBN 978-0-321-32136-7* U. Fayyad et al. 1996 Advances in Knowledge Discovery and Data Mining ISBN 978-0-262-56097-9External links* Examples of basic Market Basket Analysis using Excel* An overview of Market Basket Analysisde:Warenkorbanalysede afinidadbasket analysisja:koszykowa
15290837
Sensor_grid
A Sensor Grid integrates wireless sensor networks with grid infrastructures to enable real-time sensor data collection and the sharing of computational and storage resources for sensor data processing and management. It is an enabling technology for building large-scale infrastructures, integrating heterogeneous sensor, data and computational resources deployed over a wide area, to undertake complicated surveillance tasks such as environmental monitoring.The Sensor Grid enables the collection, processing, sharing, and visualization, archival and searching of large amounts of sensor data. There are several rationales for a SensorGrid. First, the vast amount of data collected by the sensors can be processed, analyzed, and stored using the computational and data storage resources of the grid. Second, the sensors can be efficiently shared by different users and applications under flexible usage scenarios. Each user can access a subset of the sensors during a particular time period to run a specific application, and to collect the desired type of sensor data. Third, as sensor devices with embedded processors become more computationally powerful, it is more efficient to offload specialized tasks such as image and signal on the sensor devices. Finally, a sensor grid provides seamless access to a wide variety of resources in a pervasive manner. Advanced techniques in artificial intelligence, data fusion, data mining, and distributed database processing can be applied to make sense of the sensor data and generate new knowledge of the environment. The results can in turn be used to optimize the operation of the sensors, or influence the operation of actuators to change the environment. Thus, sensor grids are well suited for adaptive and computing applications.Figure 1 shows a typical Sensor Grid design architecture.A Sensor Grid based architecture has many applications such as environmental and habitat monitoring, healthcare monitoring of patients, weather monitoring and forecasting, military and homeland security surveillance, tracking of goods and manufacturing processes, safety monitoring of physical structures and construction sites, smart homes and offices, and many other uses that we do not yet imagine.For Sensor Grid architectures, designs and applications, see the following:1 H.B. Lim, et al. Sensor Grid: Integration of Wireless Sensor Networks and the Grid, In Proc. of the IEEE Conference on Local Computer Networks 30th Anniversary (LCN05), October 2005.2 Hingne, V.; Joshi, A.; Houstis, E.; Michopoulos, J. On the Grid and Sensor Networks. In Proc. Of International Workshop on Grid Computing. pages 166-173. Nov. 20033 Crisisgrid (2007):  http://www.crisisgrid.org4 M. Gaynor, et al. Integrating wireless sensor networks with the grid. IEEE Internet Computing, pages 3239, Jul/Aug 2004.5 H. B. Lim, K. V. Ling, W. Wang, Y. Yao, M. Iqbal, B. Li, X. Yin, and T. Sharma, The National Weather Sensor Grid, Proc. of the 5th ACM Conference on Embedded Networked Sensor Systems (SenSys 2007), Nov 2007.6 The National Weather Sensor Grid: http://nwsp.ntu.edu.sg
15305079
Southern_Rhodesian_Legislative_Council
The Southern Rhodesian Legislative Council was the inaugural governing body for the British territory of Rhodesia (now Zimbabwe) before its replacement by the Rhodesian Legislative Assembly in 1923.The Council was established on 20 October 1898 and the first election for the Council were held on 17 April 1899(Willson, F. (1963) Source Book of Parliamentary Elections and Referenda in Southern Rhodesia 1898-1962, Department of Government, University College of Rhodesia and Nyasaland, Salisbury.). The Council sat for the first time in May 1899. Initially, the Council consisted of four elected members and five members nominated by the South Africa Company (BSAC), with the BSAC administrator presiding (and who also held the right of veto over any legislation)(Berens, D. (1988) A Concise Encyclopedia of Zimbabwe, Mambo Press, Gweru.). Additionally, a British resident commissionaer also sat on the Council as a non-voting member(Kent Rasmussen, R. & Rubert, S. (1990) Historical Dictionary of Zimbabwe, The Scarecrow Press, London.).Qualifications for members and franchise were set by the commissioner, who required voters to be British subjects, male, 21 years of age and older, able to write their address and occupation, and then to fulfil the following financial requirements: (a) ownership of a registered mining claim in Southern Rhodesia, or (b) occupying immovable property worth 75, or (c) receiving wages or salary of 50 per annum in Southern Rhodesia. Six months continuous residence was also required for qualifications b and c. All voters were entered onto a common roll.Due to continuing pressure by white settlers for a greater role in the administration of the colony, the number of elected representatives on the Council was gradually increased, so that by 1920 there were 13 elected members(.  The main issue debated in the Legislative Council by the 1910s was the future of Southern Rhodesia following the planned end of BSAC rule.( When responsible government was granted to Southern Rhodesia in 1923, the Legislative Council was replaced by the Legislative Assembly.(References
15322302
Gold_mining_in_Alaska
Gold mining in Alaska, a state of the States, has been a major industry and impetus for exploration and settlement since a few years after the United States acquired the territory from Russia.  Russian explorers discovered placer gold in the River in 1848, but no gold was produced.  Gold mining started in 1870 from placers southeast of Alaska.(A.H. Koschman and M.H. Bergendahl (1968) Principal Gold-Producing Districts of the United States, U.S. Geological Survey, Professional Paper 610, p.8.)Gold is found and has been mined throughout Alaska; except in the vast swamps of the Yukon Flats, and along the North Slope between the Range and the Sea. Areas near Fairbanks, Juneau, and Nome are responsible for most of Alaskas historical and current gold production. Nearly all of the large and many of the small placer gold mines currently operating in the US are in Alaska.(http://minerals.usgs.gov/minerals/pubs/commodity/gold/gold_mcs07.pdf) Six modern large-scale hard rock mines operate in Alaska in 2008; four of those are gold-producing mines (an additional gold mine suspended production in late 2007). There are also some small-scale hard rock gold-mining operations. Alaska currently produces more gold (in 2007: 673,274 troy oz from lode mines, and 53,848 troy oz from placer deposits) than any state except Nevada.(http://www.nma.org/pdf/g_production.pdf) In 2007, gold accounted for 15% of the mining wealth produced in Alaska. Zinc and lead, mainly from the Dog mine, accounted for 73%; silver, mainly from the Greens Creek mine, accounted for 8%; coal and aggregates accounted for nearly 2% each. Alaska produced a total of 40.3 million troy ounces of gold from 1880 through the end of 2007.(http://www.dggs.dnr.state.ak.us/webpubs/dggs/ic/text/ic057.PDF)(http://Alaskas Mineral Industry 2006, Zumigal and Hughes, DGGS Special Report 61www.dggs.dnr.state.ak.us/webpubs/dggs/sr/text/sr061.PDF)Active minesThe following are active gold-producing mines and advanced lode exploration or development projects.Placer minesmining continues throughout Alaska. In 2007, an estimated 175 placer mines produced 53,848 ounces of gold, an approximately 15% drop in activity and production compared to 2006.( All of these operations are seasonal, none employ more than a few dozen people. Many of them are family operations with roots reaching back several generations. One mine, at Nolan Creek, mines frozen gravels by underground methods. A significant portion of current exploration for lode gold in Alaska occurs in placer gold camps.Lode (hard rock) minesLarge-scale hard rock mines producing gold* The Creek mine, owned and operated by Mining, located on private patented claims and on federal land in the mining district, is primarily a silver-lead-zinc mine, produced 73,000 troy ounces (2.3 tonnes) of gold in 2006 and a similar amount in 2007.(D. J. Szumigala, Alaska, Mining Engineering, May 2007, p.66.)* Fort Knox mine, owned and operated by Gold on State of Alaska-owned land in the mining district, produced 333,000 troy ounces (10.3 tonnes) of gold in 2006 and a similar amount in 2007.* Pogo mine, owned and operated by Cominco, on State of Alaska-owned land in the Goodpaster district, produced 260,000 troy ounces (8.1 tonnes) of gold in 2007, more than double production in 2006.(* Kensington and Jualin; production re-commenced at the long-closed adjacent historical underground gold-in-quartz-veins mines in the mining district in June, 2010. Over $270 million of exploration and construction efforts from 2005 onward, and significant legal battles concerning disposal of mine tailings onto public land led to renewed production. Over 2 million troy ounces of gold resource in 8.8 million tons of ore are reported.((http://www.kensingtongold.com/)Large-scale hard rock gold mines under development (construction)* Rock Creek mine, owned and operated by Resources, on privately owned land in the mining district. Constructed in 2007 and 2008, the mine began producing gold in September 2008, but ceased production almost immediately due to difficulties processing the ore and water-management issues. It is now on care and maintenance pending significant modifications to the mill, which has design flaws.(http://www.novagold.com/section.asp?pageid9918)Advanced gold-bearing hard rock exploration projects of note* Donlin Creek, in the Kuskokwim Gold Belt, contains an estimated 29.3 million ounces of Proven and Probable gold reserves (calculated at a gold price of $750) and an additional 10 million ounces of gold resource. Donlin is one of the largest known undeveloped gold deposits in the world. If developed according to plans published in spring 2009 it will be one of the largest gold mines in the world. Applications for permits will begin in 2009 and construction could begin as early as 2012(http://www.novagold.com/section.asp?pageid11071) A large and robust series of felsic sills and dikes hosts the gold in association with small-scale quartz (and lesser quartz and/or carbonate) veinlets. The sills intrude a thick sequence (5000+ feet) of non-metamorphosed, folded, graywacke, sandstone, and shale. The deposit occurs on private land owned by native corporations Corporation and The Kuskokwim Corp. Donlin Creek LLC, equally-owned by Gold and Resources, holds a lease on the land and operates the project. * Pebble Copper, discovered in the mid-1980s, is one of the largest known copper-gold porphyry deposits in the world. It is located on State of Alaska-owned land. The deposit contains measured+indicated+inferred resources of 72-billion pounds of copper, 94-million ounces of gold, and 4.8-billion pounds of molybdenum, within 9.1 billion tonnes of ore. Tens of million of dollars are spent annually on the project, an initial mining plan is expected in 2009, with permitting scheduled for 2010.(http://www.northerndynastyminerals.com/ndm/NewsReleases.asp?ReportID336854&_TypeNews-Releases&_TitleResource-Estimate-Confirms-Pebble-As-One-Of-The-Worlds-Most-Important-Coppe...)(http://www.northerndynastyminerals.com/ndm/NewsReleases.asp?ReportID342004&_TypeNews-Releases&_TitleUS-59-Million-Work-Program-To-Prepare-Pebble-Project-For-Permitting)*Nixon Fork mine in the McGrath Mining District. First exploited in 1907, this underground operation exploits high-grade gold skarn ore bodies along contacts between Cretaceous granitoid and metamorphosed Paleozoic sediments. The mine, after decades of inactivity, returned to production for several years in the mid-1990s, and again in 2006 and 2007, when a significant variation between actual and predicted headgrades occurred. An updated resource evaluation is pending further work.* The Niblack prospect, a zinc-copper-silver-gold VMS deposit on southeastern of Wales Island, in the Ketchikan Mining District. Ore occurs as massive sulfide bodies hosted in a local rhyolite belt within a package of deeply deformed and metamorphosed volcanic and sedimentary rocks. In the last ten years, significant underground and surface exploration occurred at this early-1900s minesite. A recent estimate reports a near surface indicated resource of 4073 kg of gold, 59,424 kg of silver, 14,810 metric tons of copper, and 30,474 metric tons of zinc contained in 1,424,000 metric tons of ore; and deeper inferred resources of 3,919 kg of gold, 55,295 kg of silver, 31,235 metric tons of copper, and 106,192 metric tons of zinc within 1,893,000 metric tons of ore.(http://www.marketwire.com/press-release/Niblack-Mining-Corp-TSX-VENTURE-NIB-898341.html) Further exploration is planned.*Dozens of other significant exploration efforts for gold, across the state, contributed to the total of over $310 million dollars spent on mineral exploration in Alaska in 2007.Historical lode and placer gold minesSoutheast AlaskaPorcupine districtOver 81,000 ounces of placer gold came from the Porcupine district near Haines. Porcupine Creek, about  north of Haines, is the site of a 1898 gold discovery; the creek has been intermittently placer mined ever since. Outside of the Porcupine basin only a few other creeks - Glacier, Nugget and Cottonwood - produced significant gold. The area around Reid Inlet, in modern Bay National Park and Preserve, hosted several hard rock gold prospects, including the LeRoy mine, which exploited quartz veins for about 10,000 ounces of gold production. The district, which includes Skagway and Haines, is bordered to the north and east by Canada. To the west is the Pacific Ocean and the Chichagof District lies to the south. The Channel series Rush Alaska takes place in this region.Juneau districtIn 1880 a local inhabitant, Chief Kowee, revealed to prospectors Joe Juneau and Richard Harris the presence of gold in what is now named Gold Creek in Silver Bow Basin. The city of Juneau was founded there that year.  The strike sparked the Juneau gold rush which resulted in the development of many placer and lode mines including the largest, in their time, gold mines in the world: the Treadwell complex of lode mines on Douglas Island (across a narrow sea channel from Juneau) and the AJ lode mine, in Juneau itself.Over 7 million ounces of lode gold and 80,000 ounces of placer gold have been recovered from the Juneau district.Admiralty districtMost of the gold recovered from the Admiralty mining district (which consists of Admiralty Island) is a by product of silver and base metal mining. The Alaska Empire underground lode mine recovered gold from quartz veins in rocks. Discovered and staked in the 1920s, production of about 20,000 tonnes of 0.25 ounce-per-ton gold ore occurred in the mid-1930s. The Funter Bay underground lode mine produced about 500 thousand tonnes of copper-nickel-cobalt ore, without gold, from a Mesozoic gabbro-norite pipe. No significant placer mining was done on Admiralty. About 500,000 ounces of gold, almost all from the currently-operating Greens Creek lode silver mine, have been recovered from the Admiralty district.Chichagof districtApproximately 800,000 ounces of gold have come from the Chichagof district. Chichagof, Yakobi, Baranof and smaller islands comprise the  district.(Alaskas Mineral Industry 2006, Alaska DGGS Special Report 61, 2006)Numerous lode and placer prospects and mines exist in the district. Major production came from underground lode mines exploiting gold-in-quartz veins.Apex-El Nido mineThe Apex-El Nido produced perhaps 50,000 ounces of gold from a mile of underground workings exploiting polymetallic quartz veins.(http://ardf.wr.usgs.gov/ardf_data/Sitka.pdf)Hirst-Chichagof mineFrom 1922 to 1933 the Hirst-Chichagof produced 133,000 ounces of gold and 33,000 ounces of silver from polymetallic quartz veins assaying nearly 1 ounce of gold per ton. There are over a mile of underground workings, reaching  below the surface. Significant reserves remain, which have attracted exploration efforts in the 1980s and 1990s.(Chichagof mineThe Chichagof mine opened in 1905 and by 1942 had yielded 660,000 ounces of gold and 195,000 ounces of silver from quartz veins assaying over 1 oz gold per ton. There were several miles of workings on 5 levels. Six shafts reached a maximum of  below sea level.Between 1981 and 1988 several thousand feet of new workings were dug, and engineering and environmental studies were done, but the project was abandoned.(Petersburg-Sumdum district15,000 ounces of gold from placers, came from the Petersburg-Sumdum district which consists of; Zarembo, Etolin, and Islands, and the mainland between the Juneau and Ketchikan districts. Many small lode deposits were located in the late 1890s and early 1900s. The most significant  lode producer was the Sumdum Chief, which was discovered in 1889 and operated until exhausted in 1903. 24,000 ounces of gold were extracted from two quartz veins averaging ore of about 0.39 ounces per ton of both gold and silver. The mine reached a depth of  and had a ten-stamp mill. In Windham Bay, a cluster of mineral claim holdings were consolidated in the 1920s; the Jensen mine was the most productive of these, producing about 50 ounces of gold. Several aerial tramways, thousands of feet long, connected various adits and mills.(http://ardf.wr.usgs.gov/ardf_data/Sumdum.pdf)Ketchikan districtApproximately 58,000 ounces of lode gold and 4000 ounces of placer gold have come from the Ketchikan district, consisting of Dall, Prince of Wales, Revillagigedo, and smaller islands, as well some mainland, in the southernmost-part of Alaska.(Numerous historical lode mines and prospects for base metals, uranium, rare earth elements (REEs), iron, and platinum group elements (PGEs), as well as gold exist in the Ketchikan district. Major gold production came from underground lode mines exploiting: gold-bearing quartz veins in metamorphic rocks (such as the Gold Standard, Sea Level, Dawson, Golden Fleece, and Goldstream mines); skarns (at the Jumbo and Kassan Peninsula copper-gold mines); zoned mafic-ultramafic plutons, as at the Salt Chuck silver-gold-copper-PGE mine; and VMS deposits such as Niblack.A high-yielding mine in Ketchikan District is the Golden Fleece Mine, located about 0.2 mile north of the north end of James Lake on Prince of Wales Island, latitude: 55.152179, longitude: -132.056635. The mine was most active from 1901 to 1905.(Bufvers, John: History of mines and prospects, Ketchikan district, prior to 1952: Alaska Division of Mines and Minerals Special Report 1, 1967, 32 p. Online: http://www.dggs.dnr.state.ak.us/webpubs/dggs/sr/text/sr001.PDF)(Maas, K. M., Bittenbender, P. E., and Still, J. C.: Mineral investigations in the Ketchikan mining district, southeastern Alaska: U.S. Bureau of Mines Open-File Report 11-95, 1995, 606 p.)(Maas, K. M., Still, J. C., and Bittenbender, P. E.: Mineral investigations in the Ketchikan mining district, Alaska, 1991 - Prince of Wales Island and vicinity: U.S. Bureau of Mines Open-File Report 81-92, 1992, 69 p.)(Maas, K.M., Still, J. C., Clough, A. H., and Oliver, L. K.: Mineral investigations in the Ketchikan mining district, Alaska, 1990: Southern Prince of Wales Island and vicinity - Preliminary sample location maps and descriptions: U.S. Bureau of Mines Open-File Report 33-91, 1991, 139 p.)(Roppel, Patricia: Striking it rich! Gold mining in southern Southeastern Alaska: Greenwich, Connecticut, Coachlamp Productions, 2005, 286 p.)Interior Alaska, north of the Yukon RiverChandalar DistrictThe Chandalar district is the area around the upper drainage of the River, includes some southern foothills of the Range, and extends to the crest of the Brooks Range. Discovery of placer gold in 1906 was quickly followed by lode discoveries. Most of the placer-producing creeks drain the area of lode mineralization.(http://uaf-db.uaf.edu/Jukebox/haul_road_07/assets/docs/sw_wiseman_study.pdf University of Alaska, Fairbanks: The Wiseman Historican District) The district produced about 48,000 ounces of placer gold and 17,000 ounces of lode gold.Little Squaw CreekLittle Squaw Creek drains an area cut by many auriferous veins. Some of the placers in the basin are exceptionally rich. By 1916 most of the shallow placers were playing out so miners shifted their interest to the placer drift mines (underground operations). The most notable of these is the Little Squaw Bench, including the Mellow Bench. Approximately 29,000 ounces of gold were recovered averaging 1.0 oz/cubic yard of gold in the gravels with spikes of up to 4.6 oz/cubic yard. Some individual nuggets were over 10 ounces.(Alaska Resource Data Files, Chandalar quad, USGS Open file report 00-357http://ardf.wr.usgs.gov/ardf_data/Chandalar.pdf)  In 2010, gold production resumed with mining of the placer deposits by the Gold Rich Mining Company.Little Squaw and Mikado lodesIn 1909 to 1915 development and underground gold mining occurred at the Little Squaw, with a few hundred feet of workings built and a few dozen ounces of gold recovered. The nearby Mikado mine enjoyed similar efforts around 1913. In the 1960s , 1970s and 1980s additional work was done. These later efforts probably recovered more than 10,000 ounces of gold.(Significant efforts resumed in 2006, and are ongoing, to explore the Little Squaw placer and lode deposits.(Little Squaw Gold Mining Company - Chandalar)Koyukuk-Nolan districtThe district encompasses the upper River basin including the Alatna and Kanuti rivers and the village of Bettles. The district extends from the southern flank of the Brooks Range to the northern Mountains, and is directly west of the Chandalar district. Much of the district is now in of the Arctic National Park. Gold was discovered in placer deposits in the district in 1901. About 350,000 ounces of placer gold have been won from the area, perhaps 85% of it from near Wiseman. Mining continues today in the district.Much of the district is underlain by bedded Paleozoic rocks, a schist belt extends along the southern foothills of the Brooks Range. Cretaceous plutons intrude metamorphic rocks in the southern part of the district. Pleistocene ice sheets from the Brooks Range and cirque glaciers in the Ray Mountains covered much of the higher elevations. Glaciers are now restricted to the highest cirques of the Brooks Range.(Placer Deposits of Alaska, USGS Bulletin 1374)Nolan CreekMiners produced 135,000 ounces of gold from Nolan Creek between 1904 and 1999. Some of the placer gold is mined by underground methods in frozen gravels. A 42-troy ounce nugget, Alaskas twentieth-largest, came from Marys Bench on Nolan Creek. Placer mining activity continues, with a reserve of 114,760 ounces of gold reported in 2000.Hammond RiverMining occurred on the Hammond River, a tributary of the Koyukuk River, from about 1900 to at least 2000. Exact production is unknown, it is estimated at about 80,000 ounces.A rich, deep channel was struck beneath the Hammond River in 1912, and during the following 4 years, over 48,000 oz gold were produced, including a 138.8-oz nugget.  (Pringel, 1921; T.K. Bundtzen, written communication, 1999) Much of the gold was coarse: the third (146 troy oz.), fourth (139 troy oz.), 14th (61 troy ounces), and 17th (55 troy ounces) largest gold nuggets in Alaska were found on the Hammond River between Discovery claim and Vermont Creek a distance of 4 miles. Only the richest ground was possible to mine as the Hammond River was one of the most remote placer districts in North America until 1975 when the Dalton Highway for the Alaskan Pipeline project was completed.Historically the Hammond River is one of the largest gold producers in the Koyukuk district. Gold was discovered on the Hammond River, just above the lower canyon mouth, about 2 miles upstream from the Koyukuk River. In the early years, attempts were made to mine the modern stream gravels. At the mouth of  Swift Creek a wing dam was built to divert the river for mining, but numerous cobbles and small boulders made the venture unprofitable. Approximately 500 ounces was recovered with pick and shovels in Summer of 1902. Later, shafts sunk 66 feet to bedrock at the discovery site were reported to show the presence of gold in paying quantities. The majority of the gold production on the Hammond came out of the deep channel as early miners were unable to deal with the water and cobbles in the present river channel.The Hammond River contains deep channel, bench, and modern stream placers. Much of the Hammond River gold is of the coarse nugget variety. Several nuggets weighing from 45 to 59 oz were found in the early days. In 1914 a 138.8 oz nugget (fourth largest in Alaska) was found in a mud-filled crack on bedrock near Gold Bottom Gulch (Engineering and Mining Journal, 1915, p. 1021; T. Bundzten, personal communication, 1999).In 1914,on No. 4 Above, Hammond River (Goldbottom Gulch), J. C. Kinney and partners picked up nuggets from bedrock valued at about $20,000; one nugget, the second largest ever found in Alaska, was worth $2600. The rest of the dump when sluiced yielded a little less than the value of the pickings. (Engineering and Mining Journal, 1914, p. 1062 Vol. 98 No. 24. (Gold at $20.00 per ounce.)Placers on Slisco bench, an ancient buried channel of Hammond River near Vermont Creek on the west side of the present Hammond River contain a measured resource of 31,099 oz gold with grades of up to 0.3 oz/cy. Inferred resources on the same bench range from 50,000 to 150,000 oz. (2002) .  Other benches of Hammond River between Discovery Claim and Slisco Bench have similar potential but have not been systematically prospected with modern technology.U.S. Department of Interior BLM-Alaska Technical Report 50Mineral Investigations in the Koyukuk MiningDistrict, Northern AlaskaMaddren USGS Bulletin 532  1913Hughes DistrictThe Hughes district includes the basin of the lower Koyukuk River (below the Kanuti). Much of the area is a swampy, lake-studded lowland, from which rises rounded hills to elevations of several thousand feet.Placer mines in the Zane Hills on Bear Creek, a tributary of the Hogatza River, are the biggest source of gold from the district. Placer deposits clustered near the village of Hughes and Indian Mountain are the other significant source of placer gold from the district. The district has produced about 245,000 ounces, with traces of copper, lead, zinc, tin, silver and platinum.(Melozitna DistrictOn the northern side of the Yukon River, between the Melotizna and Ray rivers, most of the district is rolling ridges with upmost elevations over , where now-gone Pleistocene cirque glaciers developed. Placer gold was discovered in 1907, but activity was sporadic and poorly recorded. About 10,000 ounces of gold, with significant by-product tin, was won from placer deposits by the 1960s.(Interior Alaska, south of the Yukon RiverKaiyuh DistrictIllinois Creek MineThe mine is located in the remote Kaiyuh Mountains of west-central Alaska about  south of the River  village of Galena. The Illinois Creek lode gold-silver mine exploited a shear-hosted gold deposit which was partly expressed as color anomalies visible from aircraft. Located on State of Alaska land, it was discovered in the 1980s. In February 1996 a feasibility study was completed, with the deposit estimated to contain about 350,000 ounces of gold and 2,500,000 ounces of silver. Construction began the next month, but was halted by winter conditions in November. By then, with the development uncompleted and six-million more than the total mine construction-and-operating budget of 26-million dollars already spent, USMX, the mining company that owned Illinois Creek, was millions of dollars in arrears on invoices and short on cash.(USMX INC Annual Report (10-K) Liquidity and Capital Resources) New financing allowed construction to resume in 1997; the mine poured its first gold in June 1997. In 1998 the company entered bankruptcy. In 1999 the State of Alaska assumed control of the mine. A mine-to-reclaim arrangement between the state and a newly-involved mining contractor resulted in the reclamation and closure of the mine by 2005. A bond is in place to provide environmental monitoring for 30 years.(Northern Alaska Environmental Center :: Mining :: Illinois Creek)Ruby-Poorman DistrictThe Ruby-Poorman District produced nearly a half million ounces of gold, all from placer mines. Some of the largest gold nuggets found in Alaska are from the district, which lies south of the Yukon River.(Alaska Resource Data Files http://ardf.wr.usgs.gov/ardf_data/RB_refs.txt) The placers are mostly deeply buried, and most were originally worked with shafts and drifts. Dozens of creeks in the district were mined, many more bear gold prospects. Cassiterite, platinum, scheelite, allanite, and native bismuth have been recovered along with gold from placer mines in the district.(Significant Metalliferous Lode Deposits and Placer Deposits of Alaska, Nokleberg, et al., USGS Bulletin 1786, 1987)Hot Springs DistrictThis district, which produced about 576,000 ounces, includes placer mines at Manley and Eureka.Rampart districtNearly 200,000 ounces of gold was recovered from placer mines in the district.Circle districtOver 1 million ounces of gold have been recovered from placer deposits in the Circle district. Uplands with thousands of feet of generally mild relief are underlain by a complex metamorphic terrane intruded by a broad range of igneous rocks. Many gold occurrences are known, but no gold lodes are identified. Placer mining has been reported for every year since 1894.(Eagle districtThis small district includes the village of Eagle on the Yukon River, and borders Canada. About 50,000 ounces of gold, all from placer deposits, has been recovered from the district since gold was discovered in 1895 on American Creek and the Seventy-mile River.(Tolovana-Livengood districtLivengood is about  northwest of Fairbanks on the Highway. In July, 1914 Jay Livengood and N.R. Hudson discovered gold on Livengood Creek. Hundreds of people arrived in the district the following winter. A post office existed at Livengood from 1915 to 1957. Only a few dozen people live at Livengood today, some only seasonally. A variety of creeks in the district were mined. Many gold lode occurrences are known and exploration continues for open pittable lode deposits. Over 500,000 ounces of gold have been recovered from placers in the district.(Alaska Dept. of Commerce, Community and Economic Developmenthttp://www.commerce.state.ak.us/dca/commdb/CF_CIS.htm)Early development and production was from relatively shallow pay in tributaries of Livengood Creek. By 1939, large, deeply buried (80 to 110 feet), thawed, bench placer deposits on the northwest limit of Livengood Creek valley were defined. The pay streak varied from 100 to  wide and was at least  long. Gold reserves of over 1 million ounces were defined by drilling prior to 1940. A dredge operated near the town of Livengood in 1940, 1946 and probably other years.(http://ardf.wr.usgs.gov/quads/html/Livengood.html Alaska Resource Data Files)Alaskas 12th-largest (73 troy ounces) and 16th-largest (56 troy ounces) nuggets were found in the district, on Dome Creek.Fairbanks districtPlacer mining began near Fairbanks in July 1902, after Pedro (real name Felice Pedroni), an Italian immigrant and Tom Gilmore discovered gold in the hills north of the Tanana and Chena Rivers in 1901.  The district was and is a major producer of gold from both placer and lode deposits: placers have produced over 8 million troy ounces (250 tonnes) of gold, lodes have yielded over 4 million ounces.(http://ardf.wr.usgs.gov/ardf_data/Fairbanks.pdf)Goodpaster districtOnly a few thousand ounces of gold from placer mines, and a few hundred ounces from lode gold mines were produced from the Goodpaster district before the discovery of Pogo. The district is west of the Fairbanks and south of the Circle district.Pogo mine (operating)The recently discovered and built Pogo mine is located on a hillside above the Goodpaster River, about  south-east of Fairbanks, Alaska. The deposit was discovered in 1994 by the Sumitomo companies on land owned by the State of Alaska. A private  gravel road and power line now connects the mine to the Richardson Highway corridor near Junction. The mine is an underground operation that exploits two large (several-meters thick) and high-grade (averaging almost 0.5 ounces of gold per ton of ore) gold-bearing quartz veins. Approximately half of the tailings are returned underground, the rest are disposed of on the surface. The mine was developed, and originally operated, by Teck-Cominco, the same company operating the worlds largest zinc mine; the Dog mine in northwest Alaska.  Sumitomo Metal Mining (a non-operating partner and part-owner of the Pogo deposit since discovery) bought Teck-Comincos share of the mine in 2009 and is now the operator. The first gold dore bar at Pogo was poured on February 12, 2006. 190 people were employed at the mine in 2007.In early 2007 Pogo contained reserves of 5.6 million ounces of gold in ore grading 0.41 opt gold. Projected mine life is ten years.Fortymile districtThe 1886 discovery of gold on Franklins Bar on the River touched off Interior Alaskas first rush. The mining boom ushered in a wave of settlement that forever changed the place, not only for its new residents but for the Athabascan Indians who occupied this region long before them. The miners who prospected nearly every creek in the region eventually extracted more than a half-million ounces of gold from the Fortymile, including a 56.8 troy ounce nugget, Alaskas 15th-largest.(Alaskas Largest Gold Nuggets) Reports of starvation and lawlessness among the miners resulted in the Army sending troops to the Eagle area to provide law enforcement in 1899. Soldiers soon began work on a trail from Valdez to Eagle.(http://www.blm.gov/ak/st/en/prog/sa/fortymile_nwsr/history_and_natural.html BLM: Fortymile National Wild and Scenic River)Gold was first discovered in the Chicken Creek drainage in 1896, 10 years after the gold discovery on the Fortymile River. The F.E. Company, a subsidiary of the U.S. Smelting Refining & Mining Co., acquired most of the claims during the 1940s and dredged  of the creek from 1959 to 1967. Since then, several family operations have mined on the creek. It is estimated that over 100,000 ounces of gold has been produced from the Chicken Creek drainage.The beginning of the end of the Fortymile Gold Rush came in August 1896 when Carmack reported the first gold strike along the River in Canada. Within a few years the once-booming towns in the Fortymile region were abandoned and forgotten. Some of the original Fortymile miners returned to the area after the Gold Rush passed. From 18871890 the Upper Yukon region was the richest and most productive mining area in the region. During those three years the area produced 1,200,000 ounces of gold, accounting for 5 percent of Alaskas total gold production.(http://ntis.library.gatech.edu/handle/123456789/9092 Early Miners of the Fortymile (A BLM Alaska Adventures in the Past Series))Chisana-White River districtGold production from this area is balanced between 78,000 ounces of placer and 66,000 ounces of lode gold. Directly south of the Fortymile district, the Chisana district includes headwaters of the Nabesna and White rivers, and tributaries of the River; it includes parts of the Mountains and the Range. Difficulties of location, lack of water, and small deposit size limited placer activity.The Nabesna underground lode mine produced gold-copper-silver ore between 1930 and WWII.(Kantishna districtThe Kantishna Gold Rush began soon after The Nome Nugget printed the headline FOUND HIGH GRADE GOLD on September 9, 1903. Located on the north flanks of Denali (McKinley), the District was a hard place to operate a mine. Nevertheless, some of the largest gold nuggets found in Alaska have been found in the area, including the 9th largest (92 troy ounces). 92,000 ounces of placer gold and 8000 ounces of gold from lode mines has come from the district.( Today, the district is located within National Park and Preserve.(National Park Service: Pioneers of Kantishna, NPS)Southwestern AlaskaKuskokwim Gold BeltThe Kuskokwim Gold Belt (KGB, also known as the Kuskokwim Mineral Belt) is a broad loosely geologically and geographically defined swath of country arcing for approximately  across southwest Alaska. It lies northwest of the Alaska Range and is roughly centered on the River basin. Geologically it is dominated by flysch of Cretaceous-age Kuskokwim Group sediments and a variety of igneous rocks. It also includes a variety of terranes. In 1913, Alfred H. Brooks described it as, a more or less broken belt of gold-bearing rocks which stretches northeastward from Goodnews Bay parallel to the lower course of the Kuskokwim, toward the Iditarod District, and a number of streams traversing this belt carry auriferous gravels.(USGS Bulletin 592, pp22) The KGB lies mostly within the southwestern part of the Tintina Gold Province or Golden Arch which lies roughly between the Denali-Farewell and Kaltag-Tintina fault systems and arcs up from southwest Alaska, through central Alaska, and down across the Yukon Territory to British Columbia.(Economic Geology Monograph 9, Mineral Deposits of Alaska, Precious Metals Associated with Late Cretaceous-Early Tertiary Igneous Rocks of Southwestern Alaska, Bundtzen and Miller, 1997, pp242-286)(GEOLOGIC REPORT SH02EXE-1,SUMMARY REPORTFOR THE SHOTGUN GOLD PROSPECT,KUSKOKWIM MINERAL BELT,ALASKA,Avalon Development Corp for NovaGold Resources, 2002http://www.novagold.net/upload/technical_reports/ShotgunReportApril2002.pdf)(Tintina Gold Province, Alaska and Yukon Territory, 2002, 2007, USGShttp://pubs.usgs.gov/fs/2007/3061/fs2007-3061.pdf)(http://www.dced.state.ak.us/dca/AEIS/Bethel/Minerals/Bethel_Minerals_Narrative.htm DCED Bethel Census Area: Minerals)The KGB includes all or parts of the historic Aniak/Tuluksak, Anvik, Bethel, Goodnews Bay, Iditarod-Flat, Innoko, Marshall, McGrath, Ruby, and Tolstoi mining districts, as well as newly-realized gold-rich areas.(adn.com | Money : Mining ventures see potential in Southwest) Over 3.2 million ounces of gold have been recovered from the belt.(For more than a decade, changes have occurred each year that have improved the regulatory and business climate for mining in A)The first mineral discovery by the Russians in Alaska (a cinnabar-stibnite deposit) occurred in the Aniak district in 1838. Pay gold was found in 1901 on tributaries of the Kuskokwim River in the Aniak district.(Marshall-Anvik DistrictThe Marshall and Anvik districts produced about 124,000 ounces of gold and minor amounts of platinum, mainly from Wilson Creek.The district has the Bering Sea to the west, the Yukon River to the south, and the Iditarod and Kaiyuh districts to the east.Aniak DistrictAbout 220,000 ounces of gold produced, mainly from the Tuluksuk River (where the town of Nyac is located) and Crooked Creek basins and with lesser production from Wattamuse and other creeks scattered around the district. Mining continues at present, but reserves are not known. Cinnabar (mercury sulfide) occurs in many of the placer mines in this district, most notably at Cinnabar Creek.Donlin Creek (feasibility stage)Placer mining began on benches and tributaries on the east side of Crooked Creek and its tributary Donlin Creek in 1910; a family-scale placer-mining operation continues today. Granitic dike swarms cutting the shales and sandstones of the Kuskokwim Group rocks in the hills east of upper Crooked Creek were recognized by USGS geologists in 1915 as the probable source of the placer gold.(Maddren, A. G., 1915, Gold Placers of the lower Kuskokwim with a note on copper in the Russian Mountains, USGS Bulletin 622,p292-360) In the 1970s Corporation, an Native Corporation, as part of its land grant under ANSCA selected the land east of Crooked Creek, based on its mineral potential. In 1986 modern hardrock exploration of the Donlin area began with WestGolds efforts, which were abandoned after two years, due not to the lack of gold, but to the refractory (technically difficult to extract from the rock) nature of the gold. PlacerDome signed a lease with Calista and began exploration at Donlin in 1995. That effort continues today, having evolved to a 50:50 partnership between Gold and Resources, in cooperation with Calista, the landowner. Over 150 million dollars have been expended on exploration, engineering, and environmental studies. If eventually exploited, the mine will be an open pit several miles wide. Latest estimates (April 2009) report that Donlin contains 29.3 million ounces of proven and probable gold reserves (calculated at a gold price of $750) and an additional 10 million ounces of gold resource.( The gold occurs within the crystal lattice of arsenopyrite associated with other metal sulfides in veins, veinlets, and disseminations mainly in the felsic dikes, but also in less common altered mafic dikes and in the sediments.(Iditarod DistrictThe Iditarod district lies between the lower Yukon and Kuskokwim Rivers: the Aniak district abuts it to the south. A gold rush followed the discovery of gold on Otter Creek in 1909. Over 1.5 million ounces of placer gold and a few thousand ounces of lode gold have been recovered from the Iditarod area, making it one of the more important gold-mining districts in Alaska. Much of the gold-producing ground in the district was consolidated by the Morgan-Guggenheim consortium.Tolstoi DistrictThe drainage basin of Tolstoi Creek, a north-flowing tributary of the Dishna, roughly defines the district. The district lies between the Iditarod and Innoko districts. Placer gold and platinum were discovered by drifting in frozen gravels 35 feet deep on Boob Creek in the winter of 1915-1916. A gold rush occurred in the district the following winter. Historic production of 11,000 ounces of gold, as well as some byproduct platinum, is recorded for the district.(http://www.alaskaminers.org/abstracts2002.pdf)Innoko DistrictThe Aniak district lies to the south, the Tolstoi district to the west. Almost 3/4 million ounces of placer gold has been won from Innoko River and its tribuaries in the district. Lode gold production of 150 ounces is also recorded. Cripple, Colorado, Yankee, Ganes, Ophir, and Little Creeks had prominent placer mines: a third of the districts production came from Ganes Creek. Gold-bearing porphyritic intrusive rocks adjacent to the Ganes Creek and Colorado Creek placers are similar in composition and age to the dike swarms at 29-million ounce Donlin Creek.Ganes CreekThe property is located approximately 40 km west of McGrath, and 440 km northwest of Anchorage. Ganes is famous for producing spectacular gold nuggets including the 5th (122 troy ounces) and 13th-largest (62.5 troy ounce) in Alaska. The presence of cobble-size quartz with sulfide boxwork and coarse gold suggest that the placer gold is primary, originating from bedrock sources. Historic production figures from Ganes Creek are in excess of 250,000 oz. gold; an additional estimated resource of 736,000 oz. of placer gold exists on patented claims.(Press Release, Full Metal Minerals)McGrath-McKinley districtAlmost 200,000 ounces of lode gold and over 130,000 ounces of placer gold has come from the district. The district lies on the northeast side of the Aniak district.The Nixon Fork mine (operation suspended)The Nixon Fork mine is an underground lode gold-copper mine located  northeast of Alaska. Placer gold was discovered nearby in 1917, by 1918 hardrock mining was underway, and continued intermittently until 1964. Ore consists of shoots of massive sulfides and native gold found with skarns along the contact of sedimentary rocks and the Mystery Creek quartz monzonite stock.The mine was reopened for exploration, permitted, and developed by Nevada Goldfields, Inc. in 1995 and operated until 1999. In 2005 resource and exploration development resumed. Gold production occurred in 2006 and 2007, production is currently suspended. Production has totaled 187,000 ounces of gold, 2,190,000 pounds of copper, and at least 11,000 ounces of silver.(St. Andrew Goldfields) Two small ore bodies have proven and probable reserves of approximately 126,400 tonnes, containing 133,730 ounces of gold.  An additional 116,000 tonnes of existing mill tailings are reported to contain 30,200 ounces of gold.(Alaska Dept. of Natural Resources: The Nixon Fork Mine)Goodnews Bay DistrictThe district is in extreme southwestern Alaska, and borders the Sea. About 600,000 ounces of platinum (plus some iridium, osmium, ruthenium, palladium, and rhenium) and 27,000 ounces of gold were won from placer deposits in the River from 1934 to 1976. Present reserves are unknown, but are the subject of ongoing exploration. The source of the platinum-group elements appears to be in the Mountain and Susie Mountain ultramafic rocks. Extensive geochemical and geophysical surveys during the past several years have identified areas with as much as 0.1 ounce per ton platinum in the soils, but no reserve has been demonstrated.Seward PeninsulaSurveyors belonging to the 1865 Count Bendeleben expedition exploring a route across Siberia, the Bering Sea, and Alaska for a communications cable reported gold in the Fish River area of the Seward Peninsula. But it was not until the 1898 $1500-to-the-pan strike on Anvil Creek that gold-seekers came to the region.(Alaska Division of Community and Regional Affairs)Nome (Cape Nome) districtPlacer gold deposits on Anvil Creek and on the Snake River, a few miles from the future site of Nome, were discovered in 1898 by Lindeberg, Lindblom and Brynteson,  the Three Lucky Swedes. Word of the strike caused a major gold rush to Nome in the spring of 1899.  Construction of a new hardrock gold mine at Rock Creek was completed, and start-up procedures initiated in late 2008. Efforts at the new mine are suspended due to mill design inadequacies and difficulties meeting regulatory requirements. NovaGolds Rock Creek project includes the Rock Creek mine and mill complex seven miles (11 km) north of Nome, and eventual additional millfeed from the historic underground Big Hurrah mine site  east. Over 3.6 million ounces of gold have been recovered from the Nome district, almost all of it from placer deposits.Council-Solomon DistrictOver a million ounces of gold are reported recovered from the district.(Fairhaven Inmachuk DistrictThe Fairhaven-Inmachuk district lies north of the Solomon District and extends north to Kotzebue Sound of the Chukchi Sea. The district (including Candle) produced about 600,000 ounces of gold with minor amounts of chromium, copper, lead, platinum, bismuth, tungsten, mercury, molybdenum, silver, and elements.(http://www.dced.state.ak.us/dca/AEIS/NWAB/Minerals/NWAB_Minerals_Narrative.htm DCED Northwest Arctic Borough: Minerals)Kougarok districtThe district is the central part of the Seward Peninsula, draining into the Imruck Basin. Gold was discovered in 1900 and production from placer mines continues to this day. 177,000 ounces of gold have been recovered from the Kougarok district.Koyuk district84,000 ounces of placer gold came from the district, the southeastern part of the Seward Peninsula. Major producers were; the Ungalik River and its tributary, Bonanza Creek, which produced significant by-product tin, and Dime Creek, which also produced significant platinum. The district encompasses the basins of the Koyuk, Inglutalik, Ungalik, and Shaktoolik Rivers, all draining into northeastern Sound.Port Clarence districtMainly a tin district, the westernmost Seward Peninsula, 42,000 ounces of placer gold have been recovered, much of it as a by-product of tin mining.Southcentral AlaskaResurrection CreekResurrection Creek was the site of Alaskas first gold rush over a century ago, and placer mining continues today. The Resurrection Creek watershed drains  on the north side of the Kenai Peninsula, and the community of Alaska is located at the mouth of Resurrection Creek.(http://www.epa.gov/fedrgstr/EPA-IMPACT/2008/January/Day-28/i347.htm U.S. Environmental Protection Agency) Charles Miller located the first claim on Resurrection Creek; then leased it to others for working. By 1893, about a dozen miners were working claims on Resurrection Creek. In1894, more claims were established on Resurrection Creek.( Mining in Alaskas Past, Alaska Historical Society,1980)Valdez CreekGold was discovered near Valdez Creek on August 15, 1903. Valdez Creek, a tributary of the River, is located in central Alaska northeast of milepost 81 on the Highway. A 52-troy ounce nugget (Alaskas 18th-largest) came from Lucky Gulch, a tributary of Valdez Creek. Cambiors Valdez Creek Mine recovered over 75,000 ounces of gold annually, making it the largest placeroperation in North America in 1992. Produced 459,162 ounces of gold from 1984 to 1995. Substantial reserves remain upstream of the active mine.(http://www.dced.state.ak.us/dca/AEIS/MatSu/Minerals/MatSu_Minerals_Narrative.htm) The mine has been shut down and the site reclaimed, but other small-scale placer and lode deposits remain nearby.(http://www.blm.gov/heritage/adventures/research/StatePages/PDFs/ValdezCreek.pdf)Chulitna-Yentna Mineral BeltThe Chulitna-Yentna mineral belt extends northeastward for  or more along the southern flank of the west-central Alaska Range. The belt shares tectonic or compositional features comparable with some well-known mineral belts of the western Cordillera, including the Juneau gold belt.Chulitna DistrictGolden Zone MineGolden Zone Mine. (Copper, gold, silver, arsenic, zinc). Pipe-like body produced 1,581 ounces of gold, 8,617 ounces of silver, and 21 tons of copper. Recent work indicates reserves of the Pipe, Bunkhouse and Copper King deposits as 13.3 million tons grading 0.095 ounces per ton of gold.(http://www.dced.state.ak.us/dca/AEIS/MatSu/Minerals/MatSu_Minerals_Narrative.htm Matanuska-Susitna Census Area: Minerals State of Alaska, DCED)Yentna Cache-Creek DistrictGold was discovered in the Yentna District (also known as the Cache Creek District) of the upper Susitna Valley in 1898, soon followed by claim staking.  mining was reported in the Cache Creek drainage of the Dutch Hills by 1906. Quaternary glaciofluvial deposits, alluvial deposits, and Tertiary conglomeratic white quartz-breccia units have been mined in the Dutch Hills. About 200,000 ounces (6.2 tonnes) of gold has been produced from these placer deposits.(C.C. Hawley and A.L. Clark, (1973) Geology and Mineral Deposits of the Chulitna-Yentna Mineral Belt, Alaska, US Geological Survey, Professional Paper 758-A.)Willow Creek Mining DistrictFile:Hatcherpassmine.JPG||thumb|right|Independence Mine in Pass is now a State Historic ParkGold was first reported in what would become the Willow Creek Mining District (also known as the Independence Mine/Pass District) by Robert Hatcher. Hatcher discovered and staked the first lode gold claim in the Willow Creek Valley in September 1906. Through 2006 the district produced 667-thousand ounces of hard rock gold and 60-thousand ounces of placer gold.(Northwestern AlaskaDrainage basins emptying into Kotzebue Sound of the Bering Sea, including the River and River, define the Kiana, Shungnak, Noatak, and Selawick districts. The Noatak district is now within the National Preserve, only tiny gold placer production was recorded from some tributaries near the Noatak headwaters. The Selawick district has one creek where gold was produced by a 2-man operation for ten years during the 1950s and 1960s.  Kobuk River districtIn 1898, placer and lode gold were discovered on several of the Rivers tributaries. This gold strike (which by some accounts was false) attracted nearly 2,000 people to Alaska, though only 800 actually stayed to find gold. Although mining has continued to take place in this area, little gold has been discovered.Kiana districtPlacer gold was discovered on Klery Creek in 1909. Almost all of the gold, over 40,000 ounces, from this area has come from tributaries of the River. Mining has been nearly continuous in this area since discovery. jade also occurs in this area.Shungnak districtAll of the 15,000 ounces of gold recovered came from streams draining the Cosmos Hills, a low range along the Kobuk Valley. Gold was discovered on Dahl Creek in 1898, which was the major producer. Copper, chromium, cadmium, and silver, were also recovered with the gold.Recreational gold mining in AlaskaRecreational mining, i.e., small-scale prospecting and mining using gold pans, sluiceboxes, rockers, suction dredges, and detectors, is enjoying a resurgence in Alaska. It is a fun way to spend a day or weekend, everyone in the family can participate, and it requires only inexpensive equipment. Plus, you just might find some gold. thumb|left|250px|Miners working a sluice on Lucky Gulch, Blue Ribbon Mine, AlaskaThere are many commercial ventures that charge fees to recreational miners located on historically-rich placer ground, some are road-accessible, many are in remote fly-in locations, most offer lodging and a complete suite of services.Much of the State and Federal-owned land in Alaska is open to recreational mining, but be aware, there are regulations governing how such mining can be done.It is never legal or OK to mine on public land that is closed to such activities; or to mine without permission on either public land that is already staked or leased, or privately-owned land.Popular areas include; areas of National Forest,(http://www.nps.gov/aplic/Goldmining.pdf) areas within Alaska State Parks such as State Park, Kenai State Parks, and Independence Mine State Historical Park,(Public Recreational Mining in State Parks, Factsheet. http://www.dnr.state.ak.us/mlw/factsht/mine_fs/recgoldm.pdf) and along the Highway.(http://www.blm.gov/ak/st/en/prog/recreation/activities/gold_panning.html)Most of the public-access areas have few or no facilities, such as outhouses, but thats changing, and adds to the feeling of getting in touch with the gold mining roots of the Pioneers.Perhaps the easiest to get to, and one with camping areas close by, is the Caribou Creek Recreational Mining area. Physical fitness, health, and age should be considered due to the steepness of the trail. (http://www.dnr.state.ak.us/mlw/factsht/mine_fs/caribou1.pdf FACTSHEET: Caribou Creek State Recreational Mining Area) Located on the Highway east of Palmer, the area has fine gold and easy access.The Pass Public Use Area is located approximately fifteen miles north of Palmer on the Susitna River. The area is open to a variety of recreational activities, including recreational mining. A fact sheet provides details on recreational mining within the Hatcher Pass Public Use Area.(http://www.dnr.state.ak.us/mlw/factsht/mine_fs/hatcherp.pdf FACTSHEET: Recreational Mining in the Hatcher Pass  Public Use Area, Alaska DNR)Near Fairbanks, both the Pedro Creek area (about 15 miles north of Fairbanks and the site of the original Fairbanks gold discovery by Pedro in 1902) and Nome Creek( http://www.blm.gov/ak/st/en/prog/sa/white_mtns/summer_recreation/nome_creek_valley.html Nome Creek Valley BLM) area within the White Mountains National Recreation Area (approximately 60 miles north of Fairbanks) have easy access. Gold mining on Nome Creek began in 1900, and there was a stampede in 1910 when word of the find leaked out.Somewhat more challenging due to access, but also more rewarding, is the Petersville State Recreational Mining Area.(http://www.alaskafreegold.com/home432 Petersville State Recreational Mining area and Driveguide to the Petersville Road)You can also try your luck on the beaches of Nome.ReferencesExternal links;Alaskan gold mining and exploration companies* Little Squaw Gold Mining Company: Chandalar Property* Alaska Freegold Co.: The Blue Ribbon Mine, Alaska* Kinross: Ft. Knox Mine, Alaska* Coeur Alaska: The Kensington Gold Mine* Full Metal Minerals* Barrick Gold* Teck Cominco: The Pogo Mine* Tonogold Resources;Mining organizations* Alaska Miners Association;Government links*Alaska Division of Mining, Land & Water:  Pebble Project*Alaska Division of Mining, Land & Water:  Ft. Knox Mine*Pioneers of Kantishna: Pioneers of Kantishna, NPS*Alaska Division of Geological and Geophysical Surveys*Alaska Department of Natural Resources:  Mining*Alaska State Library:  Nome Gold Rush*Alaska Gold Rush Attractions and Historic Sites*National Park Service: RECREATIONAL GOLD MINING IN ALASKA-Factsheet
15341335
Tin_mining_in_Britain
Tin mining in Britain took place from prehistoric times until the 20th century. Mention of tin mining in Britain was made by many Classical writers. As South-West Britain was one of the few parts of England to escape glaciation, tin ore was readily available on the surface. Originally it is likely that alluvial deposits in the gravels of streams were exploited but later underground working took place.  Shallow cuttings were then used to extract ore. In the 19th century advances in mining engineering enabled the exploitation of much deeper mines. In a few cases these mines even extended both to multiple levels and workings below the seabed.()See also*sources and trade in ancient times*tin-mining*in Cornwall and DevonReferences
15366235
Arthur_Posnansky
thumb|250px|Photograph of Arthur Posnansky from Campaa del Acre: la lancha Iris; aventuras y peregrinaciones Arthur Posnansky (1873 - 1946), often called Arturo, was at various times in his life an engineer, explorer, ships navigator, director of a river navigation company, entrepreneur, La Paz city council member, and well known and well respected avocational archaeologist. During his lifetime, Posnansky was known as a prolific writer and researcher and for his active participation in the defense and development of Bolivia. He is well known for his books, including Tihuanacu, the Cradle of American Man, Campana de Acre, La Lancha Iris, Die Osterinsel und ihre praehistorischen Monumente, and Rasas y Monummtos Prehistoricos del Altiplano Andino.(Parker, W.B. (1922) Bolivians of To-Day, 2nd ed. The Hispanic Society of America. New York, New York. 332 pp.) Outside of Bolivia, where he is still widely read. Posnanskys writings about the Tiwanaku Site have also been made popular by authors such as Hancock, Hapgood, and Rand Flem-Ath, who rely on Posnanskys dating of the Tiwanaku Site to support their theories. Early Life He was born in Vienna, Austria, on April 13, 1873.(Stanish, C. (2002) Chapter 6 Tiwanaku Political Economy. in W.H. Isbell and H. Silverman, eds., pp. 169-198. Andean Archaeology I Variations in Sociopolitical Organization. Kluwer Academic / Plenum Publishers, New York, New York. 394 pp.) He helped his father in his business as a manufacturing chemist. At this time, was deeply involved in cognate studies. His interest in cognate studies ended when his father suddenly died. After his fathers death, Posnansky studied in Imperial and Royal Academy of Pola (now Pula) for the position of Naval Military Engineer in the Austro-Hungarian Navy. During his time in the Imperial and Royal Academy of Pola, he made several extensive training voyages, which took him many places, including the Islands in the South Ocean, as a part of his shipboard training. While at Easter Island, he made ethnological observations, which he later published as Die Osterinsel und ihre praehistorischen Monumente. Posnansky graduated from Imperial and Royal Academy of Pola at age 18.( Life in Brazil At age 23 in 1896, Posnansky emigrated to America. At first, he participated various expeditions, which explored upper reaches of the River. During these expeditions, he became an experienced navigator of it and its distributaries. He used his expertise to become the director of a river navigation company, which was called La Empresa de Navegacao dos rios Purus e Acre. As captain and owner of the shallow-draught steamer and runner, Iris, Posnansky rescued the survivors of the Acre garrison during the Acre Campaign in Brazil. This military campaign involved a dispute between Bolivia and Brazil over 191000 square kilometers of territory on the River. After being wounded and captured by Brazilian forces, he escaped and became a refugee in Europe. Because of his loyalty to and support of Bolivia in this conflict, he lost all of his properties in Brazil. His exploits during the Acre Campaign (1900-1901) are detailed in his book Campaa del Acre: la lancha Iris; aventuras y peregrinaciones(Life In BoliviaImage:Arthur_Posnansky_2.jpg|thumb|200px| Excerpt from the newspaper Ultima Hora of Paz about the first car introduced by Arthur Poznansky into BoliviaAfter being a refugee in Europe, Posnansky moved to Bolivia to claim compensation for his services to this country. After finding that any substantial reward was unattainable because of the bankrupt state of the Bolivian treasury, he devoted his talents towards building private businesses involved in mining and international trade. In time, he became a prosperous entrepreneur. During this time, Posnansky introduced the first car to Bolivia.( Posnansky died in La Paz, Bolivia in 1946.While his business ventures thrived, the Bolivian Government recognized Posnanskys service during the Acre Campaign. For his sacrifices  in support of the Bolivian government, it first granted him the honorific title of Benemerito de la Patria (Worthy of the Nation) and full Bolivian citizenship. Later, it awarded him two gold medals, one in 1901, the other in 1903. In 1905, his government service continued when he was elected to La Paz City Council.(Scientific Researchthumb|200px| Arthur Posnansky with archaeologist Wendell BennettAfter becoming settled down in Bolivia, Posnansky repeatedly traveled the Bolivian and Peruvian highlands in efforts to locate, describe, and study Inca and pre-Inca archaeological sites. He was especially interested in those found along the shoreline and on the islands of Titicaca. The results of these investigations were published in books such as The Islands of Titicaca and Koati and Rasas y monummtos prehistoricos del Altiplano Andino. For such research, the Bolivian Senate awarded him a gold medal in 1905 and he later became Director of the National Museum. He also authored books, which included Os Indios Paumaris e Ipurinas no rio Purus (1898) and Mapa del rio Acre (7 volumes, 1897) about South American geography and ethnology. He also lectured about archaeological subjects in Berlin, Frankfort, Nuremberg, and Treptow, Germany. In recognition of his accomplishments, the German Government conferred on him an honorary title of Professor in 1914.(In 1945 (volumes I and II) and 1957 (volumes III and IV), Posnanskys final and most important book, Tihuanacu, the Cradle of American Man,(Posnansky, A. (1945) Tihuanacu, the Cradle of American Man, Vols. I - II (Translated into English by James F. Sheaver), J. J. Augustin, Publ., New York and Minister of Education, La Paz, Bolivia.)(Posnansky, A. (1957) Tihuanacu, the Cradle of American Man, Vols. II - IV (Translated into English by James F. Sheaver), J. J. Augustin, Publ., New York and Minister of Education, La Paz, Bolivia.) was published. In it, Posnansky argued that Tiwanaku was constructed approximately 12,000 years ago by American peoples, although not by the ancestors of those then living in the area, the Aymara.  Posnansky also saw Tiwanaku as the origin point of civilization throughout the Americas, including the Inca, the Maya and others. Although these ideas have since been discredited by later archaeological research, the photographs, detailed descriptions of structures and inscriptions, meticulously prepared maps of this site, and numerous photographs found in Tihuanacu, the Cradle of American Man constitute an extremely invaluable historic record of the site.((Kolata, A.L. (1993) Tiwanaku: Portrait of an Andean Civilization. Blackwell Publishers, Cambridge, United Kingdom. 256 pp.)(Kolata, A.L. (1996) Tiwanaku and Its Hinterland: Archaeology and Paleoecology of an Andean Civilization, vol. 1. Smithsonian Institution Press, Washington, DC.)(Kolata, A.L. (2003) Tiwanaku and Its Hinterland: Archaeology and Paleoecology of an Andean Civilization, vol. 2. Smithsonian Institution Press, Washington, DC.) In general principle, his ideas about the Tiwanaku Site having been full-fledged city with a large permanent population instead of having been only a seasonally occupied ceremonial center and its abandonment having been the result of prehistoric climatic change are widely accepted. Also, this book and his personal efforts contributed significantly to the eventual preservation of the Tiwanaku Site at a time when it was being very badly damaged by neglect, stone quarrying, and looting.(ReferencesAdditional ReferencesPonce Sangines, C. (1999) Arthur Posnansky: Posnansky
15381650
Seiad_Valley_AVA
 comments  The Seiad Valley AVA is an Viticultural Area in County, California, located adjacent to the River and close to the border with Oregon.  The wine region was granted AVA status in 1994 despite having only one commercially bonded winery in operation, Seiad Valley Vineyards, which has since ceased operations.  The valley floor is covered in the excavated rock left behind as tailings from mining.  The exposed rocks absorb and retain heat from the sun, moderating the effects of a cool, mountain valley climate.  There are approximately  of Riesling being grown inside the geographic boundaries of the AVA.(See also* wineReferencesValley AVA
15393780
David_C._Bradley
 known_for   physiology transform analysis algorithmsDavid C Bradley (born 1961) was a professor of psychology and a prominent neuroscientist at the of Chicago.() He was the lead author on a groundbreaking series of papers published in Nature and Science in the late 1990s, elucidating the representation of motion in areas MT (lobe) and MST (superior temporal area).() He was subsequently chosen as one of the 4 rising stars in all of academia by the of Higher Education for 1998. ()  Given his position in the field, he is frequently invited to write high-impact reviews and comments. ()  While he is best known for his work in MT and MST, he is also involved in cutting edge visual prosthesis research in area V1, which is carried out in collaboration with other institutions. ()In addition to being a scholar, he has successfully trained dozens of students and post-docs. While at the University of Chicago, Bradley published a series of much recognized papers on a range of issues including neural prosthetics, the size of neural decision pools as well the structure and function of area MT.After successfully climbing the academic ladder and receiving tenure at the University of Chicago in 2005, Bradley left academia in 2008 to pursue his interests in data mining and pattern recognition algorithms. Notes 
15410850
Scottish_Association_for_Marine_Science
thumb|right|454px|altAerial view of Scottish Association for Marine Science showing its location on the shores of Loch Linnhe, Scotland|Scottish Association for Marine Science. The institute is sited on the Scottish west coast, close to a wide range of marine habitats.The Scottish Association for Marine Science (SAMS)(http://www.sams.ac.uk) is one of Europes leading marine science research organisations and one of the oldest oceanographic organisations in the world. Sited beside Castle, in Argyll, Scotland, the institute carries out advanced research in the marine environment, including polar research in the Arctic (http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/programmes/newsnight/7595152.stm) and Antarctic.In addition to marine research, in the fields of marine processes and climate change, renewable energy, the Arctic, marine prosperity and sustainability, and mining impacts, the institute has a commercial branch and an education department. Students study for the B.Sc.(Hons) in marine science, for Masters and for Ph.D.s.SAMS hosts the National Facility for Scientific Diving (http://www.nfsd.org.uk/) and the Culture Collection of Algae and Protozoa(http://www.ccap.ac.uk/)It is an independent collaborative centre of the Environment Research Council (NERC)(http://www.nerc.ac.uk/research/sites/collaborative/sams.asp) and an academic partner to the Millennium Institute.(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/UHI_Millennium_Institute) It officially became part of the of the Highlands and Islands in February 2011.SAMS is also a member of the Marine Alliance for Science and Technology for Scotland (MASTS), and leads the MASTS Graduate School.On the 28th of may , SAMS had an open day.References*A short history of SAMS at www.sams.ac.uk
15432992
Pennsylvania_Anthracite_Heritage_Museum
Image: Anthracite Heritage Museum in Scranton, PA IMG_1591.JPG|200px|right|thumb|Anthracite Heritage Museum in Scranton, PennsylvaniaThe Pennsylvania Anthracite Heritage Museum preserves the heritage of anthracite coal mining in the State of Pennsylvania and is located in Park in Scranton. The museum is part of the Historical and Museum Commission. It features exhibits detailing the industrial history of Pennsylvania. The museum was famously featured on The Office episode The Merger in Michael and Dwights parody of Sunday.A few museum exhibits are also located at the companion Lackawana Coal Mine Tour. External links * Official Pennsylvania Anthracite Heritage Museum website
15439483
Lalaye
Lalaye is a commune in the southwest of the Bas-Rhin department in Alsace in north-eastern France.The inhabitants are known as Lachenois.GeographyLalaye is positioned approximately fifteen kilometres (nine miles) to the west-north-west of Slestat on the departmental road D39, one of a number of minor roads that twists across the Mountains into Lorraine.   It is three kilometres (two miles) upstream of the cantonal town, Vill, and on the left bank of a branch of the Giessen river which tumbles down from Urbeis to the west-south-west.   To the north the commune is bounded by the Honel ridge which continues at an altitude of around 600 meters to the Blanc-Noyer peak (822 meters) which dominates the area.  To the south a line of lower peaks running from the Kohlberg (500 meters) to the Goutte Henri (610 meters) a separates the Urbeis Giessen from the Giessen proper.The village itself is positioned at the lower end of the valley, having an average elevation of just 310 meters, shortly before the Charbes stream and the Urbeis Giessen converge.   The houses are stretched along the south facing side of the narrow Charbes valley.MiningThe commune contains significant mineral deposits and has a long mining tradition:  the oldest evidence of exploitation is in place known as La Holle.   The principal mineral here, Galena (ore) was being extracted on a daily basis at the end of the Ages.   Along the route to the hamlet of Charbes is another mine known by the local language name of Haus Osterreich and which was worked during the sixteenth and early seventeenth centuries.   Both these sites have been subjected to several modern investigatory excavations, during the course of which an ancient well was discovered which was equipped with a wheel and a two chamber pump.Seams of antimony at Wolfsloch were mined during the same period, for a century between 1648 and 1748.  More important was the coal mining, which provided high quality coal, principally used in forges.   After lapsing for several years, mining returned to the village during the German occupation in 1901.   Other mines, some better documented than others, include those at Sachelingoutte (sixteenth century), Pransureux, Le Beheu and Ruisseau.An old mylonite quarry which was still being exploited after the World War is located at Molloch, on a part of the same site as the old lead mine at La Holle.   The rock extracted here was chiefly used as an underlay rock for road construction.HistoryEtymologyThe name Lalaye comes from the German and local dialect name Lach and from the Latinate patois equivalent Lela.   A range of spelling variants turns up through the centuries.   The Germanic name Lach is recorded in 1303 and again in 1561.   Following the French occupation of Alsace, francophone versions gain currency:  La Ley in 1768, Lallay on Cassinis eighteenth century maps, Lalay in 1758 and finally Lalaye.   As in the rest of Alsace, periods of German occupation between 1871 and 1918, and again between 1940 and 1944, saw a return to German versions of the name.Origins as part of the Vill seignioryThe precise age of the village is not known.   The first surviving record of it appears in an inventory compiled in 1303 by a notary named Burkhard von Fricke who was working for the powerful Habsburg family.   In the middle of the thirteenth century the Habsburgs owned the Albrecht Valley:  the notarys task was to inventory the familys rights and revenues in all the villages including Lach.   Subsequently the village passed through several hands, either in absolute possession or else as a fiefdom.   Most noteworthy among these proprietors were the Rathsamhausen zum Stein family and, later, the noble Bollwiller family.The Thirty Years WarLalaye was one of many Alsatian villages ruined by the Years War.   After 1648 the French entrusted the Lalaye lands to Choiseul-Meuse.   The village was repopulated by migrants from Lorraine who brought their latinate patois with them.ReligiousThe Catholic community of Lalaye was affiliated to the parish of nearby Vill:  it was therefore necessary for citizens to make the four kilometre (two and a half mile) trek to Vill in order to attend Sunday Mass.    Later, in 1665, a report on The Condition of the Parishes in the Vill lordship mentions the lack of any chapel at Mittelscheer, but indicates the presence of a suitable building at Lalaye (at that time still called Lach) in good condition and dedicated to Saint Dorothy.   At the time the Abbess of Andlau enjoyed the tithe while the priest from Vill administered this chapel and celebrated the mass in it.In 1777 the old chapel was demolished and work began on a church, planned by the architect Christiani and which would be built on the same spot.   The church was far larger than the chapel it replaced, which had become necessary because of immigration to the village during the eighteenth century.   Between 1720 and 1750 the size of the registered congregation increased from about twenty souls to about fifty.   In 1803 a vicar was assigned to Lalaye-Charbes, and from 1810 he was able to reside in a newly constructed presbytery.   Lalaye obtained parish status in 1820.EmigrationFrom the nineteenth century Lalaye experienced a major population exodus, primarily due to a lack of work in the valley.   Some residents migrated to cities such as Paris while others crossed the Atlantic to the States or, like the missionary Jean Gaire, to Canada.   Often early emigrants were joined subsequently by others from the commune.SchoolsTwo schools were constructed during the nineteenth century:  one at Charbes in 1832 and the other at Lalaye in 1860.Twentieth centuryThe village was relatively lightly touched by the two great wars of the twentieth century.   During the World War the village lost 17 inhabitants, and 14 during the World War.People* Gaire 1853 - 1925, missionary to the Canadians, was born in Lalaye.See also*of the Bas-Rhin departmentReferences* INSEE commune fileals:Lalayeca:Lalayeceb:Lalayede:Lalayees:Lalayeeu:Lalayefr:Lalayeit:Lalayela:Lalayems:Lalayenl:Lalayeoc:Lalayepfl:Lalayepms:Lalayepl:Lalayept:Lalayesl:Lalaye( )vi:Lalayevo:Lalayewar:Lalaye
15448945
Anita_Linda
Gawad Urian Best Supporting Actress 1986 Takaw TuksoAnita Linda (born Alice Lake; November 23, 1924) is a two-time award-winning and Gawad Urian award-winning Filipino film actress. A romantic lead in her youth, she later gained critical acclaim for her portrayals in maternal or elderly roles. At the age of 74, she became the oldest actress to ever win a FAMAS award, when she was named Best Supporting Actress for Babae sa Bubungang Lata.() In 2008, at age 83, she was named Best Actress in the 10th Cinemanila International Film Festival (Southeast Asia Film Competition) for her portrayal of the titular character in Adela.Early careerLinda was born in City, the daughter of a full-blooded American soldier/mining engineer father and Ilonggo mother.(Linda was discovered by renowned director Avellana while watching a stage show at the Avenue Theater starring Salcedo, Lopito, among others. Then a Visayan teenager that couldnt speak Tagalog, she had second thoughts when she was asked backstage if she wanted to become an actress. Avellanathen told her to report for rehearsals for the next show and later had her fetched when she didnt appear.Linda first did High School with no dialogue, then Biyernes sa Quiapo with Jaime dela Rosa as her leading man, then Aksesorya with Leopoldo Salcedo onstage. Avellana later gave her the screen name Anita Linda and cast her in Tia Juana, her first film at LVN Pictures(http://www.philstar.com/Article.aspx?articleId515508&publicationSubCategoryId70).. The film was completed shortly before the Japanese invasion of the Philippines, but released only in 1943.(*) With the film studios being shut down for the duration of the war, Linda spent the war years performing on bodabil at Avenue Theater in Manila.( After the war in 1947, she was later offered a contract by Premiere Productions where she was casted by Avellana in Sekretang Hong Kong with Pugo and Togo. Her first lead role in Alyas Sakim with Pol Salcedo in 1947 directed by Moises Cagin.In 1951, Linda portrayed the titular character in de Leons Sisa, a film based on the tragic character in Rizals novel Noli Me Tangere. The role garnered her the Best Actress Maria Clara award (a pre-cursor of the FAMAS).(  De Leon then cast Linda in Sawa sa Lumang Simboryo (1952), a role for which Linda would be nominated for a FAMAS Best Actress Award.(Later careerIn the 1970s, Linda gained renewed critical acclaim in maternal roles she essayed for director Brocka in Ka Ngunit Kulang (1974), Dalawa Tatlo (1974) and Jaguar (1979). She would win the FAMAS Best Supporting Actress Award for Isa Dalawa Tatlo. Linda would also be nominated for the Gawad Urian Best Supporting Actress Award for Jaguar, which was nominated for the dOr at the 1980 Cannes Film Festival. In 1982 she was given the Natatanging Gawad Urian ng Manunuri ng Pelikulang Pilipino.( Linda would appear in several leading films of the 1980s and 1990s, including Joey Gosiengfiaos Temptation Island (1980), de Leons Stella L. (1984), Roos Itanong Mo sa Buwan and Brockas Gumapang ka sa Lusak (1990). For her portrayal of an aging film actress in OHaras Ang Babae sa Bubungang Lata (1998), Linda would receive a Star Award for Best Supporting Actress and her second FAMAS Best Supporting Actress Award. For this, she set a record as the oldest actress to ever win a FAMAS at age 74. In 1987, Linda also won a Gawad Urian Best Supporting Actress award for Takaw Tukso. Linda remained active in the film industry as she reached her eighties, appearing in such films as Imasu 1941: Mahal Kita (2004), You Are the One (2006) and Ouija (2007). In 2009, she returned to television, starring in the ABS-CBN drama Dalawa as Chius ruthless Chinese grandmother Lily and in the upcoming ABS-CBN horror suspense primetime series (TV series). She likewise appeared in an installment of Novela Presents Sa Dibdib aired on GMA-7. She guest appearance in Bukas Pa as Reevess angry grandmother Lola Armida.Linda garnered widespread acclaim in 2008, she starred in the independent film,  Adela (2008), directed by Alix, Jr..  For her performance essaying the loneliness of a woman celebrating her 80th birthday alone when her children failed to visit her, , she was cited as Best Actress in the 10th Cinemanila International Film Festival (Southeast Asia Film Competition),() as Best Actress by the Critics Circle,() and as Best Actress (tied with Ann Santos at the Tanglaw Awards.() York Times film critic Holden praised Lindas performance as quietly transfixing.() Recently, Anita Linda was given the ENPRESS Lino Brocka Lifetime Achievement Award.(Personal lifeIn January 2009, Linda was unhurt in a mugging incident that occurred while she was aboard a taxicab.() In October 1950, Lindas sister Mamey was murdered in a robbery attempt at the home they had shared; Linda herself was unharmed after she and her nieces had locked themselves in a bedroom to evade the burglars.()NotesReferences*External links*LindaLinda
15468002
Title_40_of_the_Code_of_Federal_Regulations
Title 40 is a part of the United States of Federal Regulations. Title 40 arranges mainly environmental regulations that were promulgated by the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA), based on the provisions of United States laws (statutes of the U.S. Federal Code). Parts of the regulation may be updated annually on July 1.(US EPA - Links to CFR Title 40)Chapter I - Environmental Protection Agency*Subchapter A - General (Parts 1 - 29)*Subchapter B - Grants and Other Federal Assistance (Parts 30 - 49)*Subchapter C - Air Programs (Parts 50 - 97) (Air Act)( et seq.)**Ambient Air Quality Standards (NAAQS)***air contaminants**Requirements for Preparation, Adoption and Submittal of Implementation Plans**Approval and Promulgation of Implementation Plans**Ambient Air Monitoring Reference and Equivalent Methods**Prior Notice of Citizen Suits**Outer Continental Shelf Air Regulations**Regional Consistency**Primary Nonferrous Smelter Orders**Ambient Air Quality Surveillance**National Volatile Organic Compound Emission Standards for Consumer and Commercial Products**Standards of Performance for New Stationary Sources (NSPS)**Emissions Standards for Hazardous Air Pollutants (NESHAP)**Approval and Promulgation of State Plans for Designated Facilities and Pollutants**Compliance Assurance Monitoring**Consolidated Federal Air Rule**Assessment and Collection of Noncompliance Penalties by EPA**EPA Approval of State Noncompliance Penalty Program**Chemical Accident Prevention Provisions**Special Exemptions From Requirements of the Clean Air Act**State Operating Permit Programs**Federal Operating Permit Programs**Permits Regulation**Dioxide Allowance System**Sulfur Dioxide Opt-Ins**Continuous Emission Monitoring**Rain Nitrogen Oxides Emission Reduction Program**Excess Emissions**Appeal Procedures**Registration of Fuels and Fuel Additives**Regulation of Fuels and Fuel Additives**Designation Of Areas for Air Quality Planning Purposes**Protection of Stratospheric Ozone**Control of Air Pollution From Mobile Sources**Control of Emissions From New and In-Use Highway Vehicles and Engines**Control of Air Pollution From Aircraft and Aircraft Engines**Clean-Fuel Vehicles**Control of Emissions From New and In-Use Nonroad Compression-Ignition Engines**Control of Emissions From Nonroad Spark-Ignition Engines at or Below 19 Kilowatts**Control of Emissions From Marine Spark-Ignition Engines**Control of Air Pollution From Locomotives and Locomotive Engines**Determining Conformity of Federal Actions to State or Federal Implementation Plans**Control of Emissions From Marine Compression-Ignition Engines**Mandatory Patent Licenses**NOx Budget Trading Program and CAIR NOx And SO2 Trading Programs for State Implementation Plans**Federal NOx Budget Trading Program and CAIR NOx and SO2 Trading Programs*Subchapter D - Water Programs (Parts 100 - 149)**Water Act( et seq.)***Public Hearings on Effluent Standards for Toxic Pollutants***Recognition Awards Under the Clean Water Act***Employee Protection Hearings***Criteria for State, Local and Regional Oil Removal Contingency Plans***Discharge of Oil***Oil Pollution Prevention***Liability Limits for Small Onshore Storage Facilities***Designation of Hazardous Substances***Determination of Reportable Quantities For Hazardous Substances***State Certification of Activities Requiring a Federal License or Permit***EPA-Administered Permit Programs: The National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System***State Program Requirements***Procedures for Decisionmaking***Criteria and Standards for the National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System***Toxic Pollutant Effluent Standards***Water Quality Planning and Management***Water Quality Standards***Water Quality Guidance for the Great Lakes System***Secondary Treatment Regulation***Prior Notice of Citizen Suits***Guidelines Establishing Test Procedures for the Analysis of Pollutants***Marine Sanitation Device Standard**Drinking Water Act( et seq.)***National Primary Drinking Water Regulations***National Primary Drinking Water Regulations Implementation***National Secondary Drinking Water Regulations***Underground Injection Control (UIC) Program***State UIC Program Requirements***Underground Injection Control Program: Criteria and Standards***State Underground Injection Control Programs***Hazardous Waste Injection Restrictions***Sole Source Aquifers***Standards on the Contaminant Level of drinking water (microorganisms, viruses, turbidity, chemicals, chemicals, disinfectants and byproducts, radionuclides )*Subchapter E - Pesticide Programs (Parts 150 - 180)**Worker protection standards and enforcement by the Safety and Health Administration**Tolerances and exemptions from tolerances for pesticide chemicals in food**Standards for certification of commercial and private applicators*Subchapter F - Radiation Protection Programs (Parts 190 - 197)**Environmental radiation protection standards for nuclear power operations**Management and disposal of spent fuel, high-level and transuranic radioactive wastes**Protection standards for uranium and thorium mill tailings**Radon programs*Subchapter G - Noise Abatement Programs (Parts 201 - 211)**Noise emission standards for transportation equipment**Product noise labeling*Subchapter H - Ocean Dumping (Parts 220 - 238) based on the Ocean Dumping Ban Act ( et seq.)**ocean dumping, dredge and fill permit application process*Subchapter I - Solid Wastes (Parts 239 - 282) based on the Conservation and Recovery Act (RCRA)( et seq.)**Guidelines for the thermal processing (incineration) of wastes**Guidelines for the storage and collection of residential, commercial, and institutional solid waste** Criteria for classification of solid waste disposal facilities and practices**Criteria for municipal solid waste landfills**Identification and listing of hazardous waste**Technical standards and corrective action requirements for owners and operators of storage tanks (UST)*Subchapter J - Superfund (Parts 300 - 374) based on the Planning and Community Right-to-Know Act (EPCRA)()**Hazardous substances designation, reportable quantities, and notification**Hazardous chemical reporting: Community right-to-know**Toxic chemical release reporting: Community right-to-know*Subchapter N - Effluent Guidelines and Standards (Parts 400 - 471)  (Water Act)**General pretreatment regulations for existing and new sources of pollution**source categories:***products processing***mills***Canned and preserved fruits and vegetables processing***Canned and preserved seafood processing***Sugar processing***mills***Cement manufacturing***animal feeding operations (CAFO)***Electroplating***Organic chemicals, plastics, and synthetic fibers (OCPSF)***Inorganic chemicals manufacturing***Soap and detergent manufacturing***Fertilizer manufacturing***Petroleum refining***Iron and steel manufacturing***Nonferrous metals manufacturing***Phosphate manufacturing***Steam electric power generating***Ferroalloy manufacturing***Leather tanning and finishing***Glass manufacturing***Asbestos manufacturing***Rubber manufacturing***Timber products processing***Pulp, paper, and paperboard***Meat and poultry products***Metal finishing***Coal mining***Oil and gas extraction***Minerals mining and processing***Centralized waste treatment***Metal products and machinery***Pharmaceutical manufacturing***Ore mining and dressing (Hard rock mining)***Transportation equipment cleaning***Paving and roofing materials (Tars and asphalt)***Waste combustors***Landfills***Paint formulating***Ink formulating***Concentrated aquatic animal production (Aquaculture)***Gum and wood chemicals manufacturing***Pesticide chemicals***Explosives manufacturing***black manufacturing***processing***Hospitals***Battery manufacturing***Plastics molding and forming***Metal molding and Casting (Foundries)***Coil coating***Porcelain enameling***Aluminum forming***Copper forming***Electrical and electronic components***Nonferrous metals forming and metal powders*Subchapter O - Sewage Sludge (Parts 501 - 503)  (Water Act)*Subchapter Q - Energy Policy (Parts 600 - 610)*Subchapter R - Substances Control Act (Parts 700 - 799)*Subchapter U - Air Pollution Controls (Parts 1039 - 1068)**Air Act (1970)**Air Act (1990)Chapter IV - Environmental Protection Agency and Department of Justice(Part 1400)Chapter V - Council on Environmental Quality*Environmental Policy Act (Parts 1500 to 1509)(Parts 1510 - 1518)Chapter VI -- Chemical Safety and Hazard Investigation Board(Parts 1600-1620)Chapter VII -- Environmental Protection Agency and Department of Defense; Uniform National Discharge Standards for Vessels of the Armed Forces(Part 1700)References
15484977
China_Joe
right|150pxChina Joe (1834 - May 17/18, 1917, also nicknamed Joe the Baker(DeArmond, R. N..  The Founding of Juneau.  1967.)()) was a American merchant who worked in Alaska during its gold-mining boom days in the late 19th and early 20th centuries.His Chinese name is not known exactly, and varies from source to source:*As Hie in Juneau in 1881(*Chew Chung Thui(*Hi Ching as listed in an 1880 census conducted by the States Navy(*Hi Chung(Rickard, Thomas Arthur. Through the Yukon and Alaska, p. 22. San Francisco: Mining and Scientific Press, 1909.) in Juneau newspapers of 1892 and 1894, and upon joining the 87 Pioneers Association(*Lee Hing()*Ting Tu Wee or Chung Thui upon registering under a Chinese Registration Act of 1893(Joe first came to North America in 1864, landing in British Columbia and moving to Idaho.  He moved to the Cassiar region in 1874 and operated a bakery near Dease Lake.  He was known for fair prices of his goods, especially around 1875 when the areas primary supply route, the River, froze early and steamboats were unable to deliver things such as flour.(  He was well-known for his generosity toward miners.()He moved to Wrangell about 1878.  He purchased an abandoned steamwheeler named the Hope, built a restaurant and bakery in the hull, and rented out the staterooms.  The business worked well for about a year until Wrangell began to decline.  Joe then moved to Alaska and operated a bakery there.(In the summer of 1881 Joe moved to Juneau.  He bought half of a town lot on July 18 at the corner of Third and Main streets.  The estate cost $60USD.(  There he opened the citys first bakery,() where he lived for 36 years.  Supporters worked to keep Joe in Juneau when Chinese workers in the gold mine were forced out of the city in 1886.  Joe was proud to be an active member of the early Juneau community.(  He is buried in Juneaus Evergreen Cemetery.(References
15501793
Marietta,_Nevada
Marietta, Nevada, was a town in County, Nevada.  It is now a town.HistoryThe area was extensively prospected by the well-known prospector F.M. Borax Smith, and Marsh near Marietta is often credited with providing Smith his start in the borax business (having earlier been a more common silver and gold prospector).(Hildebrand, GH. (1982) Borax Pioneer: Francis Marion Smith. San Diego: Howell-North Books. ISBN 0-8310-7148-6)  However, before Smith came to the area it had been periodically mined for salt, which was used in the processing of ore in the City, NV, and CA mills.  The use of camels to transport salt to Virginia City has often been quoted, although there is some dispute whether this actually took place.  Mule teams were the more usual method of transporting the salt.  F.M. Smith began serious scraping and processing of the borax and salt deposits starting in 1867, mainly from deposits on nearby Teels Marsh. Marietta was formally established as a town in 1877, and soon contained several hundred people.  Exact figures are hard to verify, because many of the workers involved in the scraping process, and at the processing plant on Teels Marsh were Chinese, whose population figures were not accurately kept.  The town soon boasted 13 saloons, a post office, several stores (including the one owned and operated by Borax Smith), and many stone and adobe structures. Marietta was a rowdy camp, despite its size, and seemed to garner more than its fair share of criminal activity.  The stage service working to and from Marietta was reportedly robbed 30 times in 1880, within one week of that year alone it was robbed 4 times.  The towns isolated site made it an easy target for robberies, and for criminals to run freely. Despite the crime, scraping the marsh and processing the borax and salt was very lucrative, as was some small amount of gold and silver mining nearby.  For the better part of 20 years Marietta soldiered on.  However, starting in the early to mid 1890s, the markets for borax and salt had expanded from the central and western area of Nevada to the growing markets in southern California.  F.M. Smith had found much larger and more extensive borax deposits in the Valley, California area, and once he had established his works there, he closed down his operations in Marietta.  With this source of income gone, the town quickly faded, and was largely abandoned by the early 1900s.  In the 1930s some work in the nearby ranges in silver and gold operations saw a brief resurgence in the town, but this did not last long, and Marietta again slipped into obscurity.  There was yet another spate of activity in the 1950s and 60s, with the location of small amounts of uranium ore in the area, but it was never found in large quantities, and large scale activity was never undertaken.In the past 20 years there has been sporadic mineral exploration in the area. The newer industrial buildings in Marietta are mostly from this activity. A few people live in the area as caretakers.  One recent exploration company is The Great Western Mining Corporation, an Irish based exploration company, which concentrates on gold, silver and uranium exploration in the Little Huntoon Valley area near Marietta. Visitors to the site of Marietta should take care not to enter or trespass on any of these private properties while exploring the ruins of the town.Since 1991 the area is a federally (BLM) managed Wild Burro Range.  This  range, which includes the site of Marietta and Teels Marsh, is home to about 85 burros.  Small groups of the burros can often be found roaming among the ruins of Marietta. Location Marietta is at , at an elevation of 4947 feet (1508m).See alsoof ghost towns in NevadaReferences Stanley W. Paher (1999) The Nevada Ghost Towns and Mining Camps Illustrated Atlas, Volume 1: Northern Nevada: Reno, Austin, Ely and Points North (Las Vegas: Nevada Publications). External links * GhostTowns.Com:  Marietta, Nevada* Forgotten Nevada:  Marietta* Bureau of Land Management: Marietta Wild Burro Range* Marietta on Google Maps
15515988
Bert_Kelly
 footnotes Charles Robert Bert Kelly CMG (22 December 1912  17 January 1997),()  was an Australian politician and government minister.  He was influential in moving Australian political parties away from support for high-tariff policies.Kelly was born in South Australia and educated at Alfred College, Adelaide.  His father, Stan Kelly was a part-time Commissioner of the Commonwealth Tariff Board from 1929 to 1940, and supported its opposition to the high-tariff policies of successive Australian governments. He was a farmer before entering politics and in 1951, he was granted a Nuffield Fellowship to study farming in the United Kingdom.()()()Political careerKelly was elected as the Liberal Party member for the House of Representatives seat of Wakefield  at the 1958 election.  He was a passionate supporter of trade, when this was very much a minority opinion in Australia.  He was Minister for Works from February 1967 to February 1968 in the Holt and Gorton ministries and then Minister for the Navy until November 1969.  His period as minister may have been limited by his free trade views.(After Kellys departure from the ministry, he wrote a column in Australian Financial Review, Modest Member, supporting free trade.  When the seat of Angas was abolished in 1977, its member Giles beat Kelly for preselection for Wakefield.Kelly renamed his column Modest Farmer and it was published successively in the Australian Financial Review, Bulletin and Australian.  He was made Companion of the Most Distinguished of St Michael and St George (CMG) in 1980.  He was survived by his wife, Lorna and three sons.  His funeral was attended by former Labor Prime Minister Whitlam and Ray Evans, the former head of Mining Corporation and president of the right-wing R. Nicholls Society.((()Whitlam()Notes
15538897
Ixcateopan_de_Cuauhtmoc
footnotes               Ixcateopan de Cuauhtmoc is a town and municipality located in isolated, rugged mountains in the northern part of Guerrero state, Mexico.  It is best known as the final resting place of AztecEmperor Cuauhtmoc, whose remains were found under the parish church here in the mid-20th century. This church has been converted into a museum with displays a number of pre-Hispanic artifacts, offerings left in honor of the emperor and the remains of Cuauhtmoc himself.()Ixcateopan de Cuauhtmoc is located 36 km west of famous silver town of de Alarcn, traveling on the state highway. Unlike its neighbor, the vegetation surrounding Ixcateopan is forested with pine, red and white cedar, and walnut trees. Along the highway, there is a waterfall by the name of Cascada de Cacalotenango, which has a small chapel at the top.() The distance between Ixcateopan and Chilpancingo, the capital of the state of Guerrero, is 180 km.()The name Ixcateopan (sometimes spelled Ichcateopan) from the Nahuatl words ichcacates (or ixcatle) and moteopan, teopan, or  teopancalli. Most interpret the first word as meaning cotton and the second temple, leading to a translation of temple of cotton. However some sources claim the real name of the area is Zompancuahuithli, and the name  was changed to Ixcateopan after the arrival of Cuauhtemocs body and means (here is the temple/church). The glyph in the Mendoncino Codex for Ixcateopan reflects both interpretations, a cotton flower, a depiction of Cuauhtmoc and a pyramid.()() De Cuauhtmoc was added to Ixcateopans name by the Congress of the State of Guerrero in 1950.(HistorySome of the inhabitants of this area before the Conquest were the Cohuixas and the Chontals. The indigenous community located at what is now the southern edge of the town dates back to at least 350 C. E. This community was an important regional ceremonial center as well as the headquarters for the guardian soldiers. It was also closely associated with the production of cotton and cotton products, a valuable commodity at the time. Ixcateopan was one of the last cities to be subjugated by the Empire. The location served as a point to gather and then distribute tribute from surrounding areas. Mexica from other parts of the Aztec Empire, including soldiers, came here due to the wars between them and the Purhpecha empire. Because of this, Ixcateopan, originally a purely Chontal city, became multicultural.(()Cuauhtmoc, the last Aztec emperor, was born here in 1501. His mother, Cuayauhtitali, was the daughter of the lord of Ixcateopan.  Shortly before Cuauhtmoc was born, Ixcateopan was subjugated by the Aztecs and Cuayauhtitli was captured and brought to Tenochtitlan. There she met prince Ahuizotl, who married her. Cuahtmoc was born of this union. Cuauhtmoc was educated in Tenochtitlan and then sent back to Ixcateopan. In 1519, he was called back to the Aztec capital to help defend it against the Spanish. After the deaths of Emperors II and, a short time later, Cuitlhuac, Cuauhtmoc became emperor, but was a captive of Corts when Tenochtitlan fell in 1521. After enduring much torture, he and nine other Aztec lords were hung near a place called Izancnac in what is now Chiapas state.( The remains of Cuauhtemoc, the other Aztec lords and a priest who opposed their execution were brought to Ixcateopan and buried here.()  From that time to the mid-twentieth century, the whereabouts of his tomb remained unknown.(Fray Torbio de Benavente, the local evangelist, and Fray de Sahagn wrote texts about the death and burial of Cuauhtmoc which were initially kept at the Church of San Hiplito in City but somehow wound up in the hands of the family of Salvador Rodriguez Jurez, who was the doctor of Ixcateopan in the first half of the 20th century.(  The documents had been passed down in his family for generations. They told of how Cuauhtmocs body had been recovered and brought to Ixcateopan and initially buried at the palace of his maternal grandparents in 1525. In 1529, Fray Toribio de Benavente had the body moved to a spot in front of the destroyed pagan temple, where the Church of Santa Mara de la Asuncin would be built over him. The documents indicated that this tomb was nearly directly under the main altar of the church. After Rodrguez Jurez showed the documents to elders at the parish church,  the Instituto Nacional de Antropologa e Historia (INAH) was contacted, which sent archeologist Guzmn to investigate the authenticity of the documents. After examining the documents, investigating the oral traditions of the area and other archeological and historical evidence, it was decided to excavate in the place where the documents indicated.(From February to September 1949, other investigations corroborated the story related by the documents. The main altar of the church was dismantled and taken away and began to excavate below it.  They dug about 1.5 meters down, found a rock layer, which covered a multitude of burials which dated from the early colonial period. Another meter or so down, they found a layer of stucco and adobe bricks, then a layer of large rocks with spaces between them filled in by smaller ones, called a momeztli. Underneath this was a cavity with an east-west orientation were the remains of several bodies dating from the 16th century. Underneath these was another cavity covered in an oval copper plate with the inscription Rey e S. Coatemo. (rey means king in Spanish and Coatemo as an alternative spelling for Cuauhtmoc) Underneath this were other bones, a spear-point, other pieces of metal  and remnants of objects long ago rusted. The discovery of Cuauhtemocs tomb was announced on 26 September 1949.(The authenticity of the find was challenged, so the INAH sent other teams to investigate the find. Results of the corroborative efforts were mixed with researchers casting doubt on the age of the bones found, the documents that led to their discovery and the authenticity of the artifacts found at the site. However, over time and with new testing techniques, these objections were overcome one-by-one and by the 1970s the find had become accepted as genuine.(The townThe town of Ixcateopan has about 2,400 residents, which is over a third of the municipalitys inhabitants.() One thing that stands out about this town is that streets are paved in unpolished white marble and many of the walls around properties contain it as well.( The town of Ixcateopan has similar colonial architecture as the larger Taxco: white houses topped with peaked roofs with red clay tile roofs; however, they are not as well-maintained as those in Taxco.(  Because of the discovery of Cuauhtmocs tomb here, Ixcateopan has become a place of national interest. Flags fly here at half mast on 28 February, the anniversary of Cuauhtmocs death.(  Because of the discovery of the tomb of Cuauhtemoc and the continued discoveries at the archeological site on the southern edge of town, Ixcateopan draws archeologists, anthropologist and historians.((Museum of Santa Mara de la AsuncinThe Museum of Santa Mara de la Asuncin, located just south of the main plaza in the center of town, was the parish church for the community from the 16th century until the mid-20th, when it was declared a national monument. Since the discovery of Cuauhtmocs tomb under the main altar, this building and its grounds have been converted from a religious sanctuary to a civil one.  Most, but not all, of its Christian iconography has been taken out. Where the main altar used to be is now a shrine to the last Aztec emperor, with his remains on public display. A small museum occupies the former churchs annex.(( Jairo Rodrguez, son of the doctor who made the documents about Cuauhtemocs burial public knowledge, is the official chronicler of Ixcateopan and the guardian of the museum.(Annual ceremony in honor of CuauhtmocCuauhtemoc has become a symbol of Mexican cultural identity and for many dancers who come here to celebrate, a symbol of their modern identity.() Cuauhtmoc has become a symbol of ethnocultural identity, nationalism and resistance, and this place brings indigenous people from all over Mexico and other nations in the Americas.  The end of February is important as Cuauhtmocs birthday (23 February) and death (28 February) are commemorated here. His day of birth draws the most dance groups who come from all over Mexico, the U.S., Canada and South America, to lay offerings, dance and sing in many different languages.( Preparations at the church/museum and the rest of the town occupy the days and nights before the 23rd. For several days straddling the birthday itself, dances and ceremonies continue almost non-stop, accompanies by huehuetls (Aztec drums), and wind instruments made of animal horns and large conch shells and accompanied by copal incense.(Archeological zoneSouth of the Santa Mara de la Asuncin  Museum on Vicente Guerrero Street is the archeological zone of Ixcateopan.( The site has been dated from between 350 and 1450 C. E. with at least five construction stages,( three of which are dated from between 1350  and 1450 C.E. Although construction seemed to have ceased after 1450, it is known that the site was occupied up until the Spanish arrival in 1521.() The archeological zone is formed by a series of constructions over a natural elevation and occupied about 5,000 metros2. Local materials were used in its construction: flagstone, limestone, marble and smooth pebble which were covered in stucco and painted. This excavated complex was dedicated to religious ceremonies, administrative activities and the local hierarchys relations with the rest of the world. Religiously, it was of regional importance.(Ixcateopan was a Chontal settlement that was conquered by the Aztecs, by I and Ahuitzotl. The Chontales are a little-known group with most information about them coming from documents written in 1579, but nothing of their language is known as no human remains from their burials have been found. stages The site has provided much information about the development of what is now the north of Guerrero state in the late pre-Hispanic period, when it was populated by groups such as the Matlatzincas, Tepoztecos, Nahuas as well as Chontales.(The site was first excavated in 1976 by archeologist Juan Yaven, with subsequent studies by Guadalupe Martnez, Alajandro Pastrana, Jos Hernndez Rivera and Elizabeth Jimnez.( However, excavations in the mid 2000s have uncovered new finds at the site including a set of stairs that run from south to north on the main plaza, dwellings and storage facilities as well as workshops with ceramics showing Aztec and Cholulteca influence and purely local designs. With these, it is possible to reconstruct something of these peoples relations with these groups. Most of the excavations here have followed an east-west axis and about 3,000 m2 have been explored. Efforts have been made to have Ixcateopan and archeological monuments zone as well as obtain resources to continue excavations here.(The municipalityThe municipality of Ixcateopan is part of the northern region of Guerrero state. It borders the municipalities of Taxco, Ascencio Alquisiras and Teloloapan. As much of its 310.7km2 territory is on the Volcanic Belt, it consists of very rugged terrain. This has made the municipality and its seat relatively isolated, with the first major road reaching it in the 1940s. Higher elevations here are covered in pine and cedar (red and white) and include peaks such as the Texal Grande, Tecampanero, La Mesas and Ancn Mountains, which range between 1,830 and 2,150 meters above sea level. Only 15% of the municipality is flat land, and this is mostly small mesas scattered in the south and north east of the municipality. The municipality is in the River Basin but only streams such as the Atenanguillo, San Pedro Atengo, Salitre flow year-round. There is one major fresh-water spring at the municipal seat but the rest of the municipality depends on groundwater. The climate is warm and fairly moist, with average temperatures ranging between 18 and 22 C in the warmer months and between 17 and 22C in the colder ones. Most of the municipalitys rain falls between June and September.( Unlike many other municipalities in Mexico, the population of Ixcateopan is falling. From 1960 to 2005, the population has valled from over 8,000 to 6,100. Most of the population is scattered among 70 localidades of between 2 and 1000, with most between 70 and 200 people.((About 32% of the municipalities population is dedicated to agriculture of which the production of beans stand out, but livestock such as pigs, sheep, goats and horses are raised here as well. Another 38% is involved in mining and manufacturing with the primary commodities being marble and hand-crafted furniture.(ReferencesExternal links* http://redocelotl.wordpress.com/about/de Cuauhtmoc (komunumo)de Cuauhtmoc
15560134
Taiga_Shield_Ecozone_(CEC)
The Taiga Shield Ecozone is an ecozone which stretches across Canadas subarctic region. Some regions exhibit exposed Precambrian bedrock of the Shield, the oldest of the worlds geological formations.( ) The worlds oldest rocks, dating to four billion years, are found in the Canadian Shield north of Slave Lake.( )GeographyThe Taiga Shield ecozone covers almost all of the eastern area of the Territories, a tiny corner of northeastern Alberta, a narrow strip of all northern Saskatchewan and northwestern Manitoba, as well as all some parts of southern Nunavut. Here, it is interrupted by Bay, where it abuts with the marine ecozone of the Archipelago Marine, and resumes on the eastern shores of Hudson Bay on the coast of Quebec, where it continues in a consistently-wide strip towards the ocean, encompassing all but a small portion of Labrador. It is one of the largest ecozones in Canada, covering 1.3 million square kilometres.(Terrain is typically flat or rolling hills() with thousands of depressions carved by retreat now infilled, forming lakes, ponds, wetlands and other water features.(( Long eskers and uplands are also common.()SettlementsPrimarily wilderness, the Taiga Shield is sparsely populated, with approximately 340,000 inhabitants, over 60% of which is Nations.( ) Most settled areas developed around mining or hydroelectric activity, for example in Yellowknife and City in the west and City in the east, but are isolated from other communities. Mineral extraction is the most important economic activity, with iron being mined in Quebec and Labrador, uranium in Saskatchewan, and gold and more recently diamonds in the Northwest Territories.(ClimateThis subarctic zone experiences cool summers that are short, with at least 24 hours of full daylight a year in its most northern reaches, and winters that are extremely cold and long, with at least one 24-hour period of complete darkness.( Precipitation ranges from 250 to 500 mm (10-20 in.) annually throughout the zone, except in Labrador which may receive up to 800 mm (31 in.) along its coast, and typically increases from west to east.(The shallow soils remain damp, even soggy, year-round, and regularly freeze and thaw without drainage. This leads to shifting soil that randomly tilts growing trees, which has been likened to a drunken forest.( )References
15581250
John_Casey_(commentator)
John Christopher Casey J.P. (born 30 June 1964) is an Australian journalist and sports broadcaster. With a media career spanning three decades he is a versatile and respected host and play-by-play commentator who was the first person ever seen live on Australian Pay TV when it commenced in 1995. Early life & education John was born in the mining town of Hill, New South Wales. He was educated at Burke Ward Primary School and Broken Hill High School, earning the vice-presidency of the Student Representative Council at the latter institution.While a student he led the school band, was an athletics champion and helped NSW win a national schoolboys Australian football title in the 1979 Shell Cup(Broken Hill High School Yearbook 1979)Career as a journalistJohn started writing for the Barrier Daily Truth newspaper as a 16-year-old in 1981 and upon completion of his cadetship moved to Melbourne and joined The Sun News-Pictorial where, as a general news reporter, he wrote numerous front page stories.(Hawke joins milk war page 1, The Sun Saturday 16/2/85)(AIDS link in blood agents page 1, The Sun Monday 5/11/84)(Anthrax toll up to 11 page 1, The Sun Monday 11/3/85) In 1985 John joined The News in Adelaide as a sports journalist and combined this role with duties for the Sunday Mail where he was chief racing sub-editor.Electronic mediaAfter seven years service with newspapers in three states, John then began his television career as an on-camera sports presenter with SAS-10 (later to become SAS-7). As well as reading the weekend sports news, he also honed his skills as a commentator on national tennis telecasts and hosted the National Basketball League coverage.During this time he also presented sports breaks for radio stations 5KA and 5AA.In 1990-91 John became the first ever sports journalist contracted to Channel 7s London bureau(Sunday Mail, TV Plus 27/5/90 page 5) and covered events such as Wimbledon tennis, British Open golf at St Andrews, FA Cup finals, Prix de lArc de Triomphe at Longchamp, Formula One and Susie Maroneys epic English Channel swim.On his return to Australia in 1992, John moved to Sydney and took up a position as senior reporter with Channel 7s national prime time sports program Seasons while also reading news on 11am and the weekend sports breaks for ATN-7. During this time his on the road assignments included the 1993 World Cup soccer qualifier in Argentina and the 1994 Commonwealth Games in Canada.Pay televisionHaving gathered experience with Television plc and Satellite Broadcasting in London(Back in the main game The Sun, Wednesday 24/3/04) John was recruited to help launch pay television in Australia, which debuted in 1995 with the Premier Sports Network.Television legend Ron Casey (no relation) was to have been the first person seen live on Australian pay-TV, but a technical breakdown prevented this and it was left to John to utter the first words live to camera(The Age, Sporting Life, 5/3/07)Fox SportsAs the longest serving on-air personality at Fox Sports,(Our experts - Main Game - Fox Sports) John has commentated on a wide range of events from AFL, NRL, world record swims from Ian Thorpe and Susie ONeill, world title fights involving Tszyu and Mundine, PGA golf tour, Wimbledon and U.S. Open tennis as well as national titles in athletics and hockey.However, he is best known for his work on National Basketball League telecasts which he has hosted since 1995, leading the play-by-play commentary in almost 1000 NBL and WNBL games combined.John also called basketball at the 2000 Sydney Olympic Games, including Australias quarter-final win over Italy. Basketball was one of three sports John called at the Olympics, along with football and boxing.Studio shows he has hosted for Fox Sports include Main Game and The Back Page.(Brave new world of sports presenting, David Kirkpatrick, The Canberra Times, 6/10/95)Print mediaJohn worked briefly for the Daily in Victoria in 2010, before returning to his hometown of Broken Hill to take on the role of General Manager and Managing Editor of the Daily Truth.(Surprise Changes at BDT, The Barrier Daily Truth, September 09, 2010, accessed November 22, 2010.) Other * 1983 appointed by His Excellency the Governor as a Justice of the Peace for the State of New South Wales.* 1989 part of the team led by Stewart Ginn which won the South Australian Open pro-am golf title.* 1991 elected councillor for Albert Park Ward of Woodville City Council, South Australia.(Off Air TV Week, page 52, 16/11/91)* 1992 Named Best Sportscaster in the Better Hearing Australia Clear Speech Awards. He was also named by Cleo magazine as one of the 50 most eligible bachelors in Australia.(The Advertiser, Thursday 26/11/92.) References  External links * Starting 5 - Fox Sports
15611991
Albian_Sands
Albian Sands Energy Inc. is the operator of the Muskeg River Mine, an sands mining project located  north of McMurray, Alberta, Canada. It is a joint venture between Canada (60%), Marathon Oil Canada (20%) and Chevron Canada (20%).  The companys legal headquarters are located in the Shell Tower in Calgary, Alberta. Albian Sands got its name from the Albian Boreal Sea which, during the Albian stage of the Cretaceous (over 100 million years ago), moved over the McMurray sands and deposited a blanket of marine shale on its floor which trapped the hydrocarbons of the McMurray Formation. The oil sands resources of the Muskeg River Mine are a legacy of the Albian Sea.()At full production, the Muskeg River Mine can produce  of crude bitumen, a naturally occurring semi-solid form of crude oil. The mine product, diluted bitumen or dilbit, is sent to be upgraded at the Upgrader in Saskatchewan, Alberta. The Muskeg River Mine stands on a Shell Canada lease containing more than  of mineable bitumen, of which it is expected to recover  of bitumen over the next 30 years. The Muskeg River Mine and the Scotford Upgrader together comprise the Athabasca Oil Sands Project (AOSP).()A proposed future mine expansion would increase production to between  and .( )()() The  (incremental) expansion project received regulatory approval in late 2006.(Muskeg River Mine Receives Regulatory Approval 21 December 2006)At the mine site, the 175 megawatt MRM Cogeneration plant owned 70% by ATCO Power and 30% by SaskPower supplies process steam and electricity to the mine. 50% of the electricity produced is surplus to mine needs and is sold into the Alberta grid.( )(MRM Cogeneration Station Sask Power International accessed 7 February 2008) The Corridor Pipeline which transports diluted bitumen from the Muskeg River Mine to the Scotford Upgrader is owned by Gas. To accommodate its workforce, the project has built a 2460 room village with service and recreation facilities.()The project is using satellite based imaging to ensure transparent reporting of its land use.() References External links* Albian Sands website
15626771
Hendrick_Manufacturing_Company
Hendrick Manufacturing Company is an American metal manufacturer founded in 1876 in Pennsylvania, where it is still based.  Over the years, additional manufacturing locations were established in California, Tennessee, Kentucky and Illinois. Plants in Pennsylvania, Kentucky and Illinois are still in operation.HistoryEli HendrickBorn in 1832, Eli Hendrick apprenticed as a wood turner in his native Michigan.  He served a tour of duty as a US Express mail carrier in Iowa.  He also practiced his craft as a turner of ornamental wooden porch pillars during the early years of the 19th century before moving east to Pennsylvania, in 1850s.A man from Canada, sold Eli a formula for the manufacture of oil for the then-considerable sum of $10.  The formula turned out to be worthless, but it sparked Mr. Hendricks interest in the refining of oil.  Eli quickly developed a very worthwhile formula and process of his own, producing quality lubricating products mainly for the railroads.  So was born the Hendrick Company.Sensing that a refinery would be most profitable if it were located near its customers, Mr. Hendrick relocated his refinery to Carbondale in 1860 in order to be near several large railroads.For the next dozen years, the company flourished, developing such new products as Galena Signal Oil, an extra-fine kerosene for railway lighting.  The company also developed Plumboleum, a box lubricant that remained a basic ingredient of automotive lubricants for 75 years.The presses used in the refining process consisted of mats of woven wire and canvas.  In constant use, the wire eventually was abraded to the point where it pierced the canvas, reducing the efficiency of the filter.  Mr. Hendrick reasoned that a metal sheet, properly perforated, could replace the canvas-and-wire filter, giving it a longer life.  Several tries at drilling holes, first individually, then in a multiple drill-press proved that the concept was sound, but the production process was too costly.  He then conceived the idea of punching holes simultaneously in the sheet metal.  The metal-punching machine he developed was a pilot for the modern press and the foundation upon which Hendrick Manufacturing Company was started in 1876.Over the next 100 years, the company steadily expanded its technology and its product lines, branching out from the original oil and coal industries into aggregate, iron, steel, paper, handling, construction and other industries where perforated or slotted sheets of material are required.California Perforating CompanyIn 1884, California Perforating Screen Company (Cal-Perf) was founded by the Wagner family to manufacture hammer mill and grain-cleaning screens for Californias growing agricultural industry.  These items were produced on throat presses using tooling limited to 6 lengths.  In order to penetrate additional markets, Cal-Perf purchased stock-size sheets and light plates that were perforated on multi-punch, all-across presses operated by the Eastern and Mid-Western perforators at the time.  Cal-Perf stocked these sheets for resale in its Francisco warehouse.Hendrick Manufacturing Company purchased California Perforating Screen Company in 1966 and moved the operation into a larger facility.  This larger plant could accommodate additional throat presses and supporting equipment such as shears, straightening rolls, press brakes and bending rolls.  Three new, multi-punch, all-across presses were added to product custom perforated sheets that were being purchased at the time from Hendricks Carbondale plant. Under Hendrick ownership, Cal-Perf grew from an office manager and four plant operators to a total of 23 employees.When the lease on the San Francisco facility expired in 1982, Hendrick moved the Cal-Perf operations to California, in order to be closer to the Angeles market. At the same time, in order to gain warehouse space and a sales office, Hendrick purchased Berglund Perforated Metal in Los Angeles.  In 1985, at the termination of the purchase agreement, Hendrick merged the operations of Berglund into Cal-Perf.Profile screensHendrick Manufacturing Company first entered the screen market in the early days of War II.  This demand was created when the US supply of profile screens from Germany were cut off.  At that time, Hendrick was asked to furnish perforated u-clips to the Wedge Bar Screen Corporation, a small manufacturer of profile screens located in New York.In 1943, Fred Goldbeck joined the sales force in Hendricks New York office.  Goldbeck was very knowledgeable in the use of profile screens.  The sales department grew rapidly in 1945-1946 as he spearheaded the efforts to manufacture complete profile screens for the coal, mining and paper industries.The market for screens increased rapidly after World War II.  Hendrick Manufacturing Company began to import fine wire screens from Aumeca, a Belgian firm.  In 1953, Greening, a company located in England was selected to supply wedge wire screens for Hendrick.  Greening introduced a series of mini-wedge wire screens and Hendrick abandoned the Aumeca screens from that point forward.In 1969, Hendrick employed Leon Bixby to serve as product manager for profile screens.  Bixbys father had previously worked in design and development of profile screens for the Wedge Wire Screen Corporation of Ohio, which had been started by his father. Bixby brought new success to the profile screen business for Hendrick.  In the early 1970s, he convinced ownership that profile screens would always be considered a secondary product as long as they were manufactured in Carbondale alongside the far more popular perforated metal products. Because the largest market for profile screens was the coal industry that was growing rapidly in West Virginia, Ohio, Kentucky and Indiana, Hendrick chose Kentucky, for the site of the Hendrick Screen Company. This was a separate incorporation which opened up in a brand new facility in 1974.Since then, Hendrick Screen Company has expanded into other markets such as treatment, water intake, petrochemical, dewatering, and architectural.Tennessee PerforatingIn 1971, Hendrick Manufacturing Company commissioned the Institute of Technology to evaluate demand for perforated metal in the nine states of the United States.  The study supported the idea of a satellite location.  Unfortunately, Hendrick did not move on this information quickly and the competition opened plants in the Southeast during the late 1970s.In 1984, Hendrick conducted a site survey and determined that Tennessee, was a good location to service the southeast and still be competitively located to service the Midwest.  A new plant was opened with three 36 wide high-speed, all-across perforating presses relocated from the Carbondale plant.  These presses were selected to supply a full range of light gauge, small hole perforations in materials up to 18 gauge thickness.  The associated equipment was installed and operations began in September 1984.Sources*  Hendrick drawings in the Smithsonian* Invoice from 1894* Development of deburring machine* Metalworking Fluids by Jerry Byers, ISBN 978-0824792015, 1994* PlumboluemExternal links* Hendrick Screen Company website* Hendrick Metal Products website* Hendrick Manufacturing website* Hendrick Architectural Products website
15640030
Boreal_Cordillera_Ecozone_(CEC)
:This article is about an ecozone.  For the physiographic units covering roughly the same region please see Mountains, Mountains, Ranges, Plateau and Ranges.The Boreal Cordillera is a Canadian terrestrial ecozone occupying most of the northern third of Columbia and southern half of the Yukon. Within it is found National Park and Reserve, and a small portion of the southern range of National Park Reserve.() Most of the areas population is based in the city of Whitehorse, and it contains most of the Yukons population. The portion in British Columbia is barely populated.( )The main economic activity is mining, particularly of gold, which discovery in the region led to the Gold Rush.() In addition to the areas rich deposits, active industries exist in forestry and tourism.()GeographyThis mountainous ecozone is between the Montane Cordillera Ecozone to the south-east and the Taiga Cordillera Ecozone to the north. The three zones contain the Rockies. To the east are the Plains, and to the west is Alaska, though the ecozone is also adjacent to narrow strips of the Maritime. It is characterized by tall peaks and extensive plateaux.() The northern plateaux within the ecozone have a fairly gentle terrain, broken by numerous watercourses running through them, and are separated by wide valleys and their lowlands.(Just over 15% of the Boreal Cordillera, or roughly 73,320 km consists of wetlands, of which 92% is treed wetland.() It covers a total area of 471,400 km, with 241,240 km of forest cover, of which 78.6% is softwood, 17.8% is mixedwood, and 3.6 is hardwood.( The spruce beetle has been proliferating since the 1990s, and has destroyed vast areas of the spruce forest. The ecozone contains four forest regions - tundra, sub-alpine, coast, and boreal.() There is also concern that the softwood harvest in southeastern Yukon does not have adequate natural regeneration.()ClimateThe interior intermontane plateau receive about 400 mm of annual precipitation, much less than the 1000 to 1500 mm levels in the eastern mountains, and the even higher levels in the western mountains.( Snowfall accounts for 35 to 60% of all precipitation.( ) Winters are long and cold, with January mean temperatures between -15C and -27C. Summers are warm but short, with July mean temperatures between 12C and 15C.(Alpine weather is more typical beyond the line at elevations above 1000 m, where frost can develop year-round.( Average temperatures here remain below freezing for most of the year, and snowfall accounts for at least 70% of precipitation.( Permafrost is typical in these regions, allowing for the growth of only shrubs, mosses and lichens.()Sudden violent storms may occur in the area during the summer, usually due to moist air masses arriving from the Ocean.( Usually, however, the Pacific moderates the climate in this ecozone.References
15667007
Wilmington_Star_Mining_Co._v._Fulton
Wilmington Star Mining Co. v. Fulton, , was a case on whether it is an appropriate exercise of the police power of the state to regulate the use of mining properties, and mine owners are not deprived of their property, privileges, or immunities without due process of law or denied the equal protection of the laws by the Illinois mining statute of 1899, which requires the employment of only licensed mine managers and mine examiners and imposes upon the mine owners liability for the willful failure of the manager and examiner to furnish a reasonably safe place for the workmen.(Wilmington Star Mining Co. v. Fulton, 205 U.S. 60 (1907) Justia.com )It is within the power of the state to change or modify, in accord with its conceptions of public policy, the principles of the common law in regard to the relation of master and servant, and in cases within the proper scope of the police power, to impose upon the master liability for the willful act of his employee.As construed by the highest court of that state, under the Mining Act of Illinois of 1899, a mine manager and mine examiner are vice-principals of the owner and engaged in the performance of duties which the owner cannot so delegate to others as to relieve himself from responsibility.Where two concurring causes contribute to an accident to an employee, the fact that the master is not responsible for one of them does not absolve him from liability for the other cause for which he is responsible.Where there is no evidence sustaining certain counts in the declaration as to defendants negligence, he is entitled to an instruction that no recovery can be had under those counts, and where. as it was in this case. the refusal to so instruct is prejudicial error, the verdict cannot be maintained either at law or under  57 of the Illinois Practice Act.See also*of United States Supreme Court cases, volume 205References
15688037
Pine_Creek_Rail_Trail
Image:Pine Creek Rail Trail Bridge in Waterville.JPG|right|thumb|The rail trail uses a former York Central Railroad bridge to cross over Pine Creek in WatervilleThe Pine Creek Rail Trail is a trail in the Mountains of north-central Pennsylvania.The trail begins just north of Wellsboro, runs south through Creek Gorge (also known as the Grand Canyon of Pennsylvania), and ends in Jersey Shore. A 2001 article in Today named the  long trail one of 10 great places to take a bike tour in the world.( )( )RouteThe Pine Creek Rail Trail is approximately  from end to end, and it generally follows a north-south orientation. The trail is located wholly within Tioga and Lycoming Counties.The trails northern terminus is near the intersection of Route 6 and Route 287, about  north of Wellsboro. (Parking is located at the southernmost end of Butler Road).  The trail parallels Route 6 in a southwesterly direction for about  until it reaches the village of Ansonia. South of Ansonia, the trail parallels Pine Creek as it goes south along the floor of Pine Creek Gorge. It passes through Harrison State Park and the State Forest. Approximately  south of Ansonia, the trail passes through the village of Blackwell.( The section between Ansonia and Blackwell is very remote, and much of the trail is inaccessible by road.South of Blackwell, the trail enters Lycoming County and the State Forest. It parallels Route 414 for about . Pennsylvania Route 414 ends near the unincorporated village of Waterville. South of Waterville, the trail parallels Route 44 for approximately  until the trail reaches its southern terminus in Jersey Shore. (Parking at Railroad St. and Humes St.) Between Blackwell and Jersey Shore, the trail crosses the highway and Pine Creek several times, and it is almost always within sight of both the road and the creek.thumb|right|Pine Creek Rail Trail near Blackwell (2005)Boroughs, villages, and attractions located along or near the trail (from north to south):* Wellsboro is located about  from the trails northern terminus.* Asaph* Ansonia* Harrison State Park* Point State Park is located on the western side of Pine Creek, but no public bridges span the creek between Ansonia and Blackwell.* State Forest* Tiadaghton* Blackwell* State Forest* Cedar Run (Brown Township)* Slate Run* Cammal (McHenry Township)* Jersey Mills* Waterville (Cummings Township)* Pine State Park is located about  north of Waterville.* Watson Township* Porter Township* Jersey ShoreHistoryCreek Rail Trail 2.JPG|thumb|right|Pine Creek and the rail trail north of Waterville  in Cummings Township in Lycoming County The Native American Creek Path followed Pine Creek from Jersey Shore to Ansonia and beyond. The earliest industry in the region was logging. In the years between 1820 and 1883, trees were floated down the creek to sawmills in Jersey Shore and Williamsport. In 1883, the Shore, Pine Creek and Buffalo Railway opened. Sawmills were constructed in several communities along the creek, and finished products were carried out by train. mining was another important industry, and coal was also shipped along the railroad.After a series of reorganizations, the railroad along Pine Creek became a part of the York Central Railroad and eventually Conrail. Freight and passenger service continued for many years. In 1988, Conrail ended rail service. The tracks were removed, and the first section of the Pine Creek Rail Trail opened in 1996.() The trail opened in stages with the most recent section (from Ansonia to just north of Wellsboro) being completed in 2007.() The trail is operated by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources. In 2001, an article in the Today newspaper named the Pine Creek Rail Trail one of 10 great places to take a bike tour in the world. It was one of only five places in the continental United States on the list, which was compiled by Patricia Vance, author of touring guides. The article cited the Grand Canyon of Pennsylvania as idyllic in fall and mentioned the gorge with views of the cliffs and mixed hardwood forest.(During the Depression, the Conservation Corps built numerous roads, bridges, and trails through the area.() Evidence of their work is still visible and is commemorated with a sign near the Darling Run trail access area.Activitiesthumb|right|Hiker on the Pine Creek Rail Trail just north of Blackwell in Tioga County, Pennsylvania.The trail is relatively flat with only gentle grades. It is topped with crushed limestone. Bicycling and hiking are extremely popular during the spring, summer, and fall. The trail provides opportunities for skiing during the winter. Between Ansonia and Tiadaghton, riding is permitted on the trail.The trail intersects with several hiking trails, including the Mid State Trail. During some parts of the year, Pine Creek provides excellent opportunities for fishing, canoeing, and kayaking. However, the water level in the creek varies significantly, and it is sometimes too shallow for boating.Wildlife viewing is also popular. Hawks and other large birds are commonly seen along the trail. Canada geese and ducks are also common. Bald Eagles are occasionally seen in the area. Bears and deer live in the wooded areas and are seen along the trail.Without a written permit from the Pennsylvania Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, motorized vehicles are strictly forbidden from using the trail. This ban includes motorcycles, snowmobiles and vehicles.Camping is allowed only in certain areas such as Bonell Flats and Black Walnut Bottom along the trail, and permits for these locations must be obtained in advance from the Pennsylvania Department of Conservation and Natural Resources. Several private campgrounds are located near the trail. Numerous lodging establishments are available in Wellsboro and Jersey Shore. There are also small lodging establishments located in Blackwell and Cedar Run, and private cabin rentals are available along the trail.Parking areas and toilets are available at regular intervals along the entire length of the trail. Several water pumps are provided along the trail, but trail users should carry enough water to last for the duration of their trips. The boroughs of Wellsboro and Jersey Shore offer a full array of services and supplies. Restaurants are located in Blackwell, Cedar Run, Slate Run and Waterville. Gasoline and other supplies are available at stores located in Ansonia, Slate Run and Waterville.Future expansionThe final section of the trail opened in 2007, and there are no immediate plans to expand the trail at this time.() Several groups have proposed expanding the trail into the borough of Wellsboro or building a trail along the Branch Susquehanna River between Jersey Shore and Williamsport.See also*of rail trails in Pennsylvaniawww.pinecrk.com ~Pine Creek Outfitters~  External links*Pine Creek Gorge*Leonard Harrison State Park*History of the Tioga State Forest*trail map with business list*Tioga County Visitors Bureau site (their trail map lacks business list)*Blackwell Hotel & Restaurant (located on the trail)*Cedar Run Inn (located on the trail)*RailsToTrails.us Pine Creek Trail PageReferences
15710368
Bicentennial_National_Trail
thumb|270px|Georges Creekthumb|Brian Taylor PlaqueThe Bicentennial National Trail (BNT), formerly known as the National Horse Trail(Bicentennial National Trail Retrieved 2009-10-10) is the longest marked multi-use trail in the world, stretching 5,330 kilometres from Cooktown, through South Wales to Healesville, 60 km north-east of Melbourne. This trail runs the length of the rugged Dividing Range through parks, private property and alongside of areas. The BNT trail follows old coach roads, routes, brumby tracks, rivers and fire trails. It was originally intended for horses, but is these days promoted also for cycling and walking. However is not yet entirely suited to these two activities.(http://www.john.chapman.name/bicent.html)HistoryThe trail was initiated and planned by the Australian Trail Horse Riders Association. The association spent many years planning and negotiating a route that linked up the mustering, brumby tracks,  horse trails, historic coach roads and stock routes, thus providing an opportunity to legally ride the routes of stockmen and drovers who once travelled these areas.() thumb|Trail MarkerThe development of this image was left to a committee led by M. Williams. Dan Seymour was sponsored by R.M. Williams to find a route along the Dividing Range, and to promote enthusiasm for the proposal. Dan volunteered to ride the Trail and set off from Gully, Victoria in February 1972 with two saddle horses, a packhorse and Bluey his heeler cattle dog. The Australian Trail Horse Riders Association provided Dan with encouragement during this lengthy journey. His amazing twenty-one month ride finished in Queensland in September 1973. Dans journey, which was regularly reported, created increased interest in the formation of the Trail.The development of this image was left to a committee led by R. M. Williams and coordinated and planned by Brian Taylor http://www.aswagofmemories.com/aboutauthor/trail in cooperation with the Australian Trail Horse Riders Association affiliated clubs, farmers, landowners and government agencies.thumb|Medallion presented to those who carried the first mail on the BNTIn 1978 the first mail was carried along the route, initially known as the National Horse Trail, from Cooktown by a group of registered riders. These riders were acknowledged with a commemorative medallion.The Trail committee proposed that the concept be made a project to celebrate Australias Bicentenary in 1988. The suggestion was accepted, and funding of $300,000 was available to research, mark a route and print guidebooks. In November 1988, this had been accomplished and the Bicentennial National Trail was opened.  The office in Toowoomba has now closed and the Bicentennial National Trail is run from a mobile office, currently in New South Wales. Since the opening of the trail people have travelled all or a part of the trail with camels and donkeys as well as with horses and mountain bikes.Bicentennial National Trail RidersFrom Cooktown to Healesville 5330 km &From Healesville to Cooktown 5330 km1989 *Ken Roberts and Sharon Muir Watson (south with Horses Cooktown  to Healesville)The first horse riders North to South.1991 *Arlene  Christopherson, (north with horses Healesville to Cooktown) The first horse rider South to North.*Anthony Mair and Melissa Weeks, (heading north with horses from Healsville to Cooktowwn)1994 *Gabrielle Schenk (south with horses Cooktown to Healesville)1995*Darryl(Doc) Eckley and Robyn Surry Healesville to Cooktown1997 * Peter Spotswood (Cooktown To Healesville with horses)1999*Geoff Daniel (Healesville  to Cooktown with horses)* Ed and Maria Van Zelderen. ( Cooktown to Healsevllle to Cooktown with horses 10000 km) The first Riders both directions.2000*Urs Marquardt and Karin Heitzmann, (Cooktown to Healesville on Horses)*Dyane Sabourin and Geoft Grundy with daughter Angela and Serena Cooktown to Healesville with horses)2003*Therese Hanna ( Healesville To Cooktown with horses)The Trailthumb|In the rainforest with packhorses Cooktown to Mosman |In the rainforest with packhorses The Creb trackImage:Kunderang Brook.jpg|thumb|Remote Kunderang Brook where the BNT follows the brook from the River in Oxley Wild Rivers NP.This Trail links eighteen of Australias national parks and more than 50 state forest providing access to some of the wildest, most remote country in the world.(The Bicentennial National Trail, Welcome to One of the Worlds Great Natural Adventures) The Bicentennial National Trail is suitable for self-reliant horse riders, walkers and mountain bike riders. Parts of the Trail, such as some of the Caves to Kosciuszko section, are suitable for horse drawn vehicles.( Most of the trail route is not open to motorised vehicles or trail bikes, and pets or dogs are not permitted.The trail is divided into 12 sections, of 400 to 500 kilometres, each with a corresponding guide book.1. Cooktown to Gunnawarra; the trail passes through rain forest, gold fields and historical tin mining towns.2. Gunnawarra to Collinsville, through the grazing country of far north Queensland.3. Collinsville to Kabra4. Kabra to Biggenden5. Biggenden to Blackbutt6. Queensland to the New South Wales border at Cullendore7. Killarney to Ebor; this is a rugged remote section that follows the Fawkes River through Fawkes River National Park(NSW WILDERNESS Retrieved on 8 December 2008) and across Way.8. Ebor to Tops, is another rugged remote section that passes through Wild Rivers National Park. After passing Ebor the trail crosses the Point Lookout Road before it passes briefly through National Park. It then runs on the east of Georges River until it crosses the Armidale to Kempsey road. The track is mostly unmarked as it follows the River past the historic East Kunderang homestead in Oxley Wild Rivers National Park. Following Kunderang Brook it winds its way to mustering huts at Left Hand Hut, the remote Middle Yards Hut, Youdales Hut and to Cedar Creek on the edge of National Park. After crossing the Highway the trail passes through the Gulf National Park. This section takes at least five days to travel and all food and equipment has to be carried. There are numerous creek and river crossings, with some steep ascents and descents.9. Barrington Tops to Jenolan Caves10. Jenolan Caves to Kosciuszkothumb|The start in Cooktown11. Kosciuszko to Omeo, including the Tom Groggin Track12. Omeo to Healesville, near MelbourneNational Mail Relay RideAlan Rideout handing the National Mail Relay Ride saddlebags to Brian Taylor at Callide, having just completed a 108 kilometres for the day from Mt Morgan (1978).  Allan Rideout features in the story One Of A Few.See also* of long-distance hiking tracks in Australia References External links*Bicentennial National Trail Guidebooks*The Long Riders Guild*Trans Canade Trail*John Chapman on The Bicentennial National Trail*Mountain Bikes on the BNT
15737512
Wharncliffe_Crags
thumb|right|300px|The top of the crags with the Stocksbridge bypass in the background.thumb|right|300px|The crags with its many detached boulders.Wharncliffe Crags is a gritstone escarpment or edge situated approximately  north west of the city of Sheffield in Yorkshire, England.  Overview The edge which is characterised as a steep rock face for much of its four kilometre length runs from grid reference  just east of the village of Deepcar in a roughly south easterly direction to grid reference  just east of Wharncliffe Side. Wharncliffe Crags stand on the eastern side of the upper River Don valley at a height of around 250 metres above sea level with the highest spot height being 297 metres. Although set in a pleasant situation, the northern end of the crags are never far away from the buzz of civilisation with the noise of the nearby bypass and A6102 road ever present, there are also two lines of pylons which converge at the northern end of the crags. The escarpment was formed 320 million years ago in the  Paleozoic era.  History The rocks at the north western end of Wharncliffe Crags have been quarried to produce Quern-stones as far back into history as the Iron Age, continuing into the period of the Roman occupation of Britain. The name Wharncliffe actually evolved from the term quern cliff(The Peak District and Central England, Woodland Trust ISBN 0711226601, Page 24 Wharn is a corruption of Quern.). The process of quern production has left behind considerable evidence in the area of the crags, including work flooring and trackways as well as many abandoned querns. In August 1996 an accidental heather fire burned away much of the vegetation over an area of 8 hectares, revealing many more quern-stones than had originally thought present. A survey by Heritage in 2000 uncovered around 2300 stones in the 8 hectares area leading to the estimate that there could be around 8000 quern stones in the quarry area. The area of quern production has been declared a Scheduled Ancient Monument.(www.topforge.co.uk. Gives details of quern stones.)(English Heritage. Gives details of quern stones.) Wharncliffe Lodge stands at the southern end of the crags and has fine views of the Ewden valley to the west. The present building dates from the 19th century and is the third lodge on the site with the original being  built in 1510. The lodge has strong associations with Mary Wortley Montagu who resided there for short periods in the early 18th century. The floor of one of the rooms bears the inscription of Henry VIIIs reign (1491-1547).(Historic Hallamshire, David Hey, ISBN 1 84306 049 3 Page 143 Gives details of Wharncliffe Lodge.)(The Letters and Works of Lady Mary Wortley Montagu, Mary Wortley Montagu, ISBN 9781402166624 Pages 46 & 47 Gives information on Wharncliffe Lodge.) Geology and habitat The geology of Wharncliffe Crags led to the area being designated a of Special Scientific Interest in 1988. The geological features of the cliff face are of special interest showing the best available exposed example of the Wharncliffe Edge Rock Formation within the Pennines and show two primary sandstone beds which were originally laid down as sediments from a meandering river. The downslope from the base of the cliff towards the Don valley is covered by the birch and oak woodland of Wharncliffe woods which is owned by the Commission. The flat ground on the top of the crags is mostly carpeted with heather(English Nature. Gives details of SSSI, Geology and Habitat.). The level terrain behind the central part of the crags is known as Wharncliffe Chase, this was part of a royal hunting park in the Ages. More recently the chase was mined for Ganister which was used to produce furnace bricks for the local steel industry, there has also been small scale coal mining in the past(The Peak District and Central England Page 24 Gives details of Wharncliffe Chase.).thumb|right|300px|Wharncliffe Lodge.thumb|right|300px|The so called Dragons Den cave at the southern end of the crags. Wharncliffe Heath Local Nature Reserve The north western (Deepcar) end of the crags stand within the Wharncliffe Heath Nature Reserve an area of heather, bracken, birch scrub and broad leaved woodland which provides a home for a rich diversity of wildlife. These include rare and threatened species, such as nightjar, linnet, lizard and green tiger beetle. The reserve is one of the best examples of dry heath in the Sheffield area, it differs from the nearby District heather moorland in that it is a mosaic of heather, scrub and bracken. The reserve is managed by the Wharncliffe Heathlands Trust with help from Sheffield Wildlife Trust and the Coalfield Heathland Project whose main recent projects have been keeping birch scrub under control by felling(Notice board at reserve site. Gives details of Wharncliffe Heath Local Nature Reserve.). Rock Climbing Wharncliffe Crags has a long history of climbing, it was at the forefront at the birth of the sport in the UK in the 1880s. Pre-War I climbing legend W. Puttrell was a regular visitor to the crags from 1885 onwards and pioneered many early routes. By 1900 the crag was the most popular climbing venue in the country, a fact that was helped by the presence of the nearby railway station on the Sheffield to Manchester railway line. The popularity of the crag declined losing out to more popular venues in the Peak District and is now a quiet site. There are around 142 traditional climbs on the crag along with many bouldering climbs on the numerous large boulders that have become detached from the main crag.(www.rockfax.com. Gives details of rock climbing.) Legend File:Wharncliffe Dragon.JPG|thumb|left|Slaying the Wharncliffe Dragon, Town HallThe crags are also the venue of the legend of the of Wantley, a myth that was made into a 17th century satirical poem and an opera by Carey. The legend was mentioned by Sir Scott in the opening chapter of Ivanhoe, Here haunted of yore the fabulous Dragon of Wantley(The Free Library. Gives text of Ivanhoe, Chapter 1.). The story tells the tale of how More, of More Hall, slays a troublesome dragon which lives on the crags. A cave at the southern end of the crags, close to Wharncliffe Lodge, is called the Dragons Den and is thus marked on maps.(www.kellscraft.com. Gives text of Dragon of Wantley poem.) References  
15768224
De_Sacia_Mooers
 spouse  Edward Demarest Mooers (1917&ndash;1925)De Sacia Mooers (November 19, 1888-January 11, 1960) was a movie actress, disputably from Angeles, California.Disputed OriginsNewspaper accounts of the era differ as to her birthplace. At the time, it was common for the various studios to exaggerate or fabricate an actors biography to make them seem more exotic and interesting to the general public. One report contends that she was a Los Angeles native and a member of the California Saville family. The Savilles were among Californias pioneer settlers. Another article says that Mooers was from York. Yet another source has her birthplace as Michigan ( http://www.citwf.com/person305558.htm ). A 1927 movie review described her ancestry as French-Dutch.SearcherIn October 1920 Mooers was enticed by Louis Cardinals owner, Warren Fuzzy Anderson to locate his nephew, Jimmy Anderson. Fuzzy Anderson was once a partner of Ford. He handled foreign distribution for Motor Company parts. He had no other close relatives to leave his wealth to aside from Jimmie, who left Louis, Missouri in 1918.Mooers resided at the Canterbury Inn on Westlake Avenue in Los Angeles while she performed her investigation. She was promised a diamond necklace by the baseball owner if she could find Jimmie. The nephew was rumored to have relocated to Hollywood and become a man in motion pictures. Vamp Mooers began working on a series of vamp roles starting with Blonde Vampire in 1922. Mooers was writing a book at the time. It was due to be published when the vamp film was released. A natural blond, Mooers defied the stereotype of a vamp having to have dark hair.Movie career She began her career with the Goldwyn Company. At first she was known as De Sacia Saville. In the comedy Potash and Perlmutter (1923), she was cast with Mansfield and Lyon. Mooers appeared in over one hundred movies in the film era. Among her co-stars were Mix and Baxter. Mooers made Lonesome Ladies (1927), a National Pictures comedy-drama about romance and marital strife. The screenplay was written by Coffee and the film featured Stone and Q. Nilsson. Her final movie was a western, Arizona Kid (1930). It stars Baxter, Lombard and Maris. Mooers also performed on stage in York City.Difficult MarriageMooers became the wife of Edward Demarest Mooers, owner of the Yellow Aster gold mine in California. It was the richest gold mine in the United States. The couple married in 1917 and divorced in May 1925. Eddie Mooers family disapproved of Mooers career from the time she left her home on Alvarado Terrace, barely out of her teens. An agreement was made in which representatives of the wealthy husbands family accompanied him to Mooers studio once a month. They observed her behavior for signs of changes. The union between actress and mining scion became fractured and collapsed after the inquisitors decided Mooers had become less lovely, charming, and conventional.Mooers later wed actor Harry Lewis. She was a member of the Womans Breakfast Club and director of the McKinley Home For Boys.DeathIn 1960 De Sacia Mooers died following a six week illness in Presbyterian Medical Center. She was seventy-two years old. Her residence was at 1523 North McCadden Place, Los Angeles. References  Further reading * Danville Bee, Charmers of Six Nations In New Film At Rialto, November 28, 1927, Page 13.* Frederick Post, Wanted Career-Not Husband, May 27, 1925, Page 10.* Angeles Times, Blonde Vamp Lives, September 26, 1920, Page III15.* Los Angeles Times, Hunting..Heir..To..Millions, October 9, 1922, Page II3.* Los Angeles Times, De Sacia Mooers Dies; Tom Mix Leading Lady, January 12, 1960, Page 9.* Modesto Evening News, California Girl Tells How Vamp Does Her Stuff In Modern Business World, June 19, 1923, Page 2.* York Times, The Cisco Kid Returns, May 17, 1930, Page 24.* New York Times, De Sacia Mooers Dead, January 13, 1960, Page 47.* Sandusky Register, Can A Blonde Be A Vampire?, December 28, 1919, Page 17.* Rapids Daily Tribune, Moviegrams, Saturday, December 3, 1927, Page 8. External links * 
15794935
Pinsot
Pinsot is a commune in the Isre department in south-eastern France. Places *The Iron Route of Pinsot (Le Sentier du Fer de Pinsot) is a forest trail leading visitors to discover the old mining industry of the town. Historic sites such as minors houses, disaffected mines and cinders can be seen.*Le Cohard is a hamlet from where start many hiking trails into the Gleyzin mountain in the Belledonne massif.See also*of the Isre departmentca:Pinsotceb:Pinsotes:Pinsoteu:Pinsotfr:Pinsotit:Pinsotmg:Pinsotms:Pinsotnl:Pinsotpl:Pinsotru:uk:vi:Pinsotvo:Pinsotwar:Pinsot
15809957
Villars,_Loire
Villars is a commune in the Loire department in central France.Villars is a former mining town.Twin towns* Halberstadt, Germany, since 15 November 2003* Torredembarra, Spain, since  2 September 1984See also*of the Loire departmentca:VillarsLoire(Loira)(Loire)(Loire)(Loira)LoireLoire(Loire)(Loire)(Loara)(Loire)Loire()Loire(Loire)Loire
15822936
Bone_Cave,_Tennessee
Bone Cave (also Big Bone Cave or Bonecave) is an unincorporated community in Van Buren County, Tennessee, States.  It lies near Route 70S northwest of the town of Spencer, the seat of Van Buren County.(Rand McNally.  The Road Atlas 08. Chicago: McNally, 2008, p. 95.)  Its elevation is 965 feet (294 m), and it is located at  (35.7750675, -85.5849782).  The various forms of its names led the Board on Geographic Names to decide on the official form of the communitys name in 1895.(Geographic Names Information System Feature Detail Report, Names Information System, 1980-05-19.  Accessed 2008-02-18.)The community is named for nearby Bone Cave, one of the most famous and historic caves in Tennessee.  Big Bone Cave was named for the discovery of a giant ground sloth skeleton in 1811 during the mining of cave dirt to be processed for saltpeter. At one time the community had its own office, the Bone Cave Post Office.  This post office closed some time after 1980.References
15838761
Dennis_B_Gibson
Dennis Gibson is a notable African engineer, particularly associated with achievements in the international mining industry, serving as chairman of an Australian government-appointed team developing guidance on mine water management.Gibson graduated with a BSc Civil Engineering (1978) and MSc Engineering (1981) both from the University of Natal, South Africa. He followed this up with an MBA at the Management College in the Kingdom (1998). He is a registered Professional Engineer in South Africa, and a Fellow of the African Institution of Civil Engineering.After developing his experience in engineering during the late 1970s, he started to focus on the mining industry in 1985. His expertise includes project management, water resources development and management, environmental protection, tailings management and risk reviews.In 1989, Gibson joined Rio Tinto, working in operational and consulting roles in southern Africa, USA, Canada, Chile, Brazil and Australia. He transferred to Rio Tinto Australia in 2000 and spent five years consulting on water management to Rio Tinto globally. He helped develop the Rio Tinto Excellence in Water Management Diagnostic toolkit used across the Rio Tinto Group.He joined Energy Resources of Australia in the Northern Territory as General Manager Technical Projects in 2005 where he had carriage of managing key life extension opportunities in the uranium business.As General Manager Water Resources for Rio Tinto Iron Ore in Western Australia he was accountable for strategic water management. Gibson was chairman of the Australian Federal Government of Resources, Energy and Tourisms team which developed the leading practice sustainable development handbook on mine water management published in May 2008.He left Rio Tinto after 20 years in January 2009 and established Dennis Gibson & Associates to focus on value added services to private and government sectors based on over 30 years specialist experience in resource sector, mining, infrastructure, water management, environmental, finance, technology, sustainable development and project management. He provides strategic advice to Australian and international Governments and private sector technology and infrastructure organisations pertaining to market entry into the Mining Sector.External links* 1.Excellence in Water Management Diagnostic toolkit* 2. Energy Resources Australia* 3. Rio Tinto Iron Ore* 4. Australian Federal Government Department of Resources, Energy and Tourism* 5. Waste Management and Environment, Nov 2005* 6. Water Awards - Western Australia, 2007* 7. Our Three Percent, Rio Tinto Review No 86, June 2008* 8. On the Waterline Rio Tinto Review No 86, June 2008* 9 . Water Alliance Awards, Adelaide , May 2008References(
15867987
Beinn_Odhar
 easiest_route  thumb|right|300px|The old lead mine on the south slopes with Tyndrum in the valley.thumb|right|300px|Looking north from the summit to Beinn Dorain.Beinn Odhar is a Scottish mountain situated at the northern extremity of the Lomond and the Trossachs National Park. It stands four km (2.5 mi) north of Tyndrum, a location with which it has strong ties, being well seen from the village. The mountain lies on the border between and Bute and Stirling council areas within the Auch and Invermeran estate. Overview Beinn Odhar reaches a height of 901 metres (2956 feet) making it the 18th highest Corbett(www.scotclimb.org.uk. Gives list of Corbetts in height order.), failing to make Munro status by just 13 metres. The hill also qualifies as a Marilyn having a considerable prominence of 457 metres making it an excellent viewpoint. The grassy, steep, conical shape of Beinn Odhar is a well-known sight for vehicles travelling on the road and for walkers on the Highland Way, both of which pass on the immediate western side of the mountain. Beinn Odhar stands four km south of the Munro Dorain, both mountains being similar in shape and character and the possibility of confusing the two peaks by a cursory glance is not impossible.Beinn Odhar is part of the Auch Corbetts, a group of five Corbetts which can be climbed in a single days walk from the hamlet of Auch (grid reference ) on the A82. This is a rare situation as the Corbetts are usually difficult to combine in any number and the opportunity to climb five in a natural round is unique(Climbing The Corbetts Page 69 This is probably the only day  which can produce five ticks.). The hills name translates from the Gaelic language as Dun coloured mountain, this alludes to the brownish-grey colour of the heather and grass on the hill. Irvine Butterfield points out that the name is a little insipid given the hills steep slopes and distinctive shape.(The Call Of The Corbetts Page 154 Gives details of name translation and meaning.) Geography Beinn Odhar is characterised by steep slopes on all sides. The only prominent ridge of any length goes SE then south from the summit for 2.5 km to reach the subsidiary top of Meall Buidhe (653 metres) before continuing for a further three km to reach the valley floor of Strath Fillan, several km south of Tyndrum. The eastern flank of the mountain is riven by a deep gash caused by the Allt Choire Dhuibh, a stream which has it source in a small lochan on the SW side of the mountain called Lochan Choire Dhuibh which stands at a height of just under 800 metres. There is another lochan, unnamed, on the southern side of the hill at around the same height. The streams on the southern slopes form quite distinctive deep ravines (see picture) as they flow into Coire Thoin, together they form the headwaters of the River Fillan.The hills other major corrie stands on the northern slopes, this is Coire Luaidh (Corrie of Lead) which contains the hills only crags on its higher slopes. The corries name refers to lead mining which took place in the 18th and 19th centuries. Beinn Odhar stands on the Tyndrum fault, whose veins yielded large amounts of lead on Chirn to the SW, however the mines on Odhar were not as productive. The best example of former mining activity on the hill can be seen on the southern slopes, at a height of 650 metres there is considerable evidence of an adit going into the hillside and much mining waste(Geology And Landscapes Of Scotland Page 85 Gives some details of lead mining.). Beinn Odhar stands on the divide of Scotland with rainfall from the mountain going to both coasts, either going west via Orchy to reach the sea at Oban or east by the Tay to reach the sea at Dundee. Ascents and view Beinn Odhar is usually climbed from the south and there are three popular starting points. The start from the village of Tyndrum goes north via a track which was formerly the main road until the 1930s but now carries the West Highland Way. After two km the track is left and the hill is ascended by the southern slopes passing the old mine and the unnamed lochan on the way. Guide books mention a track as far as the mine on this route but this is not easy to locate. Another starting point is Dalrigh on the A82 (grid reference ), this route climbs by the long south ridge passing over Meall Buidhe and is a longer and less steep alternative.Walkers who wish to tackle all five of the Auch Corbetts, a tough day with over 2000 metres of ascent, are advised by guide books to start at a parking place on the A82 at grid reference  as parking at Auch is limited. From here it is possible to climb Beinn Odhar by the south ridge(The Corbetts And Other Scottish Hills Page 58 Gives details of the round of the five Auch corbetts.). The top of the mountain is marked by a cairn and give fine views to the Black Mount to the north and the hills around Crianlarich to the south. References * The Corbetts And Other Scottish Hills, Scottish Mountaineering Club, ISBN 0-907521-29-0* Geology And Landscapes Of Scotland, Con Gillen, ISBN 1-903544-09-2* The Call Of The Corbetts, Irvine Butterfield, ISBN 0-7153-2754-2* Climbing The Corbetts, Brown, ISBN 1-898573-08-5* The Corbett Almanac, McNeish, ISBN 1-897784-14-7FootnotesOdhar
15888671
Ray_Evans_(Australian_businessman)
Ray Evans is an Australian business leader, a conservative, and campaigner against change mitigation efforts.Early yearsEvans was educated at the High School before he attended of Melbourne and graduated in Electrical and Mechanical Engineering http://www.hrnicholls.com.au/nicholls/nichvol5/vol5prof.htm. During his years at university, he served as President of the Melbourne University ALP Club and as a delegate from the Federated Fodder and Fuel Trades Union to Victorian ALP State Conferences, among others http://www.hrnicholls.com.au/nicholls/nichvol5/vol5prof.htm.Business interestsEvans taught electrical engineering at University, Victoria.  From 1982 until 2001, Ray Evans was Executive Officer at Mining Corporation, (WMC Ltd) a major Australian mining company, (under Hugh Morgan).  Since July 2001, Ray Evans has been the Director of Ray Evans & Associates, a consultancy specialising in political and economic advice.()Political activismIn January 1986 Evans, along with Costello and two others, founded the R Nicholls Society, a tank of the Right of which he is still President.  The Society has had considerable influence over Liberal Party policies.  The initial motivation for founding the Society was relations - opposition to the setting of the wage by Justice Henry Bourne Higgins and commitment to freedom in the labour market.()Climate change skepticismEvans is also a founder of the Group, a group opposed to the ratification of the Kyoto treaty and believing that the science associated with global warming is uncertain.()  Evans was also instrumental in establishing a number of right-wing organisations, such as the Nicholls Society, the Society, and the Griffith Society, for all of which he was either President or Treasurer.() According to author Hamilton, many of these groups shared the same post office box.(A supporter of the Mafia, Evans remains a committed campaigner against change initiatives, dubbing warming the mother of environmental scares.()  In collaboration with Hugh Morgan, Evans worked against the Protocol, and has been central to the campaign to prevent the former Federal Liberal Government from taking actions to cut emissions.()Evans appeared on the ABCs discussion panel about Great Global Warming Swindle, a documentary which questioned the science behind global warming.()  He has stated that environmentalism is a religious belief, and published a new book Nine Facts About Climate Change in 2007.()Evans was quoted in Age as saying that Gores film Inconvenient Truth is bullshit from beginning to end, and that the carbon-dioxide link global warming is increasingly recognised as irrelevant.()References
15900084
La_Machine
La Machine is a commune in the Nivre department in central France.DemographicsAt the 1999 census, the population was 3735. On 1 January 2004, the estimate was 3649.Mining cityThe mining exploitation marked the history of this town. Coal is extracted from the fifteenth century.Also the hamlet took the name of La Machine in reference to a machine which was used to extract the coal.The production stopped in 1974 because of a lack of profitability.Today, you can still visit a Coal Mining Gallery, however, its a reproduction built to welcome people in safety.See also*of the Nivre departmentReferences* INSEE commune fileMachine (Nivre)MachineMachineMachine (Nivre)Machine (Nivre)MachineMachineMachineMachineMachine()MachineMachineMachine
15918275
Ardoch_Algonquin_First_Nation
Ardoch Algonguin First Nation is a non-status Algonquin (Anishinaabe) community that is located around the Madawaska, Mississippi and Rideau watersheds, north of OntarioHistoryIn 1844, land was reserved for their use at Bobs Lake, Ontario, but it was destroyed by illegal logging in the 1850s, and sold to Irish immigrants.(AAFN History) In the 1930s, the of Canada set up a reserve at Lake and gave status to those living there (Algonquins of Pikwkanagn First Nation). Ardoch Algonquins were encouraged to abandon their lands, and move to Golden Lake.In the summer of 1981, the Ardoch Algonquin blockaded a commercial rice-harvesting venture to protect what they saw as their territory and their manoomin (rice) which grows in the Mississippi river nearby.  At the end of August, the community was raided by the police, and many protesters were arrested. Although the blockade ended, the rice-harvesting venture stopped, and no further attempts to claim it have been made.More recently, Ardoch Algonquin and Shabot Obaadjiwan Nations blocked access to a prospective uranium mining site, near Lake, Ontario, on traditional Ardoch territory.(Algonquin co-chief to stop her uranium protest to avoid jail) Ventures Corporation, the company which wishes to do uranium drilling tests, sought injunctions against the leaders of the protest.(Judge orders Algonquin communities out) A Court of Canada ruling insists that provincial governments are legally obliged to consult with First Nations communities prior to any economic activity on land they have claimed, the Provincial Government began negotiations with Frontenac Ventures without the consent of Ardoch Algonquin First Nation.(Supporters fast for jailed chief, The Lindsay Post, April 22, 2008)thumb|Chief Paula ShermanIn February, 2008, Justice Douglas Cunningham sentenced Ardoch Algonquin co-chiefs Sherman and Lovelace to six month terms in prison for of court, but Sherman, a single mother of three, agreed to obey the injunctions to avoid prison time.( Lovelace is father of seven, and an instructor at University and Sandford Fleming Community College. The court also fined him $25,000 and fined the community an additional $10,000. Sherman, a professor at University was fined $15 000, payable to Frontenac Ventures. Currently the injunction restricts the Algonquin and non-native activists from approaching the site closer than 200 metres; this has not, however, discouraged protests in surrounding communities.On March 18, 2008 Shabot Obaadjiwan Chief Davis and Elder Bedore were required to enter into an undertaking to discourage other members of their community and other organizations from interfering with Frontenac Ventures operations.(The Whig Standard - Ontario, CA)In addition to the charges of contempt, Frontenac Ventures is suing the Algonquin for $77 million.On March 18, 2008, contempt charges were dropped without costs against three non-native activists: Frank Morrison and Peacemakers David Milne and Reverend John Hudson. They had been charged with violating the same injunction as Lovelace and Sherman, but Frontenac Ventures declined to prosecute. During the same proceedings, however, warrants were obtained for the arrest of five other non-native activists who allegedly violated the injunction.In early 2011, Robert Lovelace was involved in a number of protests against the development of Kanatas South March Highlands, including Beaver Pond Forest, on the western edge of Ottawa. (Kanata forest protest moves to city, News)ReferencesExternal links*Ardoch Algonquin First Nations and AlliesUranium Defense http://www.uraniumdefense.ca/Algonquin First Nation
15929901
Zhaojin_Mining_Industry_Company_Limited
#redirect Mining
15943221
Cornish_Institute_of_Engineers
The Cornish Institute of Engineers (CIE) was founded in 1913 by the then Principal of the School of Mines, J. J. Berringer. Its first President, Josiah Paul, was appointed on 1 March 1913. It is the only institute in Cornwall and maintains a continuous programme of lectures of very high quality. The origins of the Institute go back to the Camborne Association of Engineers, a small but prestigious body existing in the early years of the 20th century and composed mainly of mechanical engineers. Since 2011, the CIE has been affiliated with the Institute of Materials, Minerals and Mining.HistoryOn 2 November 1912, a special meeting of the Camborne Association of Engineers was held at the Mining School, Camborne, which led to a decision to enlarge its scope. At a general meeting on 4 January 1913, the then Principal of the Camborne School of Mines, J. J. Berringer, led a discussion on the Assaying of Tin in Mines. At this meeting sufficient support was achieved and the Cornish Institution of Mining, Mechanical and Metallurgical Engineers, as it was then known, was formed, and met under its first President, Josiah Paul on 1 March 1913.It was keen to cover the mining, mechanical and metallurgical, in fact all aspects of mining activity, the former three being proportionately represented on the governing body. Initially there were 130 Members including 30 Associates.The Institute at once assumed a role in monitoring the progress of mining activities in the County, with papers being delivered by persons of standing such as Josiah Paul, J. J. Berringer and William Thomas.To quote a former President, The papers and reported discussions formed valuable contributions to engineering literature, some of them having since been referred to as mining classics.A further quote from the same source may convey the importance with which the Institute was regarded when he says that in general we may claim that our endeavours have materially furthered the great modern objectives of spreading the knowledge of mining engineering in all its branches, as well as bringing before the public the actual and potential value of the minerals in the county awaiting development. I make bold to say that our efforts have benefited and hastened the advancement of the mining industry in the county to a much larger extent than is generally supposed, or the Institute is given credit for.This was said in his Presidential address in 1926 by the late F. C. Cann, Manager of Geevor Mine.The early work done by the Council and the Secretaries was immense. Transactions were compiled and published and were highly regarded, making interesting reading today, copies are available in the Tremough Campus library.The outbreak of the Great War in 1914 brought many difficulties, but the institute survived and made important contributions to the Metallurgical Research Scheme administered by the Institution of Mining and Metallurgy to further the war effort. A Cornish Tin and Tungsten Research Committee was formed on which a number of the Institute members sat.The 1914 - 1918 War was followed by a serious depression and the Institute played a supportive role, making generous donations to the Mining Division Unemployment Fund. During this period, a number of tragic events occurred, including the Levant Mine disaster when contributions were made to the Relief Fund.Later, in the 1920s the Institute played a very active role in resuscitating the mining industry in the Camborne - Redruth area.It had been the intention for many years to rename the institute the Cornish Institute of Engineers so as to encompass all engineering disciplines and this was finally achieved in 1923. In that year, it organised unaided, the Cornish section of the International Exhibition in London with great success.More recently, during the Second War, the Cornish Institute of Engineers was again consulted and assisted Government in its plans for maintaining stocks of strategic minerals.In the post war years the institute was very active in organising symposiums and publishing transactions. These have included for example Celtic offshore oil and gas exploration symposium and exhibition in 1973. Another, in 1975, was the Mining and Quarrying Symposium.The institute has collaborated with the University of Exeter Press in publication of the late J. H. Trounsons book Cornwalls Future Mines: areas of Cornwall of mineral potential.Scanning through past records of the CIE, great names and great characters appear as Presidents, Secretaries and speakers. The close ties with the Camborne School of Mines cannot be over emphasised, for since its early years CIE has always been welcomed to use its facilities for meetings and for which we express our gratitude to the Directors.The Camborne School of Mines site at Trevenson, Pool closed in 2004. Much of CSM has continued with teaching and research at the Combined Universities in Cornwall campus at Tremough near Penryn. Here CSM forms part of the College of Engineering, Mathematics and Physical Sciences of the University of Exeter.The CIE is currently reviving the close association with CSM, and we retain a healthy level of interest and participation from CSM staff and students. The CIE now holds some of its lectures in the Opie building of Cornwall College at Pool, only a short distance away from the former CSM site, for which we express our gratitude to the Principal. Other lectures, generally those with a greater relevance to mining and minerals, are held at the Tremough Campus, near to the current CSM, often as joint presentations with the IMMM (SW Branch). The CIE is developing closer relations with this organisation, an interesting reflection of the joint working with the original IMM during the Great War, if in less challenging circumstances. The early emphasis within the CIE was naturally on mining and its associated operations, but the Institute has always since inception aimed to provide a platform for all aspects of engineering activities. While our lectures still feature a considerable range of traditional mining and mineral-related topics, the Institute is keen to explore technological innovation issues, computational techniques, energy source development and usage, and health, safety and environmental management, for example. To quote from its constitution. The Institute shall devote itself to the advancement of all branches of Engineering and the exchange of information and ideas concerning the foregoing by arranging meetings for the presentation of papers and films, and coordination with interested bodies of existing and new engineering activities.Achievements of the InstituteTo this end, some of our activities have been held jointly with other bodies, including the Institute of Materials, Minerals and Mining, the Minerals Engineering Society, and the Royal Geological Society of Cornwall and further such collaboration may be considered where it matches the aims of the institute.These are the essential aims and philosophy of the Institute. It is generally considered that, over its long history, these objectives have been achieved and it is hoped to do so for many years into the future.One additional function of the CIE is the award of medals and prizes for outstanding achievements. The John Trounson Memorial Prize of 200 to the best student achieving a minimum high standard on the MSc mining course at CSM is one. The West Medal for outstanding papers on mineral processing is another. The Institute is also closely associated with the Cornwall Industrial Trust, started by Hugh Stapleton, which is chaired by the President, and which is able to make grants to students.To give a brief overview, the Institutes executive consists of: President with Senior and Junior Vice Presidents, Treasurer and Secretary together with 15 council members. Present membership is over 100 spread over many disciplines. Normally 7 lecture meetings are held each year monthly on Thursday evenings and Autumn industrial visits are made.It is not a professional institution and there are no qualifying membership requirements except an interest in engineering. However, since affiliation with the Institute of Materials, Minerals and Mining (IMMM) in 2011, it is possible that some aspects may count towards IMMM professional activities subject to conformation.
